Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Number of Reviews
66

Author
Scott Renshaw
ARMAGEDDON
(Touchstone)
Starring:  Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler, Steve
Buscemi, Will Patton, Peter Storemare, Keith David.
Screenplay:  Jonathan Hensleigh and J. J. Abrams.
Producers:  Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd and Michael Bay.
Director:  Michael Bay.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, adult themes, violence)
Running Time:  150 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     You gotta give bonus points to the Touchstone Pictures publicity
department for uncommon candor on the subject of big-budget film
screenwriting.  Press materials for ARMAGEDDON proudly trumpet the fact
that the producers "assembled a cadre of talented writers" to polish up
Jonathan Hensleigh's script, including Tony Gilroy, Paul Attanasio, Scott
Rosenbert and Robert Towne.  Even cast members Steve Buscemi, Peter
Stormare and Owen Wilson were acknowledged for their ad-lib contributions.
After creating an additional writing credit to accommodate two more names
("Adaptation" on top of "Story" and "Screenplay," as if you could figure
out the difference), Jerry Bruckheimer and Touchstone appear to have
publicly embraced the concept of pot-luck screenwriting:  the notion that
if a dozen different guys all bring something to the table, you end up
with a cinematic meal.
     Or in the case of ARMAGEDDON, one massive snack.  The subject, of
course, is this summer's favorite -- a huge celestial body on a collision
course with our Big Blue Marble, this one an asteroid the size of Texas.
Faced with a "Global Killer" certain to wipe out life as we know it, NASA
chief Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) initiates a plan involving landing a
shuttle on the asteroid and planting a nuclear warhead 800 feet below its
surface.  To that end he recruits deep-core oil driller Harry Stamper
(Bruce Willis) for the job of making the big hole for the big bomb.
Naturally, Harry needs his misfit crew along with him, including hot-shot
A. J. (Ben Affleck), who coincidentally is in love with Harry's daughter
Grace (Liv Tyler), much to Harry's paternal consternation.
     It's enough to generate flashbacks from DEEP IMPACT, where the feeble
attempts to generate sweeping emotion more often generated sleeping
emotion.  ARMAGEDDON, to its credit, at least gets its priorities
straight.  Make no mistake, this is a special effects-driven action film,
chock-a-block with ahhh-inspiring scenes -- exploding space shuttles,
meteor showers toppling the Empire State Building, the gargoyles on the
Notre Dame Cathedral watching as Paris is reduced to baguette crumbs.
Director Michael Bay predictably resorts to tension-builders like close
shaves with countdown clocks, but at least he knows enough to keep the
focus on the drill team's mission once they're in space.  For its final 75
minutes, ARMAGEDDON is virtually nothing but explosions, crashes and
narrow escapes...and that's a good thing.
     It's the _first_ 75 minutes which truly test your gag reflex, as the
aforementioned cadre of writers tries vainly to create the illusion of
character development.  Stock interpersonal conflicts share time with
tender moments as all involved make their peace before heading off to save
humanity; I'm not sure whether I was more moved by the gruff
reconciliation between Grace and Harry, or A. J. wooing Grace using Animal
Crackers for foreplay (don't ask).  It's all a load of nonsense, made even
less interesting by Bay's foolish decision to keep chopping back and forth
between the playful introduction of our roughneck protagonists and a
solemn war room session at NASA.  There's nothing cohesive or compelling
about ARMAGEDDON as narrative; strangely enough, it feels like the result
of a dozen different writers contributing individual scenes or lines of
dialogue.
     I'm not going to suggest that ARMAGEDDON isn't a pretty effective
diversion.  If there's one thing a dozen writers can do, it's produce a
bunch of solid laughs and craft a few exciting action sequences.  It's fun
watching the unhinged performances of Buscemi (as the crew's horny
geologist) and his FARGO partner Stormare (as a loopy Cosmonaut), and it's
fun grinning at creaky devices like military men being turned into
villains for choosing the fate of all humanity over our intrepid heroes.
There's just not much more you can expect from a film where they seem more
interested in throwing in a GODZILLA gag than in letting one writer create
an actual story.  For all the uneven visceral enjoyment that it's worth,
TOUCHSTONE PICTURES proudly presents ARMAGEDDON:  a blockbuster a la
carte.

Author
Jerry Bosch
THE DEEP IMPACT OF ARMAGEDDON - RANDOM THOUGHTS
It is summer and the sky is falling. Hollywood has been deeply impacted and
it has met the celestial army head on.
When space shuttles are launched from Cape Canaveral hardly anything ever
goes wrong but when they are launched from Hollywood we can expect lots of
trouble because trouble is what summer blockbusters are about. Impending
doom is not enough; you must deliver doom, as in Deep Impact; or experience
near doom in the process of avoiding it, as in Armageddon.
Deep Impact and Armageddon use different approaches to the problem of
delivering disaster. If you are going to have Armageddon, then you must (a)
have a flawed plan to avoid it and (b) limit Armageddon to less than
Armageddon, since total oblivion is much too bleak for summer fare. That is
the case with Deep Impact, which delivers a watered down version of
Armageddon. On the other hand, if you are going to avoid Armageddon
altogether, as is the case with Armageddon, you must (a) satisfy the
disaster expectations with shallow impacts and (b) dedicate yourself to the
proposition that every solution has a problem. The world finally survives,
but the devil is in saving it.
If disbelief is the coin of admission, Armageddon comes at a higher price.
Deep Impact can afford to be realistic, because it plans to deliver the
goods (Armageddon). Armageddon, however,  after getting the minidisasters
out the way, must strain credulity to the limit and well beyond in terms of
tactical crises as a substitute for Armageddon. In Armageddon you get not
one digital countdown but two. Taking both to the last second would have
been in terrible taste, so the blue and the green wires, or the red and the
yellow or whatever the colors, are cut with 3 seconds to spare in the first
case. That significant sacrifice is the price that the screenwriters paid
for the indulgence of avoiding the end of the world in the second case by
the slim margin of just one second, which is the accepted standard.
Both films are curiously faithful to the notion of a sacrificial lamb. I
would be loath to accuse Christ of setting a bad precedent, but perhaps out
of respect Hollywood refused to spare the world without the sacrifice of a
hero. The fact that Hollywood felt compelled to put Christian formula ahead
of Hollywood formula may be credibly used by the religious crowd as another
example of the deep stronghold of the value-trader ethic in our culture. As
a result we have two perfectly good actors, Robert Duvall and Bruce Willis
going down in a style completely foreign to the image of the indestructible,
infallible summer superhero.
Any film in which humanity is bracing itself for imminent death will become
a corn field at some point. The poignant good byes in Deep Impact involve
characters that we either don't know or care little for. As a result the
sentimental farewells are maudlin and slightly annoying. By contrast, the
corresponding scenes in Armageddon are integrated in the story. For the most
part they are effective and well acted.
In Deep Impact Robert Duvall delivers the competent job that is expected
from a veteran of his caliber. Tea Leoni played her part too well for her
own good. She was transparent: we saw the character and not the actress,
which is good, and she played without Pacino hysterics or Nicholson
histrionics, which should also be good. However, Hollywood (read audiences)
does not reward that kind of integrity. The character was authentic and
unfortunately, as such, not terribly likeable and a little bit dull. Ron
Eldard was well behaved but lacked the gravity that is expected from a
mission commander. Perhaps it is his voice, or it may be that asking him and
us to make the transition from tubal imebecility to wide-screen rocket
science is more than he and we could handle. In Armageddon, Bruce Willis and
Ben Affleck, neither of which aspire to make us forget Maurice Evans,
communicated surprisingly well the dimensions that should surface when
substantial men of action face moral dilemmas. The inevitable
father-daughter conflict  was dead serious business in Deep Impact.  In
Armageddon it fluctuated between comedy relief and real emotion. This was
just one case of the tongue-in-cheek approach with which Armageddon
mollified the core of conflict which was none the less communicated in full
measure. Steve Buscemi and Bob Thornton contributed strong performances in
Armageddon.
Deep Impact's supporting cast was star studded, some of them burned out and
others still (elsewhere) incandescent: Vanessa `The Van' Redgrave,
Maximilian Schell, Morgan Freeman, James Cromwell. Good actors with little
to do but stay ahead of their creditors or advance the custodial accounts as
the case may be. The Oscar however goes to MSNBC, who steals the show with
its unseen but pervasive presence. Shades of Rebecca.
The chances that any of my readers may let the summer pass without seeing
either or both of these films are less than the chances of an asteroid hit
on Earth. But if by force of the gravity of unusual circumstances you may
find yourself so impacted, don't go into a deep depression; it is not the
end of the world . Raise your  arms and head on to the next show. After all,
the films are likely to re-orbit.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: July 1, 1998
Starring: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Peter Stormare, Keith
David, Steve Buscemi, William Fichtner
Directed by: Michael Bay
Distributed by: Buena Vista Pictures
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sci-fi disaster action, sensuality, brief language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/armageddon.htm
This year's second asteroid-threatens-earth movie turned out about how
last year's second volcano-threatens-city movie did. Similar to VOLCANO,
which was more action-oriented, more intense, and generally more on the
mark than the earlier-in-the-year DANTE'S PEAK, ARMAGEDDON takes a
decidedly different course of action than DEEP IMPACT. Produced by Jerry
Bruckheimer and directed by Michael Bay, two of the most noted action
movie crew heads, this one's got a better focus on the same material. In
short, there's more to like about ARMAGEDDON. 
There's quite a bit of star power involved in this one, and they're
mostly A-listers or competent supports, whereas DEEP IMPACT's cast was a
lot of unknowns. Although the movie begins with its biggest star - the
asteroid - we're soon introduced to our heroes. Dan Truman (Billy Bob
Thornton) gathers his team at NASA after a meteor shower destroys the
Space Shuttle Atlantis and a few choice spots of the Big Apple
(including the Chrysler Building). They realize there's a bigger chunk
of rock out there, and its imminent impact with the Blue Planet will
result in the death of every last organism - even bacteria. They can't
hit the thing from the outside; that'd just blow dust off the surface.
So they need to find the world's best deep-core driller, Harry Stamper
(Bruce Willis), and send him and his team up to the asteroid. Once
there, they need to drill down to 800 feet, plant a bomb, and get the
heck off before the explosion splits the Texas-sized thing in half. 
The picture is largely formula, but Jerry Bruckheimer and Michael Bay
have been working at the action movie business long enough to know
exactly what formula works. Also, they're working in a genre where
formula is almost accepted in a good picture, and by this advice they
create their characters to be a cast of the usual suspects. There are no
truly two-dimensional characters, and it's unfortunate that Jonathan
Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams, who wrote the script, chose to write most of
the players in as jerks. Harry Stamper, A.J. Frost (Stamper's soon-to-be
son-in-law, played by Ben Affleck), Colonel Sharp (commander of the
mission to save the Earth, played by William Fichtner) and Rockhound (a
sex-obsessed crazy played by Steve Buscemi) are all testosterone-loaded
for one reason or another; Grace Stamper (Liv Tyler), Harry's daughter,
comes of as one who likes to play the victim; in fact, only "Chick"
Chapple (Will Patton), Harry's second-in-command, is likeable for his
character. 
The movie's last half-hour is worth as much as the rest of the movie,
and Bay and Bruckheimer seem to have lost some of the excellent pacing
they displayed in THE ROCK from two years ago. ARMAGEDDON runs 144
minutes in length but only gets really exciting near the end; everything
leading up to that is character development, Stamper and his crew
getting trained to be astronauts, or "teaser" footage of the asteroid
nearing Earth. Although it never pretends to be anything but, the movie
is a summer movie, which means it's terribly shallow in all respects and
over-saturated with special effects. There's nothing wrong with this
once you're in the mood, because ARMAGEDDON is a fun movie to watch.
Certainly one of the better summer flicks.
FINAL AWARD FOR "ARMAGEDDON": 3.0 stars - a good movie.

Author
Kevin Patterson
After GODZILLA disappointed, both critically and commercially, and DEEP
IMPACT turned out not to be an action movie in the strict sense, July of
1998 has rolled around without an action blockbuster having hit the
theaters. Expectations have accordingly been high for ARMAGEDDON, in which
a team of roughnecks led by Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis) are sent into
outer space for the purpose of drilling a hole inside an asteroid on a
collision course with Earth and then blowing it up from the inside. It
certainly seems to have all the right ingredients: it has Bruce Willis in
the lead, it has a premise ripe with potential for big explosions and
stunts (along with a bit of flag-waving), and the producer/director team of
Jerry Bruckheimer and Michael Bay had been responsible for the 1996 action
hit THE ROCK.
Unfortunately, that's really about all it has. Don't misunderstand:
ARMAGEDDON entertains. But aside from the few real moments of heroism at
the end, I liked it mostly for the same reasons that Beavis and Butt-head
would probably like it: because a lot of stuff got blown up, and that was
cool. Since its plot (Our Heroes vs. Big Inanimate Object) is about as thin
as they come, it has to keep moving mostly on the basis of Murphy's Law: a
fuel tank explodes during an intermediate stop at a space station, one of
the two shuttles is damaged by debris from the asteroid, the nuclear bomb
intended to destroy the asteroid is about to go off early, the drills keep
breaking, a character comes down with "space dementia," and finally the
bomb mechanism is broken and someone has to stay behind and detonate the
bomb manually.
I won't waste time pointing out how the storyline is implausible (which it
is), since these kinds of movies do not sink or swim with their scientific
credibility. I will point out, however, that it's kind of sloppy. The
screenplay reportedly passed through the word processors of nine different
writers, and it shows in places. There are a few characters introduced
towards the beginning, such as a goofy astronomer with a nagging wife and a
few New York City tourists who get scared up by a meteor shower, who then
disappear with no indication of why they were in the script in the first
place. Steve Buscemi's character, Rockhound, apparently got his Ph.D at age
22, yet he later makes an asinine comment about how NASA's proposed flight
plan resembles a failed stunt from a Road Runner cartoon that would insult
the intelligence of most high school physics students. There's also some
hokey dialogue that I would have thought at least one of the nine writers
ought to have edited. (Note to whoever was responsible for the scene where
the bomb is about to go off: it's fine to write a scene that turns into a
surrealistic nightmare, but actually having a character announce "This has
turned into a surrealistic nightmare!" doesn't come off too well.)
Characters in these kinds of action movies don't have to be well-developed,
but they at least ought to be animated and fun to watch. Aside from Harry
Stamper and Rockhound, most of them are pretty bland: the rest of Stamper's
squad consist of pretty much stock macho characters. Their tough-guy antics
in front of the NASA training team and sarcastic one-liners are mildly
amusing, but the only time I really laughed out loud was when Buscemi
started trying to replicate a scene from DR. STRANGELOVE. For a movie that
barely comes in under the 150-minute mark, some of this seems like dead
weight (not to mention that it completely undermines any sense that the
world might really be about to end, but I'm not even going to get started
on that). There's also a romance between A.J. (Ben Affleck) and Harry's
daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) that doesn't add a whole lot to the story.
Director Michael Bay keeps the action going pretty much non-stop for the
final half of the movie. While it certainly serves to keep the audience's
adrenaline rushing, some of it unfolds in a rather confusing way. I'm still
not sure exactly what went wrong on board the space station: all I know was
that there were some sparks flying, some incomprehensible shouting from a
Russian cosmonaut (Peter Stormare), and then a Narrow Escape and a Big
Explosion. There's nothing visually distinct about ARMAGEDDON except for a
few surface shots of the asteroid: at one point, the flying rock, the
shouting, and the camera-shaking went on for so long that I actually caught
myself starting to tune out for about a minute, and that's one thing that
shouldn't happen in an action movie.
ARMAGEDDON turns up the action meter in a way few movies often do, but its
coherence meter is somewhere near the bottom. It's good entertainment, and
it meets the minimum requirements for a summer blockbuster. Still, I'd be
surprised if I remember much of it a year from now. Except, of course, that
a lot of stuff got blown up. And that was cool.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:   Bruce Willis, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Billy Bob Thornton,
            Steve Buscemi, Michael Duncan
DIRECTOR:   Michael Bay
WRITERS:    Tony Gilroy and Shane Salerno
RATED/YEAR: PG-13/1998
        "Armageddon" is the latest in a recent flood of films about big
rocks striking the Earth, a subject Hollywood can't seem to get enough of.
Roger Corman, known primarily for his many low-budget horror films of the
'50s, began the trend with last year's TV mini-series, "Asteroid."  This
summer has already seen the release of "Deep Impact," and while "Armageddon"
is a better film than either of its predecessers, I find myself wondering if
it will be too little too late to satisfy movie-goers.
        The story is straightforward enough.  Several small meteorites
have struck New York City, causing extensive damage to life and property.
NASA discovers that these small rocks are but a prelude: an asteroid the
size of Texas is on a collision course with Earth.  The rock's size means
that it's a "planet killer," with the potential to destroy all life on the
planet, right down to the bacteria.
        Realising that no amount of weapons fired from the Earth's surface
will stop the asteroid, NASA chairman Dan Truman (an excellent Billy Bob
Thornton) sends a team to intercept the rock.  Their mission: drill 8OO
feet into the surface of the rock, plant a nuclear bomb inside, then
detonate it once they are safely away.  The resulting explosion will
hopefully split the rock in two, causing it to miss the Earth.
        Bruce Willis (Die Hard) plays oil-driller Harry Stamper, recruited
to head the mission because of his expertise drilling into unusual surfaces.
Also along for the ride are A.J. (Ben Affleck), Rockhound (Steve Buscemi),
Bear (Michael Duncan) and several other professional drillers.  Although the
team doesn't particularly like each other, they are forced to work together
against a common obstacle.  Since this is Hollywood, the act naturally brings
them closer together.
        This should be a compelling story in its own right, but director
Michael Bay and screenwriters Gilroy and Salerno don't seem sure of their
ability to make it interesting; as such, they throw tons of ridiculous
subplots and groanably silly catastrophes into the mix for the crew to
encounter.  This is the sort of film where if there's even the slightest
chance for something to go wrong, it will.  So naturally, the drill gets
stuck, the timer on the nuclear bomb doesn't work, one of the crew members
turns out to be Evil (with a capital E), the ship won't start when they
try to take off, important levers break off in our heroes' hands at critical
times for no particular reason... well, you get the idea.  This film turns
"suspension of disbelief" into an art form.  After a while, these
misfortunes cease to be suspenseful and become laughable.
        Like "Deep Impact," "Armageddon" has the obligatory disfunctional
family.  Tea Leoni does not get along with her father in "Deep Impact";
Bruce Willis does not get along with his daughter in "Armageddon."  Leoni
hates her father's new girlfriend in "Impact"; Willis hates his daughter's
boyfriend (played by Affleck's character) in "Armageddon."  Leoni and
father reconcile in "Impact"; Willis and daughter reconcile in "Armageddon."
How sweet.  It might be remotely interesting if I hadn't just seen it.
        Although Aerosmith is not credited with the film's musical score,
they do perform the lion's share of the tunes.  No doubt this is due to
the strong presence of Liv Tyler (daughter of Stephen, Aerosmith's lead
singer).  If you like Aerosmith, you're in for a treat.  If you don't...
well, you might wanna bring a walkman.
        "Armageddon" won't go down as a sci-fi classic, but it's probably
worth seeing.  What sets the movie apart from the other rock flicks is not
its intelligence (which is only average), or its special effects (which are
fine though not extraordinary).  The acting is the key here, and the cast
does not disappoint.  Tyler and Affleck are a great screen couple, the
epitome of young lovers who are uncertain of the future and what it may
bring.  Thornton is also excellent as the NASA official helping out the
team from the ground.
        Surprisingly, humor is a big part of the film's charm; witness Steve
Buscemi (Reservoir Dogs, The Wedding Singer), who's played primarily for
laughs here and comes through in spades.  His observations about the
space shuttle's construction are particularly entertaining.  Other moments
to look for: an amusing cameo by Godzilla in the film's opening scene, a
Russian cosmonaut afflicted with a serious case of space madness, and the
wonderful scenes in which the crew undergoes NASA psychological testing.
        I hope this film does well at the box office.  Not because it's
a great artistic achievment, mind you; I simply want director Michael
Bay to make enough money to buy a tripod.  Honestly, I've never seen a
movie so afraid of static shots.  Some scenes vibrate as though the
cameraman was bouncing around the set on a pogo stick; others make me
wonder if the photographer mistook the camera for an etch-a-sketch and
was trying to erase the picture he'd drawn.  The visual style of the film
is often quite effective, though, so bring along some Dramemine and enjoy
the ride.
This review was originally written: July 5, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Author
Steve Kong
I admire Michael Bay for his second major film, The Rock. His first film,
Bad Boys, was OK, but nothing spectacular. Armageddon marks the third time
Michael Bay has taken to directing a major motion picture. The thing to
remember about Bay is that he is one of the few directors that have
successfully taken the leap from directing music videos to directing
feature films.
Armageddon is a standard fare action/sci-fi movie. It is also the second
half of this year's objects-from-outer-space movies, the first being Deep
Impact. To get the question out of the way, I though Armageddon was better
than Deep Impact. Armageddon was easier to sit through than Deep Impact,
there was more action and fewer tries at characterizations,
characterizations that just didn't seem to work for either film.
During a routine day in New York a sudden roar is heard. From the sky comes
flaming objects the size of tennis balls and Volkswagens. These small
meteors are just an early warning for the impending impact of an asteroid
the size of Texas. Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thorton) of NASA is heading up a
project to stop the asteroid from wiping out humanity. Truman's first and
last option is to send up a crew of men to drill into the asteroid and
plant a nuclear bomb to blow the asteroid into two pieces.
The men chosen are the world's best deep core drilling team. They are lead
by Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis), an angry and rough-around-the-edges man.
One of the subplots is about crew member A.J. Frost's (Ben Affleck)
relationship with Stamper's daughter, Grace (Liv Tyler). This creates some
superficial and sometimes lagging conflict between Stamper and Frost.
Armageddon is unlike Bay and Bruckheimer's last teaming, The Rock. The Rock
was a mindless summer film, but had better characters that the audience
could identify with. I found it hard to identify with the three main
characters of Armageddon. Willis's Stamper starts off on the wrong foot and
never really gets back onto the right one until near the end of the film.
Affleck's Frost is too wild and unbelievable to latch onto, though I did
find myself hoping that his character wouldn't perish.
Thorton's Truman was a bit more likeable and I did identify with him a lot
more than Stamper and Frost. In comparison, The Rock had three strong
likeable characters all being portrayed by good actors (Nicolas Cage, Sean
Connery, and Ed Harris).
I was saddened to see that Liv Tyler was pushed back to the
crying-woman-waiting-for-her-men-to-come-home role. Other supporting actors
are not given much to do either. Steve Buscemi, Will Patton, William
Fitchner, and a few others are all wasted. Buscemi does get a few funny
lines and Patton gets to act like a tough guy but it's not enough. 
As for acting, there are quite a few surprises. First off, Bruce Willis
gives one of his best performances in recent memory. He is quite believable
and doesn't have to fall back on his John McClain character. I loved
Willis's performance in Armageddon. If anything, see Armageddon for Willis.
Affleck, who performed well in Good Will Hunting, doesn't do too hot in
Armageddon. His cocky young I'm-always-right act wears thing after a while.
Billy Bob Thorton does an admirable job with his part.
As for Bay, he's not improved much since The Rock. In my review of The Rock
I talked about Bay's obsession with the Shaky-Camera Technique that he
brought over from his music video days. I thought that after a few years,
he'd learn a bit more about the differences between music videos and
feature films. He has, but he has not learned enough. Armageddon uses a
heavy dose of the Shakey-Camera Technique to try to get and keep our
attention. My note for Bay Michael, you have our attention. Stop shaking
the camera and putting in flashy camera angles! Just tell us a good story.
Armageddon runs a bit long, clocking in at two and half-hours. With this
sort of time allotment, there shouldn't be too many loose ends, but there
are. And they are quite noticable. One includes a scene where a few of the
drillers are arrested after a brawl, and straight after that they are
readying for take-off. What happened in jail? How'd they get out of jail?
An early meteor shower tears up New York City, but as quickly as the meteor
shower ends, all news of the event disappear. No one questions what
happened in New York City. Some of the time is also spent telling a hokey
love story the one between Frost and Grace which includes a cheezy scene
using animal crackers.
Don't see Armageddon for real physics. There are loud explosions in space,
there is selective gravity on the asteroid, and there are other physics
anomalies throughout the film. 
I really loved parts of Armageddon. The opening destruction was
spectacular, with meteors punching holes through skyscrapers as if they
were made of Popsicle sticks. The training portion of the film gives a good
look at what astronauts get to do during training. The pool scenes were
amazing.
And the launch of the two shuttles was exciting. With all these complaints
though, I still had a hell of a time. Armageddon might be a dumb movie, but
it's also a movie that works well being superficial. If you don't expect
too much from Armageddon, you'll walk out of the movie theatre happy. I
liked Armageddon and I recommend it.
There are flaws, some significant, but they can be overlooked. Strangely
enough, as hokey as some of the scenes are, I found myself somewhat teary-
eyed at the end of the movie. If you want to see true space heros, rent
Apollo 13. If you want to see real action, rent The Rock. If you want to
see real sci-fi, rent Contact. If you have two hours to burn and want to
see a fun movie in an air-conditioned theatre during matinee, catch
Armageddon.

Author
David Thiel
WARNING: SPOILERS abound in this review. If you don't want to know what 
happens, skip it.
The more I think about this movie, the less I like it. 
"Armageddon" compares very unfavorably to this year's *other* asteroid opus, 
"Deep Impact." That film excelled by using its spectacular special effects 
sequences sparingly, and allowing room for its characters to ponder the 
reality of the End of the World.
There's no time for pondering--or even rational thought--in "Armageddon." The 
film bangs, booms and thunders at warp speed, with herky-jerky editing that at 
times makes it impossible to tell which of Our Heroes has just been impaled by 
a piece of flying space debris.
Just like "Deep Impact," "Armageddon" deals with the discovery of an enormous 
asteroid bearing down on Earth, and involves a mission to land a team of 
astronauts on the rock, plant a nuclear device and blow the space bogey 
off-course. However, whereas "Impact" sent an efficient, well-trained group of 
specialists into orbit, the makers of "Armageddon" thought it would be more 
fun to charge a crew of incompetent oil-drillers with this all-important 
responsibility.
According to the film, Bruce Willis' gang of unruly drillers is supposed to be 
the best of the best, but we never see them in that fashion. They dork about 
with the equipment during training, break a lot of stuff and--the night before 
the Mission to Save All Life on Earth--they get plastered at a strip club and 
are arrested. Most of what they accomplish during the course of the film has 
more to do with blind luck than skill. 
Actually, most of the characters in this film are incompetent in their own 
ways. The Russian space station is a floating deathtrap run by a slightly 
crazed Cold War stereotype. The astronauts attempt to land their shuttles 
on the asteroid like aircraft, despite the lack of a runway--real astronauts 
would make a soft landing ala the moon missions. The President of the U.S. 
decides to detonate the nuke before it's been properly inserted in the core 
of the rock, despite knowing fully well that a surface explosion would have no 
effect at all. The mission commander, when attempting to defuse the bomb, 
doesn't know whether to cut the red wire or the blue wire--absurd, considering 
that the bomb is one of *ours*. And on and on.
While I normally hate it when folks pick on the science in science fiction 
films, this one got my dander up because of its present-day setting and its 
use--for the most part--of existing technology. There are such howlers as a 
pair of space shuttles rounding the moon in what appears to be a matter of 
moments, rather than days. The asteroid itself is a bizarre, spiky landscape 
which bears no resemblence to its real-life counterparts. And if the deadly 
rock is the size of *Texas*, as this one supposedly is, how would a single 
nuke cause sufficient damage? If you drilled an 800-foot hole into Texas soil 
and dropped in a bomb, could you split the Lone Star State in half? Any why 
800 feet? Near the end of the film, there's a big hoo-ha about reaching the 
magic 800 foot depth. Wouldn't 797 feet have sufficed?
No one in the film seems concerned that if one could split an asteroid the 
size of Texas, pieces the size of Dallas/Ft. Worth would likely rain down on 
our heads. And what of the other house-sized rocks that appear to be flying in 
the wake of the big one? Apparently, they're just for show.
The characters aren't much to care about, and indeed, they don't seem to care 
much either. With the end of humanity in the balance, there's never a sense 
that Our Heroes are worried about anything other than their own skins (or the 
prospect of never having to pay taxes again). In the big climax, with just 
seconds left to the Point of No Return, Bruce Willis' character takes time out 
from popping the nuke to make a lengthy, allegedly touching speech--never 
mind the fact that we've seen plenty of examples of sudden death in the 
hostile asteroid environment. What if, mid-speech, a flying chunk of gravel 
took his head clean off? I don't think the population of Earth would be happy 
about that--though at least it'd get him to shut up.
Oh, it's not all bad. There's some funny dialogue, most of it coming from the 
ever-buggy Steve Buscemi. (However, there's a shot angled up inside Buscemi's 
snaggly mouth which gave me the willies.) The destruction scenes--though all 
too obviously computer effects--are nicely realized. 
But when all was said and done, I found myself strangely unmoved--neither 
thrilled by the out-of-this-world heroics nor relieved at the ultimate 
survival of the species. Even a selfless sacrifice in the film's final moments 
didn't affect me in the same way as a similar sequence in "Deep Impact."
The short of it? If you want to see an asteroid movie and haven't seen "Deep 
Impact," do so while it's still on the big screen. "Armageddon"'s effects 
benefit from the theater experience as well, but if you wait for home video, 
you'll at least have a fast-forward button.
David Thiel / Champaign, Illinois                 1:1 
E-mail: d-thiel@uiuc.edu
WWW: http://www.prairienet.org/~drthiel/homepage.html

Author
Fred M. Hung
In an era bereft of such mythical heroes as Sir Arthur's Knights of the
Round Table, Hollywood attempts to fill the void with tales of ordinary
men thrust into extraordinary circumstances. The pragmatic 90s have all
but eliminated the magic of kings and queens.  Thus instead of Lancelot
and Knights, we have  Harry Stamper and oil drillers?  
Armageddon is the latest product from Jerry Bruckheimer who brought us
The Rock, Crimson Tide, Con Air, and Top Gun to name a few.  This time
he is again teamed with Michael Bay, director of The Rock, to bring the
story of a fierce "Global-killer" asteroid on a direct trajectory with
Earth.  Since comparisons to this season's earlier film about asteroids
is inevitable, the simplest way to describe this one would be Deep
Impact on steroids.  
Much of the Bruckheimer trademarks are present, helicopters in
formation, FBI agents in their dark suits, dark jackets, and dark
suburbans, crisp military salutes, motorcades of government vehicles
from the horizon, and stalwart men marching in unison into their finest
hour.  Themes of honor and duty are well represented.  All protagonists
unequivocally volunteer for missions of no return.  American garrison
flags can be seen on rustic homes from small town Kansas to large
hangars in NASA.  Optimists will call Armageddon patriotic, detractors
will call it propaganda.  Whatever the case, none can deny that the film
visually spectacular.  Bay, a former rock video director, is a genius at
creating incredibly slick imagery.  From shepherds in Scotland, to
Muslims in India, parts of Armageddon will rival AT&T and American
Express commercials.  Combine all these elements with an adrenaline
pulsating soundtrack by Aerosmith and others, Bruckheimer has again
brought us the testosterone flick of the year.
Despite the sheen and marketing blitz, Armageddon can not compensate for
its overriding weakness, unidimensional characters.  Bruckheimer and Bay
entertainingly introduce us to men who are mankind's saviors, but never
bother to tell us who they really are.  Bruce Willis, the leader of the
motley crew, never transcends the terse and grimacing tough guy.  Ben
Affleck and Liv Tyler are the star-crossed lovers.  Billy Bob Thorton is
a Sen. Fred Thompson clone.  Will Patton is the loyal sidekick.  Steve
Buscemi again reprises his stereotype as the Shakespearean clown but
this time in space.  Although Armageddon proceeds at a breakneck pace,
the script accords so little for character development.  Consequently,
it is difficult to sympathize, or empathize for that matter, with the
characters' fates.  
No unwritten law exists that states testosterone action and character
development are mutually exclusive.  In fact it was also Bruckheimer and
Bay who gave us Ed Harris' complex and tortured anti-villain in the
Rock.  It is Armageddon's ambitious scope, so many characters, so many
events, that prevented such exposition.  Moments of emotion are too
easily eclipsed by explosions.  
That being said, the film is by no means a failure.  While certainly
transparent and mindless, Armageddon had me saluting cab drivers as I
exited the film.  Personal bias  I live for images of flags waving in
the wind, salutes, self-sacrificing men, and  F-16s flying missing man
formations.  Bruckheimer and Bay are no Chaucer and Homer, nor do they
pretend to be.  Armageddon is simply meant to rally an audience, for 2.5
hours, to surrender belief and cheer for 8 men who are willing to
sacrifice themselves for a greater good.  This isn't poetry, but it's
still a lot of fun.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Michael Bay
Cast:  Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Peter Stormare, Keith David, Steve Buscemi, Owen Wilson, William
Fichtner
Screenplay (story, etc.):  Jonathan Hensleigh, Robert Roy Pool, Tony
Gilroy, Shane Salerno, J.J. Abrams, Paul Attanasio, Ann Biderman, Scott
Rosenberg, Robert Towne
Producers:  Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd, Michael Bay
Runtime:  150 min.
US Distribution:  Touchstone
Rated PG-13:  disaster violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Cinema has been around for about a hundred years now.  It's not my job
to recap this century every time I talk about a new film, but I'd like
to think that I'm beginning to understand the art more as I watch more
films from before my time.  Recently, I've seen the films of Hitchcock,
Capra, Fellini, Godard, Kurosawa, Chaplin, Lang, and many others.  
Those men were talented artists, and their films reflect their genius. 
They are likely to be remembered for . . . well, quite a while.  
I like this film, too.  Yes, it's a disaster-slash-action movie.  True,
its budget is a lot more money than I'll ever see in my lifetime.  And
there's not a doubt in my mind that the only reason it was conceived was
to make a lot of money.  In fact, I bet the producers of Armageddon
would have worked towards a lousy film, had they thought it would've
been more profitable.  I certainly don't care what their intentions
were, because Michael Bay (The Rock) is such a skilled director that I
doubt he'd ever make a film that is difficult to sit through.
Of course, skillful direction doesn't complete the package, but the
rest of Armageddon manages to keep everything together.  The story is
well-thought out (and perfectly paced to provide for an abundance of
action sequences that never feel out of place), the acting is terrific,
the script is sharp, and -- get this -- there are characters.  Yes, you
read that right.  Armageddon actually has characters you can care
about!  If you don't like this film, then you have a problem with the
genre itself:  Armageddon is as good as a film like this can be.
If you've seen Deep Impact, then you know the basic framework for the
story.  It turns out that an asteroid the size of Texas is going to
strike the earth eighteen days from the start of the film.  So, it's up
to the U.S. Government to stop it.  (Why the U.S. is always exclusively
saddled with these problems is never fully investigated.)  Their plan --
to send a group of experienced oil drillers up to the asteroid, drill
down several hundred feet, and detonate a nuclear warhead within.  
The head driller is Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis).  His group of men is
a colorful bunch, including A.J. (Ben Affleck), Chick (Will Patton), and
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi).  There's also an interesting triangle formed
between A.J., Harry, and Grace (Liv Tyler), who is Harry's daughter. 
A.J. and Grace are, of course, romantically intertwined, and dad isn't
too happy with the situation.
It's absurd to wish for a complicated story in an Event Movie or a
Special Effects Movie or whatever it is you'd like to call Armageddon. 
It's not about story -- it's about viscera and action, and
thrills-a-minute, and all that stuff.  It's incidental, really, that the
story is cohesive and even remotely believable, because most people will
be too wrapped up in the explosions to give two seconds' thought to what
actually happens.  But Bay is the one to congratulate in this case, for
he has made a film so entertaining and so visually sharp that I doubt
any director could have done it better.
I think most of the budget went to cameras alone, because Bay films
every action sequence from about thirty or forty different angles.  Take
the spectacular opening scene, for instance, in which a meteor shower
obliterates New York.  A meteor flies out of the sky and crashes into a
building, which sends fireballs erupting into the air and cars spinning
like tops upon other cars.  The action itself might take five seconds in
real life, but Bay edits so quickly that we get the same scene in six
different ways.  I like his quick-edit style, because it's abrasive and
exhausting to watch.  It's also very loud, and obnoxiously noisy at
times.  But it's fun to be obnoxious sometimes.
The special effects in this film put every other 1998 blockbuster to
shame.  Deep Impact, visually, has absolutely nothing on Armageddon, and
to offer a comparison between the quality of this film and Godzilla is
simply laughable.  Special effects are very important in a film like
this:  if they're not good, then the image is not convincing, and the
film doesn't work.  Everything here looks bright and explosive -- from
the little meteors bursting through skyscrapers, all the way to the
shots of the earth through the jutting rocks on the ominously
approaching asteroid.  The effects that don't look totally real are
still a pleasure to behold, and I credit everyone involved for creating
the first blockbuster so nice-looking that it actually qualifies as art.
Of course, all of this would add up to little more than an
above-average light show, if I didn't get the feeling that Bay cares as
much about his characters as he does about his action.  The film is two
and a half hours long, and not all of that is spent submerged in numbing
action.  Much of the film is dedicated to developing the various
characters' subplots.  I won't suggest that these are complex
characters, but their problems are real, and the emotions aren't put
forth in a sentimental and overbearing way.  In fact, there are three or
four scenes here that had me pretty choked up, and that's a lot more
than I can say about Deep Impact, which was banking on the feel-good
parts of its story.
Bruce Willis is terrific, and I'm glad to see him bigger than life
again (recent turns in films like Mercury Rising have been very
disappointing).  Tyler and Affleck are great together, and make a
convincing couple -- all of the scenes between them work on a
comfortable level.  Patton, who is a magnificent actor, thankfully is
not wasted here, and the minor subplot revolving around his ex-wife and
son is very moving.  The comic relief from Buscemi and Peter Stormare
(who plays a crazy Russian astronaut) is nifty, and keeps the film
lively and funny.
I wasn't challenged to think real hard while watching Armageddon, and I
don't mind too much.  But the film doesn't insult my intelligence --
it's pitched perfectly to entertain, which is what all it really wants
to do.  It's not mindless and escapist, but well-crafted cinema.  It
might have been created for the wrong reasons, but men like Michael Bay
have my respect for showing me that they are interested in making
something good, in spite of the producers and the budget.  I'm not
saying that films like this are risky moves.  What I am saying is that
Armageddon is a big, loud, expensive motion picture that reminds me that
art often comes in the strangest of forms.  

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Michael Bay
Writers: Jonathan Hensleigh, Robert Roy Pool, Tony Gilroy, Shane Salerno,
J.J. Abrams (story by Jonathan Hensleigh and Robert Roy Pool, and
uncredited extra writing by Paul Attansio, Ann Biderman, Scott Rosenberg,
and Robert Towne)
Starring: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Steve Buscemi, William Fichtner, Peter Stormare, Owen Wilson, Keith
David, Jessica Steen, Grace Zabriskie, Udo Kier, Laurence Tierney, Anthony
Guidera, Charlton Heston
"Armageddon" is probably the cinematic equivalent of the 1976 Who concert
where the band played at record-breaking and ear-shattering decibels,
leaving behind a record that most rock bands were and still are afraid to
break.  "Armageddon" is close up there, with so many loud explosions that
drummer Keith Moon would be impressed if he were still around today, and in
a way is pretty much as over-the-top as that concert probably was. 
"Armageddon" is as flashy and glossy as any film comes, and it does pretty
much anything it can to make us like it, including giving us characters we
just plain like because they're being portrayed by good actors, bringing us
a love story, and providing us with so much action that after awhile all of
this becomes pretty numbing.  Kinda like the Who concert probably was.  I'm
sure everyone heard the first hour or so, but after that only heard
distortion and a couple explosions from Keith Moon's drum set.  Same with
this movie.
"Armageddon" is the second comet/asteroid-colliding-with-earth film we've
had in a two month period, following the "On the Beach"-wannabe "Deep
Impact."  While that one featured people trying to cope with the
possibility of the end of the world, this one is a little more aggressive. 
Both feature a group of miners and astronauts attempting to blow the
comet/asteroid up, but this one dwells prominently on them, and instead of
just one long sequence of them working and failing like in "Deep Impact,"
this one features one really, really, really long action sequence where
everything goes wrong that could go wrong and these guys keep going like an
Energizer bunny on uppers.
It's an event movie, which means it's pretty much a formula film where what
worked in the past crops up again.  This one is a disaster film but without
much of the drama of the people actually living on earth waiting for
potential extinction, and more on the "drama" of the people working to
destroy it.  Of course, you've all seen the previews: an asteroid is
heading towards earth, and it's up to Bruce Willis to destroy it.  Willis,
the token gruff action boy of late, plays a cynical miner chosen to destroy
the asteroid by the head of NASA, Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton, cashing
in on "Sling Blade," I see), along with a couple of his own men and some
other astronauts.  While "Deep Impact" took place over about a year or so,
this film puts itself in a corner immeadiately: we have about 16 days
(!!!).
The first hour of the film is easily the best.  We're introduced to the
situation, given some ways of fixing it, and then introduced to the
characters who will be going up and staying down.  The film establishes
Willis's daugher, Grace (Liv Tyler - is Bruce REALLY that old?), as the
martyr as her father AND her fiance, the buff A.J. Frost (Ben Affleck...oh,
I mean, OSCAR WINNER Ben Affleck, sorry), are both going up to space to do
battle with the large rock, setting up the film for some real heart on
Tyler's part, and giving the film a chance to cash in on the fact that
Liv's father is none other than Stephen Tyler of Aerosmith (yuck).  The
second half of the film is a rollar coaster ride of problem after problem
after problem etc etc etc, all making sure that after the film has
completed, you're totally drained.  And you are, trust me.
It's obvious by the way it was advertised as well as by simply looking at
it that this film is not at all concerned with being intelligent,
thoughtful, or even, in all reality, entertaining.  It's meant to make
money, and has been designed so much like that that an entire article in
this month's Premiere magazine shows the many steps it took to make this as
formulaic and therefore profitable as possible.  And yes, it's better than
other formula event pictures (need I mention the crapfest that was
"Godzilla?"), but it still has several problems, so many that if I were to
mention all of them I'd just be being picky.  But some are just too
unmentionable, such as the lackluster second half in comparison with an
entertaining first half, too many cheap "human" moments, and worst of all,
what has to be a quarter-assed love story that is so underdeveloped that
it's distracting every time it crops up.  Does A.J. even realize Grace
exists for half of the movie?  Why else would he talk about how he's coming
back and then later on risk his life for sheer cockiness?  I understand
that they felt they needed a romance angle in this film, what after
"Titanic."  But they really needed to put a little more umph into it, or at
least just a bit of umph.
So why am I recommending this film?  Why did I enjoy a film that has
numerous plot holes, too many explosions, and the IQ of a house plant? 
Because most of these bad qualities are used luckily to make for a really
entertaining experience.  I enjoyed the whole gung ho-ness of it all, the
way that it took the time to set up its characters in a similar way to that
testosterone-classic, "The Dirty Dozen"...then sends them on their way to a
suicide mission.  They're not deep characters, in fact they're pretty much
characateurs not characters, but the film actually makes us care about them
anyway, not the least by casting a bunch of good actors who've made it in
the indie/art house film world, not only Thornton, Affleck, and Tyler (and,
in some respects, Willis), but also Owen Wilson (who was brilliant in
"Bottle Rocket"), Peter Stormare ("Fargo"), and Steve Buscemi (pick a
film), all who are allowed to overact to sheer delight.
Willis, in fact, hasn't been this good in awhile.  His past few
performances, even in "The Fifth Element," have seemed to be on autopilot,
more or less, but here he brings us a sorta older version of his beloved
John McClane character.  Willis is a good comic actor when he wants to be,
and here he's back as his old self, making wise-cracks and generally
winning over the audience just like he used to.  Of course, he's upstaged
by Buscemi (can we just give this guy an Oscar already...or at the very
least a Lifetime Achievement Award?), who plays the resident comic relief
and still stays fresh even when the second half of the film finds him
diagnosed with "space dimentia" (okay...).
"Armageddon" was directed by Michael Bay, who directed "Bad Boys" and the
wonderfully entertaining "The Rock," a film that, like this, doesn't take
itself totally seriously (sometimes this does, but then it pulls itself
right out of the ditch it creates), and features the infamous use of
hyper-hyper-editing.  No one shot lasts more than 5 seconds, creating a
glossy-as-hell film that could easily be denounced as "crap on a stick,"
but for some reason works.  Maybe it's because the characters are likable
enough that when they're sent out to be martyrs we worry about whether or
not they're coming back at all, and for some reason not as worried about
the people on earth (save for Thornton and Tyler...and maybe that stripper
that Buscemi meets...). And also because Bay's MTV-style direction creates
an experience that is numbing yet still enjoyable and even a little
admirable.  Look at his crash-on-the-asteroid scene: have you seen this
much confusion and general fright-of-the-unknown since "Aliens?" 
"Armageddon" prides itself in being glossy but has no real delusions about
what it is and what it isn't, and while this isn't totally commendable,
it's still mildly distracting for 2 1/2 hours, and admittingly very
entertaining, which is something which is pretty good for us every now and
then.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Sridhar Prasad
    WHEW!  Summer blockbusters don't get much bigger than ARMAGEDDON, a 
2 hour 30 minute ride through outer space.  You think Godzilla was big?  
Or Deep Impact?  Forget a creature as big as the Empire State Building, 
forget a comet the size of NYC, ARMAGEDDON's got a big asteroid the size 
of Texas hurtling its way here within two weeks.  In that time, the US 
government recruits, trains, and launches the world's best oil-rig 
drillers to save the planet?
    Farfetched?  ARMAGEDDON makes the THE X-FILES seem like a docudrama. 
 But that's not the point.  Michael Bay and Jerry Bruckheimer are in the 
business of making classic popcorn movies, movies that are completely 
enjoyable and forgettable.  In that sense, they succeed.  There isn't 
much of a plot, simply because Tyler and Affleck don't carry the same 
kind of chemistry needed to produce a decent subplot.  Willis is as 
macho as ever as Harry Stamper, the leader of this rag-tag crew that's 
going to save the planet.  The movie flows with testosterone, and is 
filled with macho, big-bang explosions and meteors clobbering the earth. 
    While it's fun, and while the movie is rapid, there's one huge 
problem: overkill.  Bay and Bruckheimer want to top everything.  
Literally.  So they constructed a movie almost 3 hours long filled with 
explosions.  The one problem is overkill.  Bay and Bruckheimer fail to 
stop: they just keep on going, making the film one endless explosion 
after another.  The plot's predictable, and the movie starts to lose 
steam in the middle.  During the space sequences, bad lighting mixed 
with Bay's frenetic editing makes about a good 30 minutes of the movie 
almost incoherent, with running cameras on blurred images.  Explosion 
after explosion rock the movie, as nothing goes right for our fearless 
warriors.  Bay and Bruckheimer failed to ease up on the craziness, 
expecting the audience to get emotionally attached, so that they would 
feel the highs and lows. 
    That's not easy to do with the poor characterization.  The only fun 
from this crew comes from Affleck and Buscemi, who have the best lines 
in the movie.  Still, there's no denying ARMAGEDDON isn't fun.  It has 
its moments, and there's a lot to like in this film.  It's not smart 
entertainment, it relies on sheer overpowering to carry its viewers, and 
there are a lot of really neat sequences.  You just leave with a feeling 
of disappointment, because there's TOO much to like.  The action is 
brain-numbing, so that the last hour goes by in a blur.  It's an 
enjoyable ride, but Bay, who tames his frenetic touch in the beginning, 
restarts it again at the end, causing the film to be a big collage of 
fast-paced images.  The film is just too long, and too big for its own 
good.  It's a fun ride, but in the end, it's just too big.  There's too 
much in this film to be truly effective.  If about a half-hour was cut 
from this film, it would be a lot easier to take.
    Overall, although an enjoyable blockbuster that's ten times better 
than Godzilla, ARMAGEDDON just isn't good enough.  THE X-FILES and THE 
TRUMAN SHOW were better films, and more enjoyable.  Maybe it's because 
they were shorter?

Author
Matthew Dalton
 Right in the midst of Deep Impact comes Armageddon: a clunker of a movie about
an asteroid the size of Texas on a collision course with earth.
 The first 10 minutes of this film are pretty entertaining, and, downright
spectacular. A comet shower (not detected by NASA) rains on an American
spaceship and blows the thing up good before it proceeds to New York City. 
 Of course, soon after, producer Jerry Bruckheimer digs into stupidity with
holes in the script big enough to drive a comet the size of Texas through.
 NASA wants to keep the disaster under wraps, and does so. How the hell can you
keep the news of NYC in ruins a matter of top-secret information? Easy. Get
director Michael Bay to scope out more digital effects than one can count, and
you lose all sight of reality.
 NASA, soon after the apocalyptic mess, finds out about said asteroid and hires
the world's best oil driller (Bruce Willis, in another Bruce Willis role) to
plant nuclear bombs on the surface of the asteroid in hopes of splitting the
thing in two.
 Willis and his wise-ass crew (including Ben Affleck and Steve Buscemi, doing
his Con Air role all over again) go into space, where, lo, more special effects
and over-the-top acting reached heights of me ripping out my eyeballs.
 Deep Impact was so real and scary that another comet flick the same year
seemed uncanny, like Volcano when it trailed Dante's Peak in 1997 (I prefered
Peak over Volcano). Impact had characters worth caring for. Armageddon has
zero. The script is so small and lame-brained, that, when in doubt, the
characters ask each other "Are we gonna make it?"
 Like Con Air, and The Rock, Armageddon is an FX-ridden, unfun, unfunny, flashy
film that is a true disaster. Don't forget to check your emergancy exits in the
theater before viewing this garbage.
-Matthew Dalton is a critic for the Cinemascope Limited Inc. Weekly-

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
If I were to plot a graph of year against movie-plot-ridiculity for =
Hollywood movies, you'll probably see a line with constant gradient. =
Now, if I were to plot that same graph for the movies that the Michael =
Bay/Jerry Bruckheimer has made over the last 4 years, that line would be =
exponential in growth. The team started out with the Will Smith vehicle =
BAD BOYS which was no more than a 2hr long action-music-video, =
nevertheless entertaining. Then came THE ROCK, where audiences flocked =
to see NICHOLAS CAGE team up with SEAN CONNERY against some terrorizing =
general fighting over some stupid cause. CON-AIR was ridiculousy dumb in =
its premise but it did have fun moments, and who can forget the nursery =
rhyme sang by that psycho killer played by STEVE BUSCEMI. While these =
movies worked because there was something better to cover-up the dirt, =
ARMAGEDDON does not.
Very much like DEEP IMPACT, a meteor is heading towards Earth and they =
didn't realize it until 18 days from impact. DEEP IMPACT settled with =
the modest meteor size as large as the city of New York but ARMAGEDDON =
just had to be BIGGER....well about the size of Texas (that kinda meteor =
whould probably knock Earth out of its orbit!). The panic of this =
sighting spurs the idea of landing people on the meteor, drill it then =
nuke it (sounds familiar) and who better to do such a job than Harry =
Stamper  (Bruce Willis), your very own oil-driller extraordinaire and =
his team of macho-misfits, nursing the tagline `there ain't nothin' on =
this planet that Harry can't drill!'. In that 18 days, Harry's group was =
split into 2 teams, trained for deep-space flight and finally blasted =
into space in with special drilling vehicles on 2 new space shuttles.
The main relationship drama of ARMAGEDDON is formed within the =
relationship of Harry, A.J. and Grace. To give you an idea, A.J. works =
for Harry, and loves Grace, Harry's daughter.  The problem is, Harry =
hates to see his daughter hanging around some scruffy grunt like himself =
for the rest of her life. So while A.J. and Harry struts it out, Grace =
is place in a position where she is unable to take sides, so she remains =
seated in the NASA control tower, crying over both of them in about 80% =
of the movie.
The human elements this movie tries to inject proves to be nothing more =
than just an excuse for more slow-mo's and gold-tinted photography. The =
anguish of the world is potrayed with scenes of people praying, running =
for their lives or just sitting still staring at the sky, sounds fine =
right? I know, but it looks too out of place on screen, too staged. If =
you were to ask yourself, `What's the difference between ARMAGEDDON and =
a R&B music video?" you'd probably just said `The music.". Not =
surprising since Michael Bay is a child of that industry and has =
actually managed to transpose his MTV skills to screen successfully. His =
foray into ARMAGEDDON just proves that he doesn't when to stop.
Well there's really nothing much to sum up here. The =
Stock-Aitken-Waterman of Hollywood Movies have projected their art-form =
into ridiculity, beyond the plane believability, where people still =
accept even if they didn't believe. DEEP IMPACT was ridiculous in most =
aspects and I believe the makers know this. The thing is, they decided =
to shroud myth and fantasy with a purely believable human tale of =
suffering and coming in terms with ones problems, which ultimately =
brought it above the ashes which it had initially put itself in. =
ARMAGEDDON, is an overcrowded, loud, messy, preposterously manipulative =
waste of money and deserves to remain in that same pile of ash..=20
If you have planned to watched this over DEEP IMPACT because of Liv =
Tyler, Bruce Willis or the tagline "From the makers of `THE ROCK'!!". =
Please catch DEEP IMPACT before it finishes its run, it may be the only =
meteor worth watching in long-long time. If you have to see it, please =
bring ear-plugs and some aspirins (for the vertigo). Expect ARMAGEDDON =
LD's to retail at S$19.90 at CarreFour come release time. Gee......even =
that's not worth it!

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **1/2 (out of 4 = okay/average)
1998, PG-13, 150 minutes [2 hours, 30 minutes]
starring: Bruce Willis (Harry Stamper), Ben Affleck (A.J. Frost), Billy Bob
Thorton (Dan Truman), Liv Tyler (Grace Stamper); written by Jonathan
Hensleigh, Robert Roy Pool, Tony Gilroy, Shane Salerno, J.J. Abrams; produced
by Michael Bay, Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd; directed by Michael Bay.
Seen July 4, 1998 at 8:15 p.m. at Crossgates Cinema 18 (Albany, NY), theater
#1, by myself using Hoyt's cinema cash. [Theater rating: ****: excellent,
sound, picture, and seats]
        The "event movie" industry is quickly becoming one of the most ruthless forms
of competition in the world, rivaling even the Cold War at its peak. Every
major Hollywood studio is out to one-up the other by spending as much money as
possible with as little effort at intelligence as possible. It's practically a
mathematical formula and "Armageddon" culminates this philosophy in nearly
every frame of film. It's everything a mega blockbuster should be - full of
action, adventure, cliffhangers, romance, comedy, and outstanding special
effects, as to cram in everything possible and yet still turns out to be
hollow.
        Getting an audience's attention right from the beginning plays a major role
in how today's films work. We want to have something exciting to watch, not a
slow build-up of a story (God forbid!), and this film plays right into the
mainstream's hands. The opening sequence uses mystery, comedy, and action
simultaneously to give a sneak preview of the level of the in-your-face energy
the film has. Technically, it serves no purpose other than to showcase the
special effects and lay the basic structure for the film's simple plot, but
it's also symbolic of the way in which the film works. We're introduced to
some generic characters who are quickly thrown into a fantastic situation that
could only happen in a movie, and somehow comedy and suspense come into play.
Sure it's fun to watch at the time, but in retrospect, it's almost insulting
to realize how little thought was put into something so extraordinary.
        After a sensational teaser, the film switches gears a bit to concentrate on
an attempt at backstory. The entire first act flies by as all the major
characters and plot devices are unfolded. An asteroid the size of Texas is
headed for Earth, and its fragments alone have done more damage than most wars
might. This is a simple  conflict and surprisingly enough, allows for many
sub-plots to push and pull the characters and the story in general. Lots of
scientific and military jargon is spat out at a lightning-fast pace to create
for a shroud of plausibility. Hollywood doesn't know the meaning of "science
fiction" and the way in which the fantastic is justified is more interesting
than the justification itself. For example, the imagery of the government's
space and military programs is captivating because it's so advanced in a
modern way (the barrage of TV screens, the Internet, cellular phones, and
every other form of hip, instant communication).
        In fact, the film deserves credit for its initial sense of realism, had it
stuck with it throughout, it might have worked as a believable account of
man's greatest victory over nature. But this isn't a philosophical picture by
any means, it's supposed to be a thrill ride and it does deliver on that
promise. The film's hook is truly its biggest flaw, but if the Armageddon is
truly impending, we're going to have to make sure it's countered by the most
fun-to-watch characters, not ones that might actually be qualified. 
        Dan Truman (Thorton), one of the execs at NASA and advisor to the president
realizes in order to stop the asteroid it must be blown up from within, which
would require the best drillers in the world. Of course those people would
also have to be the most interesting, diverse group of characters in the
world, whom we meet early on. Bruce Willis stars as Harry Stamper, a third
generation oil driller with just the right amount of muscle, charm, and wit a
character like this would have. He's just fired his right-hand man A.J.
(Affleck) for sleeping with his daughter Grace (Tyler), and is approached by
the Pentagon to lead a team to the asteroid to drill it and blow it up. Of
course, with as much money, power, and intellect the government has, they've
stolen Stamper's idea for a revolutionary drill and can't figure out how to
make it work. Long story short, Stamper agrees to help them out, but only if
his crew come along to help. Guess what kind of people make up Stamper's crew?
        This movie comes to us by some of the people behind "Aliens," "The Rock," and
"Con Air," and considering those films, it's no surprise the characters are of
the intelligence-light, brawn and rowdiness-heavy sort. They're the last
people that should be in charge of saving the world, but that makes them
perfect characters for a film like this. They exist for comic relief and an
attempt at humanism, and for the most part it works, but the reasoning behind
it is still clear as day. They're cardboard cut-outs, which most films like
this use, but why there's not enough satire and sense of lightheartedness to
not take them seriously. The romantic sub-plot between A.J. and Grace is
milked for all its worth and serves mostly as an excuse to photograph Tyler's
face at every dramatic angle (and situation) possible, while the dialogue
between her and Affleck is quite melodramatic. I'm not even going to get into
the supporting characters' personal lives.
        The first hour of the film has a breezy, but shifty tone to it. One minute
the impending doom is played for intensity, the next minute the interaction
between Stamper and his crew is played for laughs, and then the romance
between A.J. and Grace is played for sap. All of it is watchable and the
intense aspects succeed for the most part, but the pacing a bit slow. Once the
crew begins training and finally embarks upon their mission is when things
really begin to heat up, which is the primary reason the film exists.
        Action done correctly can be one of the most sensational experiences, and the
filmmakers know how to manipulate the audience in this respect. The direction
balances the special effects with the events taking place, making for genuine
suspense and excitement. The art and production design give the settings a
real sense of depth, space, and detail which helps counter some of the wacky
plotlines. The hyper editing works with the direction to give the film a raw
intensity, but often induces vertigo and seems like a cop-out for lack of
script ideas. 
        There's no lack of action at all here, but what prevents the film from taking
advantage of its energy is the screenplay itself. Cliffhangers and other major
conflicts  constantly crop up and compound upon each other, but once they
start happening back-to-back (about every two minutes), the level of
predictably skyrockets. At nine screenwriters (five credited, four
uncredited), the film is clearly over-written which might have been saved had
20 or 30 minutes of the middle and last acts been cut. There's just too much
action without reaction here. As the film nears its end it's easy to forgot
what the point of the original mission was.
        Still, "Armageddon" is not without its accolades. The non-stop action is
never boring and the effects are mind-blowing, which makes it work at least as
eye candy, but as tasty as candy is, it's not very good for you.


Author
Kelly A Hayes
Directed by Michael Bay. Written by Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams.
Running time: 150 minutes. Classified PG-13 (for sci-fi disaster action,
sensuality and brief moments of vulgar language). 
    If space is the final frontier, I wouldn't mind Armageddon being Jerry
Bruckheimer's final frontier into the final frontier, or for that
matter anywhere into the skies above. Long before falling asteroids and
con men raising all hell in a cargo plane, there was a young buck named
Maverick who had a knack for going mach-10. With a hot, charismatic lead,
a near perfect supporting cast, and a good enough balance of both
spectacle and substance, Top Gun achieved top flight status as a
box-office blast, ground-breaking in the soon-to-be commonplace (but
certainly not cost-effective) action genre.   
    Since those days, WAY back in the 80s, Bruckheimer's films have lost
some of the luster as action films with both spectacle and substance.
Perhaps the loss of Simpson is too obvious, certainly too easy of an
answer. This is not to say that the newest Bruckheimer films have not held
their own in the area of special effects and spectacle, these films will
always have that. But the substance is gone, or at least deteriorating
from what once was. The substance I'm talking about here relates to
everything that makes a story great, making it in all respects a story
worth making into a film. And I'd submit that without this blanket term
called substance, Bruckheimer's airborne projects will do nothing more
than shoot up to the stars and quickly fizzle down in the eyes of many
viewers. 
    Of course YOU will love it, and this is directed to those who go to
the movies sheerly for the spectacle, and that's fine. These films will
always have that appeal. Like many, I am often conflicted in my opinions
about a movie such as Armageddon. I enjoy the action. But imagine if
Bruckheimer and Michael Bay got together to make Apollo 13 - add a big
rock and you pretty much have Armageddon. Any further plot description
really isn't necessary because the plot is so thin that we can figure it
out from the previews and promos.       
    Armageddon does have the charismatic lead in Bruce Willis who does an
admirable, even likable and believable role as Harry S. Stamper, the
leader of the mining crew sent up to save the world. Armageddon also has
a near perfect supporting cast in Will Patton, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler,
Steve Buscemi, and Billy Bob Thornton. In fact, all of these actors do
such a good job, one could conclude that with a great cast alone, you
could almost have a good movie. Thornton as Dan Truman, head of Mission
Control, does an especially good job of making the entire fagade seem
believable and it is really from his character and Liv Tyler's character
as Stamper's daughter that we feel any real, believable sense of urgency.
They are our only real emotional contacts throughout the ordeal. 
    Interestingly, the only other sentiment in the film (besides the
charming yet thin love story between Tyler and Affleck) is that of
patriotism, which is quite strong. Of course, we see no real hints at the
deeper questions of armageddon, the absolute repercussions of such an
ordeal on our country or the world at large. Rather, we get sound bytes
of Islamic prayer, montage of a few cultures across the globe looking
mildly perturbed. But it all works in this sense: there is so much
action, we don't worry about repercussions, because, after all, Bruce
Willis et all will save the world, they must, they are American heroes.
And they don't disappoint. The movie as a whole, however...
    Unlike a film like Top Gun, however, what's missing, among other
things, is context. When we meet Maverick, he's just saved a fellow pilot
who's lost it, mentally unable just as Maverick himself will be later in
the film after Goose's death. Tom Skerritt's character, playing a
superior and a friend of Maverick's deceased father, provides more
context. In Top Gun, we have enough context from the characters' lives
that we feel like we know these people and more importantly, we feel like
we know them enough to care about them.
    Granted, there is some good, emotional interaction within the love
triangle of the Willis, Affleck, and Tyler characters, but those three
cannot carry the film, especially when they must compete with the action
and fx sequences that really overplay the story and characters. So much
action that it is in actuality often illegible. In space, things can get
pretty dicey, that much is clear. But that doesn't excuse the screen time
that's wasted showing us how things go wrong over and over again in the
same way: a character yells, "It's gonna blow," followed by flying debris
and bodies flying and bouncing around. It gets tired, and so much is
flying around so frequently it's difficult to even follow. 
    Perhaps the biggest dilemma with a film like Armageddon is asking
yourself if you should spend big money to see this in the theater or wait
to rent it and see it on the small screen? Often we base this decision on
the merits of the movie: did it get two thumbs up? Did Uncle Cecil like
it? But in the case of Armageddon and every mega-fx-action blockbuster
like it, the dilemma is further complicated by the fact that no matter how
bad this film may be, you can bet it's gonna be even worse on TV. The
effects, the action, the quick-cutting, the SOUNDS, they will all be quite
worthless on the tube. See it in the theater or don't see it at all, and
certainly don't think that this is a movie event of the summer that you
must see. Two genres that, for full effect, really require a large screen
are horror and science fiction. This is definitely science fiction, with
more fiction than science. But then do we expect a film titled ARMAGEDDON
to be Oscar material? I don't think so...  
On the Bruckheimer scale, while not nearly as good as The Rock,        
I actually preferred this to Con Air, which is very similar, but worse and
could have been called, "Men Are From Mars, Women Are From- WAIT, There
Are No Women".

Author
Brian Takeshita
Naturally, there are a lot of expectations surrounding a film starring
Bruce Willis, directed by Michael Bay, and produced by Gale Anne Hurd
and Jerry Bruckheimer, because it has "summer action blockbuster"
written all over it.  ARMAGEDDON is the second movie this year to
feature a plot involving a big rock hurtling through space to destroy
the earth, and a plan to land on the rock, drill into it, and blow it
up with nuclear weapons before it hits.  The first film, DEEP IMPACT,
was disappointing enough that expectations for ARMAGEDDON have run
even higher.
We start out when NASA, under the direction of Dan Truman (Billy Bob
Thornton), discovers an asteroid the size of Texas which will impact
the earth in only 16 days.  Briefing the president, Truman explains
that the asteroid is what they call a "planet killer" which would
destroy all life; not even bacteria would survive.  To divert the
oncoming menace, NASA decides to send a bunch of oil drillers, led by
Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis), into space to blow the asteroid into two
pieces.  Scientists calculate the pieces would miss the planet, and
life could continue.
Stamper's oil drillers are not your average astronaut material, since
they are your average movie stereotype roughnecks.  Not much
discipline, trouble with the law, that sort of thing, and ARMAGEDDON
plays the "fish out of water" angle like you would expect.  There are
the scenes where they go through testing, training, and meet the
"real" astronauts.  It's all pretty amusing, especially a sequence
showing how each of them react to one of those Rorschach ink blot
tests.  They don't disappoint in delivery of humorous quips, either.
When they finally blast off, one of them says how incredible it is,
and another replies, "And this is only the beginning of space.  We
haven't even gotten into OUTER space yet!"  The problem is, it's not
very original.  The group reminded me somewhat of the band of veterans
Gene Hackman assembles in UNCOMMON VALOR.  A few of the cast members
even look like them.
Willis has played the tough guy for a long time now, so this role
isn't too much of a stretch for him.  The hardest part in playing
Stamper is trying to keep a Texas accent, which seems to move in and
out of Willis's vocal range.  A little different, though, is that
Stamper is the father of a full grown daughter, Grace (Liv Tyler), who
is love with A.J. Frost (Ben Affleck), one of the best drillers on the
team.  This gives Willis a lot of "I'm your father"-type lines, in
addition to the "I'm out here to save the world" lines.
I'm sure the scenes Affleck shares with Tyler will be appealing to
most women.  He's a handsome guy, and the movie does a lot to show him
doing those romantic things women love, like taking Grace on a picnic
in the middle of nowhere, and singing to her in front of a volume of
people.  Guys will probably think he's a schmuck.  Combined with his
action sequences, Affleck proves himself a versatile actor, but there
just isn't enough to his character to make him really likable.  If he
were to disappear three-quarters of the way through the movie, he
probably wouldn't be missed.
Whereas Affleck may be versatile, Liv Tyler has only two faces:  Pouty
and pensive.  She's nice on the eyes, but her acting is relatively
flat, and that look like she's going to bite her lip anytime now gets
old real fast.  There's also a couple of scenes where she just wigs
out, and I can't characterize them as anything less than annoying.
Perhaps the best performance is given by Billy Bob Thornton, whose
acting is solid.  The scriptwriters also deserve credit for making
Truman a character with depth, considering it could have easily been a
very thankless role.
The special effects work about half the time.  When the drilling crew
takes off in two newly designed space shuttles, the launch sequence is
very gripping.  Just getting it to look like there is a second
launchpad at Kennedy Space Center was good enough for me, but the
power and dazzle of the boosters igniting has to be seen.  Scenes
where much smaller asteroid fragments strike the earth also look
extremely realistic.  Anything involving the asteroid, however, is
throwaway.  It's too dark, vague, cluttered, and amorphous, and since
we don't have any concept of scale, it ends up being relatively
unimpressive.  When the biggest menace in your summer action
blockbuster looks like something the cat coughed up, that's bad.
While I wouldn't say the action is non-stop, Bay keeps the movie going
at a good pace and continuously gives us something to look at, be it
the asteroid, the space shuttles, or Liv Tyler.  Unfortunately, the
action itself is often undermined by not being able to fully see
what's going on in a shot (most of the scenes on the asteroid are in
darkness), or by the ambiguity of why something is supposed to be
dangerous.  "Drilling is an art form," a character says.  Apparently,
like art, it is not easily explained.  Half the time I didn't know
what was going on, and therefore didn't know why the drill started
shaking, and therefore didn't know why everyone was getting so
excited.  When the action in you summer action blockbuster is too
confusing, that's bad.
Many parts of ARMAGEDDON were apparently photographed to produce what
I call "The Bruckheimer Look".  Graduated filters are used to make the
skies more blue, or bluish-purple, while everything under it is shaded
with similar enhancing colors.  You see it in just about all the
Bruckheimer-produced films, like TOP GUN and THE ROCK.  There are also
a lot of scenes meant to show the beauty and variations of humanity:
Kids running, old men looking out of windows, Hindu masses bowing in
the courtyard of a temple - all in slow motion.  It looks a lot like a
credit card or soft drink commercial, or perhaps a music video.  Not
surprisingly, Michael Bay directed a lot of both of those before
coming to film.  My suggestion:  Learn new techniques.  When your
summer action blockbuster looks like a commercial, that's bad.
Action movies are usually notorious for their lack of logic, and this
film is no exception.  Our heroes have to drill only 800 feet so a
nuclear warhead can split the Texas-sized asteroid in two?  I don't
think the physics work out.  How convenient is it, that NASA just
happens to have two (not one, but two) secret prototype space shuttles
ready just in time?  Why were they secret, anyway?  When the main
characters go into space, they take large auto-cannons with them.
Just whom, may I ask, are they expecting to use them on?
Okay, the 16 days to impact thing?  I have to give them credit for
this one.  When asked why they didn't detect the asteroid sooner,
NASA's response is that the pathetic funding for astromonitoring is
only enough to cover about three percent of space.  Take that,
balanced budget.
Although the film isn't as engaging as expected, we are thrown a
couple of treats.  One of the mission control technicians Truman
depends upon to make a key transmission is named Vossler.  The radio
technician aboard the USS Alabama in CRIMSON TIDE, another movie
produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, was also named Vossler.  One of the
astronauts on Stamper's shuttle is named Gruber.  The villains in two
of the DIE HARD movies, starring Bruce Willis, were also named Gruber.
You've got to watch for these things, folks.  They happen a lot more
often than you think.
Oh, one more:  The two main characters are named Harry S. Stamper, and
Dan Truman.  Harry S. and Truman.  Neat, huh?

Author
James Sanford
ARMAGEDDON
Directed by Michael Bay
A case could probably be made that Jerry Bruckheimer and the late
Don Simpson are the two men most responsible for the sorry state of the
American movie blockbuster. Why was "Godzilla" so godawful? Why did "Speed
2" crash and burn last year? Why did 99 percent of the people who saw it
despise "Batman & Robin"?
It all goes back to a little movie called "Flashdance."
Back in 1983, then-fledgling producers Simpson and Bruckheimer took
what was essentially a wisp of an idea -- blue-collar girl dreams of
becoming a ballerina -- gussied it up with eye-scorching visuals, set it to
a pulsating soundtrack, chopped it together to look like the longest,
sexiest MTV clip ever and made a film that became an overnight phenomenon.
Cashing in on the rah-rah jingoism of the Reagan era, the duo put together
fighter jets, Tom Cruise and a handful of power-ballads and created "Top
Gun," a sort of "Flashdance Goes To War."
The immense success of these pictures did not go unnoticed by the
rest of the film industry, and soon the prevailing attitude in Hollywood
seemed to be, "Who cares about characters, plot or dialogue? Just make it
look really hot!". Though Simpson and Bruckheimer's magic formula finally
lost its fizzle when Cruise's "Days of Thunder" (jokingly referred to by
many as "Top Car") quickly ran out of gas at the box-office in 1990, by then
the damage was already done: Years of seeing films that emphasized style
over substance had shaped the minds and tastes of a new generation of
would-be filmmakers who have devoutly followed The Gospel According To
Simpson And Bruckheimer. These are the folks who churn out movies like
"Batman & Robin," "Speed 2" and "Godzilla," expensive packages that look
sensational but are really just concepts in search of development.
Michael Bay is one such young director. Trained in the arena of
music videos, where no shot can last more than three seconds and chaos is
something to achieve rather than avoid, Bay proved in his first features
"Bad Boys" and "The Rock" that even though he can't actually tell a story,
he can make whatever's going on look plenty exciting. Shoot the people we
should admire from low angles, go into slow-motion every time something
important is about to take place, make sure everybody sweats picturesquely,
and you're halfway home.
Bay's hyperactive style gets a workout in the Bruckheimer-produced
"Armageddon," a breathless and utterly brainless the-sky-is-falling epic
that's so cold and contrived it makes the similarly themed and much more
sentimental "Deep Impact" look like "Schindler's List" by comparison. What
matters most to Bay and the "Armageddon" screenwriters is destruction
instead of drama and pyrotechnics, not people. Its almost total incoherence
makes "Armageddon" a kind of breakthrough: This may be the first movie
that's actually just a 150-minute trailer for itself.
The special effects are generally impressive, particularly an
opening attack on New York by a swarm of blazing meteorites and an
otherworldly storm in the last half-hour. In between those exciting segments
is a plot any seven-year-old could spot the holes in, yet "Armageddon" wears
its stupidity as a badge of honor, like the loud-mouthed class moron who
tries to make intelligent classmates feel ashamed of their good grades. It
can't be a coincidence that every character in the movie with a college
education turns out to be ineffectual or prissy and that the burden of
saving the world falls on the brawny shoulders of a bunch of hard-livin'
roughnecks who don't let silly things like rules and regulations hold them
back. Perhaps the biggest shock in "Armageddon" comes when these former oil
drillers submit their list of demands to be met in exchange for going into
space to stop the Texas-size asteroid that's about to terminate all life on
Earth: Although they ask never to have to pay taxes again and to get all
their parking tickets fixed, the boys forget to insist the "Porky's" trilogy
be brought along as the in-flight entertainment.
The leader of the mission is maverick drilling legend Harry S.
Stamper, played by Bruce Willis as a man with all the imagination and
passion of a metronome. For some reason, as Willis' paychecks have grown
substantially larger over the years, his performances have become less and
less interesting. Look back at a "Moonlighting" repeat or the original "Die
Hard" and you'll see an actor who wanted to entertain people. Look at
"Armageddon" and you'll see a self-satisfied star waiting to be adored.
Stamper has a twentysomething daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) who's
secretly wrinkling the sheets with Stamper's protege A.J. (Ben Affleck).
When Stamper first learns of the couple's afternoon delights, he responds by
grabbing a shotgun and chasing A.J. all over an oil rig, blasting away
recklessly while "black gold" rains down on one and all. This scene occurs
about ten minutes into "Armageddon," and offers a preview of the
documentary-style realism to come in the next two hours and 20 minutes.
Almost immediately after this lighthearted escapade, Stamper and
Grace are seized by government agents and whisked off to Washington, where
NASA honcho Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) begs Stamper to help destroy the
killer rock that's hurtling toward our planet at 22,000 miles per hour. "Not
a soul on Earth can hide from it," Truman warns, although lines such as this
may cause the audience to wonder if he's referring to the asteroid or
Disney's insanely expensive worldwide marketing campaign for "Armageddon."
>From this point on, you can probably put together the rest of the
movie yourself. Just cut your I.Q. in half and remember to spice up your
confused action sequences with rollicking comic interludes of the sort
generally not found outside straight-to-video "Ernest" flicks. Halfway
through "Armageddon" a goofy, English-mangling Cosmonaut (Peter Stormare)
turns up to do an extended hommage to that oft-ignored quipmaster Yakov
Smirnoff. To quote another former space traveller, "Oh, the pain, the
pain!".
Affleck, sporting distractingly bright new caps on his teeth that are
hardly in keeping with his character's hard-scrabble past, generally looks
lost amidst the fireworks. Tyler's portrayal shows once and for all she's
the Daryl Hannah of the '90s, a beautiful face with no personality and in
dire need of a strong director to bring out her potential. Hannah lucked out
in such films as "Roxanne" and "Steel Magnolias"; Tyler was perfectly fine
in "That Thing You Do" and "Stealing Beauty." But Bay isn't the kind of
director who cares about performances anyhow: As long as you can shout your
dialogue over the ruckus in the background, you're O.K. in his book.
Though Thornton lends a certain gravity to a colorless part, the
only actor who really enlivens "Armageddon" is Steve Buscemi, whose frequent
zingers are so much sharper than anything else in the script -- most of
"Armageddon"'s dialogue consists of variations on "I've got to inform the
President," "Suck it up," and the ever-popular "Go! Go! Go!" -- it would not
be a shock to discover they were ad-libbed. The only other moments of humor
in this turgid experience come from the filmmakers' attempts to visualize
life in the American Midwest, which they see as a place somewhere between
"The Waltons" and "The Grapes of Wrath," with ancient trucks, antique
radios, Moms in cotton housedresses and young'uns cavorting in rickety
homemade go-carts they might well have borrowed from The Little Rascals.
What a wonderful world it would be if "Armageddon" opened at the local
picture show and all the real-life Midwesterners stayed home to listen to
Buck Rogers radio dramas and read Flash Gordon comics instead.
James Sanford

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Touchstone Pictures
 Director: Michael Bay
 Writer: Jonathan Hensleigh, J.J. Abrams
 Cast: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck,
Will Patton, Peter Stormare, Keith David, Steve Buscemi
   A restored and revitalized "Gone With the Wind" opened at
about the same time as "Argmageddon," and surprisingly
enough, the two films share common ideas.  Thematically,
both are about the will to survive in the face of disaster.  In
the former story, Scarlett O'Hara has been reduced to poverty
by the devastation of the Civil War and must use her wiles to
subsist.  In the latter, the Harry S. Stamper (Bruce Willis) 
must use his cunning in a rendezvous with an asteroid whose
trajectory threatens to destroy the planet.  Now, if someone
fairly ordinary like Scarlett can prevail against all odds, do you
doubt that Bruce is capable of saving the world?  
   One big question that's raised by any mind in the
"Armageddon" audience still unnumbed from the frenetic
assault on the senses.  Which story has more clout--one
about an individual using her artfulness to marry a rich guy, or
one about an individual responsible for the continued
existence of six billion lives?  Common sense would tell you
that a story of epic, global scope would rivet our attention
better than one involving a single woman and a small circle of
admirers.  But if you go to the movies quite a bit you may be
surprised to find the smaller narratives can be far more
appealing.  Why?  Because we're all human beings and as
such relate more easily to stories that are on a human level. 
To be on a human level means that if you're dealing with a
romance, the two performers must be believable and must
convey a realistic passion or chemistry.  If you're dealing with
a crime, you must care what happens to the people involved,
whether perpetrators or victims.  (Think of our sympathy for
George Clooney's character in "Out of Sight" or our
involvement with the psyche of the Michael Douglas character
in "A Perfect Murder.")  And a comedy should make you
smile; a satire should have you watch with glee as the big
bad corporation gets its comeuppance.  (Think of Michael
Moore's wiping the floor with the suited downsizers in "The
Big One.")
   Disaster movies that have no human enemy to hate, not
even a hero we can truly care deeply about are difficult to
bring off. Humankind vs. nature, then, is the most arduous of
conflicts.  Whom to hate when a tidal wave threatens to
engulf Staten Island?  When lava from Mt. Teidie overflows
on the island of Tenerife?  When an earthquake cracks the
New York City into five sections?
   Which brings us to "Armageddon," a difficult tale to bring off
because there is no human enemy.  Michael Bay's movie is
frenetic from start to its conclusion two-and-one half long
hours later, leaving the audience scarcely a moment to catch
its breath.  Even when members of the cast are simply
talking, the conversation is agitated, overwrought, jittery, as
though the individuals are trying to communicate over a
pulsating disco beat (which may not be so far off, considering
the decibels evoked by music supervisor Trevor Rabin). 
Writers Hensleight and Abrams--the two credited for a movie
which may have had as many as nine scribes--ignore a basic
rule: to sustain involvement, a plot must be developed with
highs and lows lest the audience be simply desensitized by
frenzy.  The special effects are satisfactory, but then again
with the state of current technology and the millions which
were available to carry the usual Jerry "Con Air" Bruckheimer
production values to the fans, why not?
   Much of this criticism could be tempered if "Armageddon"
had any originality, but unfortunately the dialogue apes that of
similar movies ("We're not leaving them behind" and "The
clock is ticking") and the sentiment is not only banal but false
(as when Bruce Willis tells Ben Affleck "I always considered
you like a son" despite Willis's every action to the contrary).
   The story is much the same as that of "Deep Impact,"
except that there, director Mimi Leder gave a needed
woman's touch in making us care about the folks to be
obliterated by an asteroid.  "Armageddon" opens on the world
65 million years ago (that's quite a bit older than the globe of
the movie "The X-Files") where scholar Charlton Heston
educates us that the planet earth had been despoiled by an
asteroid--one which kicked up so much dirt that the sun
couldn't shine (even on California) for the next thousand
years. (History might be dull, but prehistory!)
   Cut to the South China sea where business owner Harry S.
Stamper (Bruce Willis) leads his dirty dozen oil drillers while
he casually drives golf balls presumably into Sumatra. 
Approached by an unsmiling general, he is solicited to
volunteer himself and his men to become instant astronauts--
to travel into space after a short period of training, exit the
ship on an asteroid the size of Texas which is plummeting
toward the earth, dig a 250-foot hole into the mean rock, and
blow it up with a nuclear device.  Figuring this is a good way
to get young A.J. (Ben Affleck) away from his beautiful
daughter Grace (Liv Tyler), he accepts the mission.  With
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi) on board to provide comic relief
and a motel crew that includes at least two people whose
brains must have rattled once too often while drilling, Harry is
off to save the world.  The men are accorded such hero
status that even Chick Chapple (Will Patton), whose ex-wife
has refused to tell their small boy that Chick is the father, now
instructs the kid with pride on his paternity.
The witticisms are sadly not all on the level of Grace's: When
she demands that her father treat her like an adult and Harry
wants to know when she became one, she retorts, "Since I
reached the age of ten and became older than you."  When a
NASA official looks at Harry's crew coming out for training, he
exclaims, "They look like the wrong stuff."
   The film is loaded with logistic flaws.  For example, when
the ship's colonel acts to defuse a bomb, he breaks into a
sweat trying to decide whether to cut the blue wire or the red
wire.  Isn't defusing a bomb part of a military man's training? 
Worst of all, when the crew prances about the Texas-size
asteroid zooming across space, the rock appears to have the
same gravitational pull as Texas.  And while we know how to
send men to the moon, NASA leader Dan Truman (Billy Bob
Thornton) does not even know how to shave himself.
   Some individuals try to leave the planet a little better than
what it was when they arrived.  Harry S. Stamper gets a
chance single-handedly to save the world--which would,
perhaps, leave it better.  This grandiose theme should evoke 
breathtaking responses in the audience.  Maybe it does.  But
it could also lead intelligent people with an appetite to see
Spalding Gray deliver a one-man monologue on a small stage
in an intimate theater.

Author
Joy Wyse
If you're into explosions and destruction, there's a lot  in this film. 
It's another one of those "blow up the world" movies that have been done
many times before.   Every cliche that you've ever seen is here including
the "which color  wire do I cut?" scene.  It is totally predictable.  The
familiar format makes us ask, "Which of the supporting cast members will
die?"   You know what's coming before it happens.  But, I liked it.  Most
of the people who do, are females.  Hey, I even cried, even though I
expected the finale.  But I laughed, too, at some very funny lines.
Men, on the other hand, are more technical and more skeptical.  Truly, who
WOULD risk the future of the planet to Bruce Willis and a group of oil
drillers?  Surely, some other nation  would have had an alternate plan, or
would they really  all follow the lead of the good old US?  The big
question here is: Would it be easier to train astronauts to be drillers,
or drillers to be astronauts?  Or couldn't there have been half and half?
For me, this movie was pure escapism.  No, it isn't artistic.  It isn't
well-written or well-acted.   But for what it is, a "blow 'em up" movie. 
I really liked it.  I give it a B+.  And, I would definitely watch it
again.

Author
Mart Mapes
**1/2 (out of 4) Armageddon is an engrossing, engaging film. For sheer
escapist entertainment, it is quite successful. On the other hand, there are
a few too many angles from which to attack this film - science, depth,
originality, editing - you name it. 
After a documentary segment showing the asteroid that wiped out the
dinosaurs, the movie cuts to an oil rig. Here we meet the heroes of the
film, a crew of drillers, taunting a ship of Greenpeace protesters (the
first in a series of scenes flaunting Bruckheimer's conservative politics).
It is also here that the film sets up the shallow drama of Harry (Bruce
Willis as his usual self), the leader of the roughnecks, discovering his
daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) in bed with one of his drillers, A.J. (Ben Affleck). 
Meanwhile, several sequences show us that asteroid fragments are bombarding
the earth. Truman (Billy Bob Thornton, who is good, but underused in the
role), a higher-up at NASA, learns that these fragments have been shot at
the earth by an asteroid "the size of Texas." He mobilizes his crew to learn
that the real asteroid, "a global killer," is headed right for us. 
Truman calls on Harry and his drillers to accompany two crews of astronauts
to land on the asteroid, drill to its core, and drop in a nuclear bomb. The
blast will split the asteroid in two, with each piece flying harmlessly past
the Earth. 
As I said earlier, there are many points from which to attack this movie.
Science is one (see the linked ABC science writeup.) Predictability is
another. I won't give away any details here, but 30 minutes into the film,
you will know the outcome of all the story lines, including the love story
between A.J. and Grace. Originality is a third. Not only is this the fourth
asteroid movie in a couple of years, but much of the film's melodrama was
lifted straight out of INDEPENDENCE DAY. Finally, the editing (by Mark
Goldblatt et al.) was the biggest problem of all for me. 
During some of the more tense action sequences, like when the first shuttle
must try to land on the asteroid, quickly-cut closeups are edited together
instead of giving the audience a better idea of the big picture. The result
is visual confusion, which I guess for some people, is a substitute for
dramatic tension. There are also montages that are made of seemingly random
images. There are several shots of the Iwo Jima statue in Washington DC,
even though the statue plays no part in the movie. It is possible that Bay
and Bruckheimer found a parallel between the little island of Iwo Jima and
an oncoming asteroid, but I doubt it. It is more likely that they were
trying to distract the audience with patriotic images. 
In addition to the golden silhouette of the Iwo Jima statue, there are other
slow-motion shots of Kodak Americana: a rugged dad and son looking out their
window with concern, the congregation of a small church gathering at dusk.
These sequences make the movie look like a commercial for the U.S. Army or
Dr. Pepper. The whole effect is apparently supposed to infuse the audience
with pride in America. It has nothing to do with the plot, it's just there
for, well, I don't know why it's there. I had a similar complaint aboutCON
AIR, last year's Bruckheimer action flick, but at least in ARMAGEDDON, the
characters are fighting to save the world, instead of striving for the
violent slaughter of a planeload of criminals. 
If the exaggerated patriotism and death-to-criminals attitude makes you
think Bruckheimer's a little conservative, you don't know the half of it. In
addition to the scene of our heroes taunting the Greenpeace ship at the
beginning, there are other subtle conservative messages. The drillers have
to be brought in from their vacations. Several of them are hard to catch.
One in particular is photographed in silhouette as he rides his horse
(looking like the Marlboro Man) away from two black helicopters. The
drillers agree to save the planet, but they demand to never have to pay
taxes again. Ever. 
I don't argue with the director's politics or patriotism PER SE, it's the
fact that I felt I was being force-fed these unarguably glorious images. To
sweeten the taste, Trevor Rabin's score copied the Irish-orchestral sound of
the music in TITANIC. With all this emotion and glory, one wasn't allowed to
question the meaning of what was going on. 
And yet, perhaps that's why I ultimately found the movie engrossing and
engaging. I allowed myself to be swept away by the familiar story and the
well-paced action. None of my complaints occupied my mind long enough to
distract me from the fun. There's a lot wrong with the movie if you think
about it, but it can be enjoyable. 
Just check your brain with the usher and enjoy the ride.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Jon Popick
>From the creative team that invented the "why don't we all just whip it
out and see whose got the biggest dick" film, Armageddon surpasses its
predecessors in budget, effects and pure testosterone output. I'm
talking about Jerry Bruckheimer (ConAir, Crimson Tide) and Michael Bay
(The Rock, Bad Boys), the guys that seem to annually discharge the type
of "sword-fight" picture that features an all male cast and relies on
big explosions to keep their date-raping homophobe frat-boy legions
glued to the screen. You just know if these two were involved in the
music business, they would probably be responsible for the horrific
big-haired cock-rock that came into popularity in the mid 80's.
With that said, Armageddon is still good. Well, maybe good isn't the
right word. It is very entertaining and even features (gulp) a female in
a sort of important role. Not peripheral characters like Nicolas Cage's
wife in ConAir or Sean Connery's daughter in The Rock, but a real honest
to goodness woman whoOKmaybe I'm exaggerating. She's still just eye
candy.
The following is an excerpt of the PLANET SICK-BOY review for Deep
Impact. There really isn't any point in me thinking up a fresh way to
say what I can just cut and paste from somewhere else. It's pretty much
the same story, so everybody follow along:
The premise is simple  an asteroid the size of New York City is headed
toward Earth, threatening  global destruction and the eventual
extinction of all its inhabitants. And no, the world isn't saved by  an
Apple PowerBook or Slim Whitman records.
No doubt aided by a story culled from recent headlines, Deep Impact is
also set apart from the rest of the big budget schlock by tapping into
real human emotion. Some of the heartstring tugging is a little too much
to handle, but if you're used to the weekly emotion manipulation hour
every Thursday night at 10:00 PM, it won't seem quite so painful. I
wonder if you can get an emotion callous? I  wonder how many times I can
use the word "emotion" in this paragraph?
Just replace the title and the part about "tapping into real human
emotion". Not that the typical "Bruce saves the world" movie usually
disappoints in that department. While Deep Impact spent more time
developing characters, Armageddon spent that time (and 30 additional
minutes) blowing stuff up. In fact, it cost more to market Armageddon
($80,000,000.00) than it did to make Deep Impact. Them explosions ain't
cheap, but I'm sure that they'll payoff when the dust settles and the
final numbers come in. Armageddon will likely outgross its rival within
two weeks.
The other main difference in Armageddon is that the ragtag bunch sent
off into space to take care of the asteroid isn't an experienced group
of astronauts, but a crusty team of oil drillers. Join us, as we meet
the main players:
Harry Stamper (Willis, The Fifth Element) - the best oil rigger in the
world, Harry owns runs the company that employs the other cast members.
He is also the father of...
Grace Stamper (Tyler, Stealing Beauty) - the beanpole that came of age
on the big rig and, thusly, has fallen for one of her father's workers
named...
A.J. Frost (Affleck, Good Will Hunting) - the cocky young-turk driller
who, when he isn't penetrating the earth for black gold, penetrates the
doe-eyed Grace behind his boss's back
Rockhound (Buscemi, ConAir) - the crazy kooky guy with the messed up
teeth
Jayotis "Bear" Kurleen (Michael Duncan) - the black guy
Oscar Choi (Owen Wilson, Bottle Rocket) - the cowboy
Chick (Will Patton, The Postman) - the other guy
Like I said, not much character development and that's kind of
surprising in a film with a 2 1/2 runtime. Even more unexpected is the
fact that it was born of a writing team that, individually, was
responsible for Jumanji and The Devil's Advocate. Rumor has it that the
studio brought in some heavy hitting script doctors to punch up the
story, but it doesn't really show. For the record, they are Paul
Attanasio (Donnie Brasco), Ann Biderman (Primal Fear) and Robert Towne
(Chinatown).
But, who needs a script when size is the only thing that matters?
Armageddon is probably the slickest looking film this side of Titanic.
While the actual events are completely preposterous, they look very
authentic. Credit Titanic King of the World and his effect company,
Digital Domain, for the realism. And bored viewers can look for Digital
Domain's creepy metal skull (from T2) trademark, which appears a few
times in the film.
So, basically, don't go to see a great movie. Go to have a great time.
PLANET SICK-BOY:  http://home.eznet.net/~jpopick

Author
Michael Dequina
For all the talk about their shared "the sky is falling" theme,
_Armageddon_, about an asteroid on a collision course with Earth, can best
be described as the opposite side of a coin shared by its counterpart, the
serious falling comet tale _Deep_Impact_.  That said, on its own, unique
terms, the slam-bang _Armageddon_ is a reasonably satisfying summer
blockbuster, with all the flaws and virtues that come with that label.
In addition to the "end of the world" theme, _Armageddon_ and
_Deep_Impact_ do have another thing in common: successfully overcoming a
setup that borders on the ridiculous.  After a group of top government and
scientific advisors determine that the only way to possibly prevent (yes)
armageddon is to detonate a nuclear bomb inside the asteroid, NASA
executive director Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) recruits expert deep-core
driller Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis, inexplicably speaking in a wildly
inconsistent drawl) and his crew to do the job.  Of course, these drillers
aren't astronauts, which means a slow-going hour-long passage in which the
roughnecks undergo extensive training and evaluation for their outer space
mission.  A lot of what goes on, including psychological and physical exams
and a side trip to a strip club, is supposed to be funny.  But with the
exception of a couple of one-liners dryly delivered by the
always-entertaining Steve Buscemi (as horny geologist Rockhound), the
comedy is merely tedious--just as tedious, in fact, as the setup of
_Deep_Impact_, but in a different way, ineptly aiming for cheap laughs as
opposed to earnestly setting up hokey, all-too-familiar disaster epic plot
threads.
_Armageddon_'s light touch is just one in its long line of differences
from its more grave counterpart.  While _Deep_Impact_ was a dramatic
treatment of a doomsday scenario, _Armageddon_ takes a gung-ho,
action-oriented approach.  Director Michael Bay (who appears fleetingly as
a NASA technician) wastes no time putting the special effects dollars to
work; before he hits the basic training lull, Bay treats the audience to a
curtain-raising space shuttle explosion and a spectacular meteor shower in
New York City.  With this different angle comes a pivotal change of
perspective, focusing on the outer space rescue mission as opposed to
_Impact_'s cross-section of Earth dwellers.  So, in essence, it can be said
that _Armageddon_, with its scrappy crew doing their best to "fight the
future," is a film about living, not dying, the ominous inevitability of
which was the Earth-centered _Impact_'s main issue.
Ultimately, the difference between _Armageddon_ and _Deep_Impact_ can be
boiled down to a fundamental one: male and female.  As
_Entertainment_Weekly_'s Lisa Schwarzbaum observed in her review, the
touchy-feely _Deep_Impact_ was a "woman's action movie"; _Armageddon_, from
notoriously testosterone-heavy producer Jerry Bruckheimer, is clearly one
for the guys.  In addition to all the full-throttle spectacle,
_Armageddon_, like all Bruckheimer films, barely has enough time for the
onscreen females.  Liv Tyler is prominently featured in the marketing
campaign, but her slim role is merely an amalgam of two cardboard female
stereotypes: rebellious daughter (to Harry) and devoted girlfriend (to
driller A.J. Frost, played by Ben Affleck).  There is one female on the
space crew, ballbusting co-pilot Watts (Jessica Steen), but, in typical
Bruckheimer fashion, she's literally shoved out of the way at a critical
moment.
So when _Armageddon_ picks up steam with the shuttle launch at about the
one-hour mark, it is momentum of the hard-driving, Hollywood action sort
that takes over, not the subtle, surprising poignance that _Deep_Impact_
eventually took on.  Bay, as shown in his previous two films (also
Bruckheimer productions), _Bad_Boys_ and _The_Rock_, is a crack action
director, and he successfully generates tension and excitement from
otherwise been-there, done-that situations such as the last-second
disarming of a ticking bomb (complete with, as Roger Ebert terms them, an
"RDR"--red digital display) and a narrow escape from an exploding complex.
All of the mayhem comes bathed in Bay's trademark, music-video-honed visual
razzle dazzle, heavy on the quick cuts and slow-mo moments, which keeps the
proceedings interesting.
_Armageddon_ is a sturdy popcorn extravaganza; if only Bay and the writing
crew of Jonathan Hensleigh, J.J. Abrams, Robert Roy Pool, Jonathan
Hensleigh, Tony Gilroy, and Shane Salerno were content to keep it that way.
 But, seeing they were telling a larger-than-life story (and perhaps swayed
by the estrogen of producer Gale Anne Hurd), they decided to go for
emotional content to match, with smaller-than-life results.  While there is
nothing here nearly as embarrassing as the laughably dreary "How Do I
Live?"-scored reunion between Nicolas Cage and family in _Con_Air_, the
general lack of subtlety in _Armageddon_ (and, for that matter, other
Bruckheimer productions) prevent the conclusion, which is to supposed to be
a profoundly moving, from completely convincing; the "human drama" comes
off every bit as calculated as the effects.
Although two films are quite different, in the end the question will
always be "Is _Armageddon_ better than _Deep_Impact_?"  For me, it's pretty
much a draw, but one that can be decided depending on what it is one wants
to see.  If it's drama, _Deep_Impact_; if it's action, _Armageddon_.  I'd
venture to guess that it's the latter quality most moviegoers would go for,
and, consequently, the box office answer to the question would be an
emphatic yes.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     They say that any film that opens with an overhead view of a city
has got to be bad.  Another bad opening is the words "A Jerry
Bruckheimer Film."  Bruckheimer's name indicates that it will likely
have more action than sense.  ARMAGEDDON is our second film of the
season to deal with a possible meteor impact on the Earth and it out-
Bruckheimers Bruckheimer.
     What is there to say about the plot?  An asteroid knocked from
orbit is on a collision course with Earth.  Such a collision, we are
told in the pre-credit narration by Charlton Heston, destroyed the
dinosaurs.  (Curiously, the president of the NRA resists suggesting we
could prevent collisions if only we were all armed with large rocks.)
The film gets off with a bang as in the first minutes we see the first
of the mini-meteor showers, all of which seem predominantly to target
land masses and major cities.  (Being fair, there is a line in the
dialog saying that they are hitting a wider area.) Later in the film we
see the destruction of three cities including Shanghai.  The latter
looks like the Aberdeen area of Hong Kong.  (Jerry, there are no junks
in Shanghai any more.  It's a propaganda thing.  They got rid of the
junks.)
     The survival plan is to place a nuclear bomb in the core of the
asteroid.  NASA, in an effort headed by Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton)
needs to train its astronauts to drill to the core of the asteroid.
Truman calls in foremost drilling expert Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis)
to train the astronauts and Stamper convinces Truman it would be easier
to train drillers to be astronauts.  With the fate of the Earth in the
balance Truman makes this dubious concession.  Astronauts, it seems,
can be trained to know all they need to know in two weeks, but it takes
a lifetime to know how to be a good driller. So Stamper's drilling crew
are on their way to space.  Of course, first comes the training, with
our high-spirited drilling team making life miserable for the NASA
trainers.  Then after the training comes the even more riotous R&R, and
these drillers are really wild by NASA standards.  At no point does it
seem to dawn on our happy drill team that losing the whole Earth with
its Michelangelos and its Pizza Huts could be a real bummer for all of
them.  Finally comes the dramatic cliche-ridden space mission, complete
with gun threats, a "which-wire-to-clip?" ticking bomb threat, and a
"success-with-two-seconds-to-spare" climax.  It is amazing how much of
GOLDFINGER they could shoehorn into this film.
     That ARMAGEDDON should follow so closely on the heels of the
similar but far more intelligent DEEP IMPACT is a near ironclad
guarantee that ARMAGEDDON will suffer by comparison. Even so the
difference in quality beats the point spread by a gap as big as the
state of Texas.  This film is a sort of THE DIRTY DOZEN IN SPACE, and
if nothing else it proves you can get into space piecing together
nothing but off-the-shelf cliches.  It fact apparently it took six
writers or more to find all the cliches necessary.  The main character
and his crew, for example, are based on the old John Wayne film, THE
HELLFIGHTERS.  There are some scenes of the astronaut training in which
the viewer may not know what is happening or why it is funny without
having seen THE RIGHT STUFF.  ARMAGEDDON, it seems, was not so much
written as assembled after a scavenger hunt.  Then there are the in-
jokes.  Without knowing what films have been released this summer the
viewer may not realize why one character is named Truman and or why the
visual joke with the toy Godzillas.  It is a pity that the film did not
come out next year when the scavengers could have raided DEEP IMPACT to
at least get some idea how Earth people react to impending world-
destruction.  The "we-all-wait-and-pray" reaction shown in this film
seemed hokey when George Pal used it in WHEN WORLDS COLLIDE.  And Pal's
street riots in WAR OF THE WORLDS were more realistic than what we see
in ARMAGEDDON.
     Bruce Willis plays an unflappable expert, always keeping things on
an even keel even in the face of trouble like the world as we know it
possibly coming to an end.  This means that he never has to do much in
the way of acting.  He just plays his usual bland character.  Will
Patton made a memorable Civil-War-esque villain in THE POSTMAN.  Here
as the second in command on the team he does not play so flamboyant a
character, but he is always watchable.  Steve Buscemi and Peter
Stormare who were the mismatched partners in crime in FARGO are
reunited as a wisecracking American driller-astronaut and a burned-out
(in more ways than one) Russian Cosmonaut.  Together the two of them
account for about 87% of the interest value of the crew in space.  Liv
Tyler, playing Stamper's daughter and the lover of another of the
flying drillers, seems to dissolve into a one- woman Greek chorus in
the second half of the film.  She silently looks on, watching the
action from Mission Control and strikes poses.
     More and more we are seeing a style of film editing based on the
comic book.  It made sense for films like THE CROW that were based on
comic books.  Here we have in the action sequences many short cuts,
each showing about what you would see in one panel of a comic.
Sometimes the camera lingers over a single static and over-composed or
melodramatic image, as if one is to pause over the composition.  For
example, Liv Tyler may be standing at attention in front of an American
flag watching her father and her lover blast off.  In another scene we
see just her hand touching a television screen that a moment before
showed what was happening in space and now has only static.  Buried
deep in the film are about fifteen minutes of beautiful state-of-the-
art special effects. These at times reach the level of breathtaking.
But everything else about this film is formula.  The action cliches do
generate the same suspense they always do.  But the thought that went
into DEEP IMPACT only points up the total cynicism about what the
audience wants that went into making this overly familiar mess.  As a
science fiction movie, it has more action than thought.  I give it a 4
on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Nobody seemed to care much about my comment that the angle of
tipping seemed to vary erratically from scene to scene in TITANIC, but
I will make another comment about the geometry of the action.  When
cities are shown being hit by smaller meteor showers in ARMAGEDDON, the
meteors should be coming in on parallel or near parallel courses.  They
come in from different directions.  Is the idea that they blew apart
and just happen to be converging again?

Author
Andrew Hicks
        If nothing else, ARMAGEDDON will probably go down in history as
the loudest movie ever. It applies the mechanics of brain-dead,
quick-cutting action movies like CON-AIR and THE ROCK to the disaster
movie formula, with mixed results. As far as the summer of 1998 goes,
ARMAGGEDON is better than GODZILLA and DEEP IMPACT, but not by much.
Movies like these are becoming more about creating hype than living up to
it.
        Once I saw who would be in ARMAGEDDON, I hoped it would be one of
the rare action movies that manages to mix thrills with humor and perhaps
even a wee bit of intelligence. This cast is almost all famous for good
independent movies, people like Billy Bob Thornton (SLING BLADE), Ben
Affleck (CHASING AMY), Liv Tyler (STEALING BEAUTY) and Buscemi (RESERVOIR
DOGS and several hundred other Miramax movies). 
        Then there's Bruce Willis, who's past his prime but still capable of
holding an action movie together. ARMAGEDDON is the beginning of the end
for Willis, though, because as we all know, once an action hero plays
another action hero's father, his days are numbered. (Ask Sean Connery
after the third Indiana Jones movie.) He plays a champion oil driller
whose rig is stationed somewhere out in the ocean, his military days far
behind him. No, he's more concerned now with his daughter's (Tyler) 
romance with cocksure driller Affleck, as he finds them in bed together
and chases Affleck around the boat with a gun. 
        This is just one of the scenes that make you ask, "Why?" The first
comes before the credits begin, when Charlton Heston tells us of the
meteor that made the dinosaurs extinct and vows, "It will happen again.
The question is when?" A title card then pops up that says, "65 Million
Years Later," which is pretty convenient. More credible would be the title
card "65 Million, 243 Thousand, 792 Years, 4 Months, 3 Weeks, 1 Day, 8
Hours, 23 Minutes and 15 Seconds Later," an exercise would require double
the attention span the entire movie allots its audience. 
        Cut to New York, where a man is walking his dog. The dog attacks an
inflatable lizard that a vendor is selling, as the vendor yells, "Hey,
leave Godzilla alone." No room for subtlety here, although ARMAGEDDON does
kick GODZILLA's ass, if just barely. Meteors rain down on the city, the
Chrysler building falls over, much destruction is wrought and two Japanese
tourists tell their cab driver, when it's all over, "I want to shop!"
Worse than that, this shameful sequence has no bearing on the rest of the
movie. 
        What's next? If you've seen two or more disaster movies, you know.
Some amateur scientist has to discover the disaster before the real
scientists do. This time it's a crazy old man who happens upon the giant
meteor headed for Earth, and insists they name it after his wife, Dottie.
"She's a crazy, destructive bitch," he says, and somehow she's flattered.
I guess it would take a crazy, destructive bitch to be flattered by having
her husband tell the world she's a crazy, destructive bitch. 
        The government is in a panic but keeps it under wraps, fearing "a
breakdown of all social services." I guess when humanity only has two days
to live, all it can depend on are its social services. The plan pushed by
NASA operative Thornton is to send a mission to space to land on the
meteor and drill a hole in it, drop a warhead in there and blow the meteor
into two pieces, both of which will miss the earth. It's a brilliant plan
and identical to the one in DEEP IMPACT. 
        The difference is, instead of astronauts, NASA picks Willis to head
the mission. I think this is because the writers of ARMAGEDDON realized a
crucial fact -- astronauts are boring. Much better to assemble a group of
uncouth oil drillers to save the world. It's that same audience-
manipulating underdog effect that worked in ID4, and one of the only
things ARMAGEDDON really has going for it. The two leads are Willis and
Affleck, who don't get along at the right times and then finally start
getting along at the wrong time, as is Hollywood custom. 
        Then there's the rest of the crew, which consists of Buscemi and
three people I didn't recognize. These characters exist to crack jokes
about the end of the world and, in Buscemi's case, about pedophelia. (When
the FBI men come to get him for the mission, he immediately blurts out,
"She told me she was 18!") This is the second consecutive Bruckheimer
movie that's had Buscemi as some kind of little girl lover, which makes me
wonder whose idea that is. If I was Buscemi, I wouldn't be flattered if
they called me every time they had a pedo role to fill. 
        From then on, ARMAGEDDON has what you'd expect -- the training
montage, the launch, the refueling at the Mir station, the landing on the
meteor, the attempt to drill into it. Each leg of the movie has at least
one major thing that goes wrong as the music swells and the cast rushes to
solve the problem. And toward the later sequences, at least one casualty
per disaster. It gets old fairly fast, which isn't a good thing when your
movie is almost three hours long. 
        Somewhere in there, Paris is destroyed, Affleck proposes to Tyler,
four Aerosmith songs appear on the soundtrack and Buscemi goes crazy.
Armageddon has some decent scenes of both suspense and destruction, but
there's never any question that it will be anything other than a
by-the-numbers summer blockbuster. 
        With each passing year, less effort goes into the writing than the
production. The filmmakers instead pay off credible actors (John Cusack
and John Malkovich in CON-AIR, for example) from other good movies so
you'll think something like, "Oh wow, Thornton, Affleck and Buscemi all in
the same movie. It must be good or they wouldn't be in it." I had my
hunches before, but it wasn't until ARMAGEDDON that I finally realized you
can't trust good actors and special effects to carry a movie. 
Address responses to c667778@showme.missouri.edu
Visit my homepage at http://students.missouri.edu/~ahicks/movies.html
More than 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair.
Serving America for almost 1/20th of a century!

Author
Michael Redman
        Guilty pleasures are secret little joys of life. Things that we're not
supposed to enjoy because they're not hip and they're certainly not good for
us. Velveeta cheese, Reeses Cups, silly sit-coms. We sneak these in every once
and a while but don't mention them as we're munching brie and imported
chocolate while discussing PBS specials.
        Here's my confession: "Armageddon" is great fun. It's as intelligent as a
Twinkie, but, ohhhh, that cream filling!
        An asteroid the size of Texas is hurling towards Earth and we have 18 days to
do something about it. A "Global Killer", it will wipe out all life on the
planet -- not even bacteria will survive. Not to worry though, NASA has a
plan. They're going to land on the rock, drill 800 feet into it, stuff a
couple of nukes down the hole and split the thing in half sending it away from
our lovely home world.
        Their problem is that the trained astronauts don't have much hole-digging
experience. Agency head Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) turns to the best oil
man on the planet, cantankerous Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis). Stamper brings
in his team of misfits to learn how to be outer space heroes and they're a not
exactly the guys that NASA would have picked to stick in the shuttle to save
the world. As one of the legit astronauts says, "Talk about the wrong stuff."
        It's the usual "Dirty Dozen" gang: AJ (Ben Affleck), the young headstrong
rebel; Chick (Will Patton), a gambler with a child who doesn't know him;
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi), the genius crazed lothario; and the rest of the
rag-tag cowboys you've come to expect -- the muscular black guy, the gentle
fat guy and more.
        After some fun and games at NASA, they blast off in two shuttles piloted by
real astronauts. Refueling at a Russian space station they pick up a loony
cosmonaut who has been alone a bit too long as the station explodes into flames.
        When they get to the asteroid, everything that could possibly go wrong does
as they fight the doomsday clock. Bet you didn't see that coming.
        There's remarkably little story and virtually no characterization. Stamper
isn't even as filled out as Willis' usual characters are. All the drillers are
cartoon people. We're supposed to get to know them in the very few moments
devoted to bringing them to life in the two and a half hour film. 
        There are two chances to identify them. When they are picked up by G-men for
the mission each is doing something that is supposed to help us figure out who
they are. Rockhound is propositioning a married woman in a sleazy New Orleans
bar, someone is out in the desert on a big motorcycle outrunning the cops.
Later, just before blast-off, they get a night off. Chick visits his estranged
kid, most of the rest get into a bar fight.
        But it doesn't work. At one point, several characters die. After the film, we
tried to figure out who they were, but no one could remember. They were not
people, just bodies.
        AJ and Stamper's daughter Grace (Liv Tyler) are in love much to her daddy's
displeasure. Their romance adds a touch of humanity to the film, but just a
touch. Mostly she hangs around Mission Control doe-eyed, sobbing about the
danger that her father and fiance are in.
        During the first half of the film, Thornton is such a stand-out that the
other actors pale by comparison. Cast against his previous redneck roles, he
does a fine job as the harried NASA chief who yearns for space.
        The movie is filled with bad science (some objects on the asteroid act as if
they were in Earth's gravity), incomprehensible ideas (NASA sends giant
machine guns into space?) and cinematic cliches (in disarming a bomb, do they
cut the blue wire or the red one?). Everything...let me repeat that...
_everything_ is done at absolutely the last possible second. And you can tell
by the digital readouts.
        But, you know, who cares? The special effects are amazing. When relatively
little meteors hit New York, buildings get blown up real good. (The Chrysler
Building is taken out yet again.) Paris is spectacularly vaporized. There are
enough explosions and fire to satisfy anyone.
        Director Michael Bay ("The Rock") used to direct music videos and commercials
and it shows. There's seemingly an edit every two seconds which works well to
create an intense feeling of excitement and hide the lack of story. It does
makes things confusing. In several scenes, it's difficult to figure out
exactly what is going on. Who is where? What is what?
        As fun as it is, "Armageddon" is only one-third of a movie. The earlier
death-from-the-sky film "Deep Impact" was more intellectually satisfying but
lacking any sense of excitement. Both are peopled with characters that you
don't really care about. Once again we are left to wonder why someone can't
make an edge of the seat movie that makes sense and features real people.
        It's traditional that, at the end of each century, the doomsday prophets
appear in full-force. As we approach the end of this millennium, our
story-tellers are giving us what we want. Some say the end of the world will
come in fire, others say water. Hollywood says giant rocks from above. The
most interesting theory is that our way of life will radically change not with
a bang, but with the gentle double-zero.
(Michael Redman has been writing this column for over 23 years and he's
thinking about making a fried baloney and Velveeta sandwich on white bread,
but don't tell anyone. Redman@bvoice.com is the eaddress for confessing your
guilty pleasures.)
[This appeared in the 7/9/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
David Wilcock
(TOUCHSTONE PICTURES)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 24 MINUTES.
STARRING BRUCE WILLIS, BILLY BOB THORNTON, LIV TYLER AND BEN AFFLECK.
DIRECTED BY MICHAEL BAY.
The second meteorite movie after the dire Deep Impact (1998) is brought by
the team who produced the dire action movie The Rock (1996). Luckily,
however, Armageddon is better than both of these films, and provides
entertaining summer fare. The 'plot' is that an asteroid is about to hit
Earth, and a group of normal people (Bruce Willis being the ringleader) are
sent into space to nuke the asteroid from the inside, bouncing it off
course. Naturally, there's lot of death, destruction, and impressive special
effects along the way.
Jerry Bruckheimer has produced another big action movie, but this one tries
to be a little different by trying to develop the characters a bit more.
Unfortunately, it spends too long trying to develop decidedly dull
characters, and the audience starts to long for the action sequences.
Amongst the characters, NASA guy Dan Truman (Thornton) Bruce Willis, and a
whacked out Steve Buscemi provide any interest,  while the rest of the
characters are boring, 2-D stereotypes, the kind of characters Bruckheimers
films specialize in. The script dosen't fare much better, with the usual
boring statements, although Buscemi does deliver the odd funny line. Liv
Tylers and Ben Afflecks love scenes, however, are so terribly messed up they
shouldn't have been included at all. The lines they say are banal, and out
of place in this movie.
When the film does finally gets to business with the action, it's directed
well, with some tense sequences and some great action. The destruction on
Earth looks much better than Deep Impact's, and the outer space sequences
are great also. All of this will be lost on home video, of course, so try to
see this film in the movie theatre. The special effects are truly special,
and none of it looks too cheesy (like parts of Godzilla)
Armageddon, although suffering from a few flaws, is entertaining, and most
of the time has the right balance of drama, action and comedy. Although the
movie could be a bit shorter, and perhaps a bit more effort (rather than
time) spent on developing the characters, this could of been a better movie.
Generally, however, Armageddon is good summer entertainment, and certainly
worth seeing.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Alex Fung
ARMAGEDDON (Touchstone - 1998)
Starring Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck,
  Will Patton
Screenplay by Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd, Michael Bay
Directed by Michael Bay
Running time: 150 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   From the outset, it's impossible to take the latest Earth-in-peril
   summer flick, ARMAGEDDON, very seriously.  The newest
   testosterone-ladened conflagration from the team of director Michael
   Bay and producer Jerry Bruckheimer, this is a film which suggests
   that when confronted by a Texas-sized asteroid headed on a
   collision-course with the planet, NASA has The Right Stuff to launch
   an emergency space shuttle mission within two weeks and slingshot two
   spacecraft around the moon in order to intercept the massive
   interloper hurtling through the heavens at 22,000 mph, but is utterly
   helpless when it comes to simply digging a hole in the rock where a
   nuke will be dropped to hopefully divert the impending calamity.
   To that ends, a civilian team of crack deep-core drillers led by
   roughneck Harry S. Stamper (Bruce Willis) is hurriedly brought on
   board by stoical NASA director Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) for
   an extended weightlessness-training cram session in order to be shot
   shot into space and, of course, Save The World.  Along the way,
   legendary gems such as "Hang on!", "It's gonna blow!", "I've never
   missed a depth that I've aimed for, and by God, I'm not going to
   start now!", and of course, the venerable "Blue wire or red wire?"
   are uttered.  There's even an impromptu rendition of "Leaving On A
   Jet Plane".  Who could ask for more?  Get in line.
   "Do you think that somewhere in this world two people are doing the
   exact same thing that we're doing?" coos Harry's precious daughter,
   the doe-eyed Grace (Liv Tyler), to her hotshot oil driller beau A.J.
   (Ben Affleck) in the film's requisite (and hopelessly hokey) romantic
   subplot.  "I hope so," he responds with an admirably straight face.
   "Or what the hell are we trying to save?"  The question certainly
   comes to mind during the film's first half which introduces us to
   the assorted miscreants that make up our dubious heroes.  Presumably
   acting as counterpoint to the intellectual NASA staff, Harry's team
   is an ultra-blue collar collection of ragtag misfits that one can't
   help but liken to the CON AIR convicts -- and like that previous
   Bruckheimer-produced vehicle, each member of the drilling team is
   solely distinguished by a characteristic idiosyncrasy: Rockhound
   (Steve Buscemi) has a thing for buxom babes, Chick (Will Patton)
   wants to win back his son, and so forth.  Early exposition (opening
   with a brutal piece of would-be slapstick involving a gun-toting
   Harry chasing A.J. around an oil rig) succeeds in making this crew of
   ruffians about as endearing as the stormchasers from TWISTER -- which
   is to say that I found myself hoping the incoming "global killer"
   asteroid would smack them down first.  If these Dudes With Attitudes
   weren't already distasteful enough, when their expertise is called
   upon to prevent global annihilation, the film finds them negotiating
   for fringe benefits and incentives.  Welcome to heroism, 1990s-style.
   Make no mistake, inspirational heroism is what this effects-filled
   action film is intended to be all about, complete with at least two
   clips of our entire group of spacesuit-clad world-savers purposely
   striding towards the camera in slow motion as Trevor Rabin's
   ennobling score blares in the background.  Mr. Bay seems especially
   fond of the low-angle shot, employed liberally throughout ARMAGEDDON
   to lend stature and an imposing quality towards his subjects, but his
   rapid cutting style, already unnecessarily excessive in THE ROCK,
   seems completely out of control here.  There are countless points
   during the film's frenetic action sequences where one is at a loss
   as to exactly where certain characters are relative to others and so
   forth.  (The incoherent space station sequence is particularly
   problematic.)  The entire 150-minute film is assembled out of short
   edits which seem to run no more than a few seconds on average; I'd be
   very surprised if there are more than a handful of shots which run
   for more than twenty seconds.  The net visual effect is not quite
   enough to generate an epileptic reaction, although the threat looms
   everpresent.
   From start to finish, ARMAGEDDON is such a carefully crafted product
   abiding by bold jingoistic patriotism conventions that its biggest
   surprise comes from the list of top screenwriters (credited and
   uncredited) assembled to provide the film's backbone.  Ace Hollywood
   writers such as Jonathan Hensleigh, Tony Gilroy, Paul Attanasio (QUIZ
   SHOW, DONNIE BRASCO, ARMAGEDDON -- something looks ... out of place
   here), Ann Biderman, Scott Rosenberg (whom I can envision gleefully
   penning many of Rockhound's one-liners) and Robert Towne presumably
   picked up nice paycheques for their respective contributions to this
   by-the-numbers screenplay, but realistically any shades of subtlety
   present from the cast or script alike are utterly obliterated by the
   wildly overstated and calculated manner in which Mr. Bay presents
   each scenario.  This is the sort of film where it's not enough to
   simply have Grace weeping as her father's space-originated
   transmission cuts off; it has to have her weeping at a wall of
   monitors busily airing static as the camera slowly dollies out and
   maudlin music provides background ambiance.
   If the film is skimping on original ideas and appealing heroes, it
   does provide a lot of spectacle for two-and-a-half hours.  A meteor
   shower in the opening reel supplies plentiful destruction and mayhem
   in New York, and ARMAGEDDON becomes a dizzying series of incessant
   explosions, action and stunts once the gang goes spacebound.  In this
   respect, the film distinguishes itself from the schmaltzy treacliness
   of DEEP IMPACT, the DreamWorks / Paramount film which beat it to the
   North American market by two months -- eschewing its predecessor's
   sensitive approach, this is an action film through and through.  It's
   not an entirely unsuccessful diversion, full of energy and providing
   enough visceral stimuli to rival any music video, but in terms of
   genuine drama and suspense, ARMAGEDDON is remarkably hollow.

Author
Pierce Dalton
 The comet-disaster flick is a disaster alright.  
 Directed by Tony Scott (Top Gun), it tells the story about an asteroid the
size of Texas caught on a collision course with earth.
 And you thought that dinky little comet in Deep Impact was trouble.  Jeez.
 After a great opening, in which an American spaceship, plus the city of New
York, are completely destroyed by a comet shower, NASA detects the said
asteroid and go into a frenzy.
 They hire the world's best oil driller (Bruce Willis), and send him and his
crew up into space to fix our globel problem.  That's like sending a mouse into
a cat carrier, isn't it?
 The action in Armageddon are so over the top, nonstop, and too ludicrous for
words, I had to sigh and hit my head with my notebook a couple of times.  I was
not alone.  Plus, to see a wonderful actor like Billy Bob Thornton is a film
like Armageddon is a waste of the actor's talents.
 The film is just a reel to show off a bunch of snazzy FX shots.  The only real
reason for making this film was to somehow out-perform Deep Impact.  
 Producer Jerry Bruckheimer fails with Armageddon.
1999 (c) Quick Flick Pix  pierce80@aol.com

Author
Mark Bubien
45. Golf balls are an effective deterrent against Greenpeace weenies.
44. Even though your asteroid is rotating wildly on 3 axes, you always
have a perfect view of the Eastern seaboard of the United States.
43. The best way an American can gain the trust of the Chinese is to
drench them with crude oil.  Thumbs up Yankee!
41. In a disaster movie, it's okay to chop a salesman into two pieces,
but never ever let the cute little doggy get a scratch.
40. When parked on an asteroid, low gravity situations never apply to you
when you're inside the Space Shuttle.
39. When on the asteroid's surface, low gravity situations never apply to
the equipment you brought with you---unless you need to leap over a giant
canyon.
38. When crashing a Space Shuttle into a low gravity asteroid, you plow
into the ground and break apart without bouncing one single time or
losing any equipment into space---even if you are travelling faster than
the asteroid's escape velocity.
37. Your thrusters always push you down, even if you are spinning out of
control and they're spraying in all different directions.
36. "Laughing With" vs. "Laughing At": When Steve Buscemi delivers a
line, that's "Laughing With";  When Bruce Willis delivers a line, that's
"Laughing At."
35. Eleven minutes at 8 Gs isn't all that bad.  Sure you complain a
little, but your loose facial muscles never bend back from the force,
your lips don't turn white from blood drainage, and you have no trouble
remaining completely conscious the whole time. You are, after all, one of
the best damn oil rig workers in the South China Sea!
34 (tie). Sound will travel in a vacuum.
33. Not only can a Space Shuttle dock while flying loops around a
rotating space station, *two* can do it at the same time.
31. Explosive decompression and near-absolute zero temperatures never
apply to the human body.
30. Planet killer asteroid coming?  Hide in your cellar!
29. NASA will let any untrained bozo go into space without giving an
argument---if he happens to be one of the best damn oil rig workers in
the South China Sea!
28. A surface detonation will have no effect on an incoming asteroid. 
But shoving a nuke into a hole drilled 0.03% of the way into its solid
iron crust will split that baby right in two!
27. Prior to the giant planet killer asteroid, several hundred smaller
ones travelling on the exact same trajectory always precede it, giving us
ample warning by striking the Earth 3 weeks ahead of time even though
we're in a totally different position in our orbit.
26. When it's your only chance to save the planet, NASA will make sure
your first pit stop is with a broken-down Russian space station.
25. Massive iron rocks colliding with your Shuttle at faster than the
speed of sound will not penetrate the titanium hull, but bullets will.
24. A father is always surprised to find his daughter in bed with the
only eligible bachelor her age within 1000 miles, especially when said
bachelor is good looking and a really nice guy to boot.
23. In a planet killer situation, NASA's biggest concern next to
worldwide rioting is religious hysteria---the last thing we need when
faced with the extinction of all life on the planet as we know it is
people falling onto their knees and quietly praying.
20. Animal crackers are an effective on-screen substitute for sex.
19. No matter how stupid or life-threatening they might be, always go
with your instincts---especially at the end of the movie.
18. Shuttle about to crash on an asteroid?  If you're a passenger, go
into the wide cargo bay and don't strap yourself in.
17. Shuttle about to crash on an asteroid?  If you're the pilot do not
for any reason whatsoever put your space suit's helmet on. 
16. When you're on an asteroid and you need to leap over a giant canyon
and clear the towering spires on the opposite slope, drive off a flat
surface and turn your thrusters off.
15. A father always hates it when the one nice, clean-cut and respectable
guy on the rig falls in love with his daughter, especially when he loves
the guy like a son.
14. Trevor Rabin needs to leave the movie industry and return to playing
lead guitar for the Rock band Yes, and so does Bruce Willis.
13. Men who are overweight, out-of-shape and untrained can handle the
rigors of weightlessness, cramped quarters and extended periods at heavy
Gs, but the guy with two Phds always suffers from Space Dementia.
12. To create 1G of artificial gravity, a 21 foot diameter space station
only needs to spin at 2 RPMs, rather than the 228 RPMs that all known
laws of physics seem to require.
11. Shotguns shoot bullets, not shot.
10. Concerned about the bottom line?  Don't waste any money on
inconsequential things like story line and technical consultants---just
make damn sure you hire the best director of TV commercials you can find.
9. When a Russian Cosmonaut places you in the deepest recesses of his
space station and tells you to watch the pressure gauge in case it
overloads, run for your life immediately.
8. A 250 lb. man flying off an asteroid at a velocity of 40 ft./sec. can
be effectively stopped by a 175 lb. man grabbing his life-line and
tugging with all his strength---don't worry, the 175 lb. man will never
be pulled helplessly into space even though he is not tethered to
anything himself.
7. Planet killer asteroids heal parent-child relationships better than
any psychologist ever could.
6. "Deep Impact": good Science Fiction. "Armageddon": bad Science
Fiction.
5. Thank God the Cold War's over because those crazy Ruskies can sure be
handy to have around---give one a hammer and he can fix anything.
3. Though it lopes through the atmosphere like an overstuffed 747, when
you get it into space, the Shuttle maneuvers exactly like an F/A-18
fighter jet.
1. Yes, some people will pay $7.50 to see a stinking pile of crap.
The author(s) hereby *grant* the right to electronically distribute
this work via e-mail, ftp, and/or usenet news for non-profit purposes
provided the story, title, authorship, and copyright (including this
notice) remain in their original form, without modification or deletion.
In other words, you can e-mail it, ftp it, post it, or put it on a Web
Site for free.  Just make sure you (1) don't change the story and you
(2) include the above Copyright notice. 
Story Bytes appears online at ">http://www.storybytes.com>
Story Bytes
** Contact:       
** To Subscribe:  ">http://www.storybytes.com/subscribe.html>
** Web Site:      ">http://www.storybytes.com>


Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Armageddon (1998)
Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler, Keith David, 
Chris Ellis, Jason Isaacs, Will Patton, Steve Buscemi, Ken Campbell, 
William Fitchner, Jessica Steen, Grayson McCouch, Owen Wilson, Clark 
Brolly, Michael Clarke Duncan, Peter Stormare. Directed by Michael Bay. 
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Anne Hurd and Michael Bay. 154 
minutes.
Rated PG-13, 3 stars (out of five stars) 
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
Before you leave for the theater take a glance at your kitchen sink, 
because that's the only thing that doesn't get thrown into "Armageddon," 
the second of this year's "Uh oh, big rock!" movies. In its quest to 
become the ultimate summer spectacular, this "Dirty Dozen in Outer Space" 
hits the audience with two and a half hours of virtually non-stop action, 
punctuated with wisecracks and showcasing every cliché in the history of 
movies. "Armageddon" is the kind of blockbuster that leaves you feeling 
exhausted and entertained, though you may have trouble respecting 
yourself the next morning.   
As far as junk food movies go, "Armageddon" is a super-sized value meal, 
with just as little nutritional value. Please understand, I had fun 
during the movie. The special effects were killer, the action scenes 
gripping and most of the jokes were funny. Shucks, I even teared up at 
the appropriate moments. But later, while reflecting on the stock 
characters, contrived situations, and the film's ultra manipulative 
nature, I grew annoyed. Event movies don't have to just be testosterone 
drenched hooey. Without wasting a lot of space pontificating, I suggest 
you look back at "Jaws" and "Close Encounters of the Third Kind." Then 
consider the recent "Independence Day" and "Godzilla." Are we truly 
doomed to a future where you can't enjoy a summer blockbuster without 
first disconnecting your brain? 
Like "Deep Impact," "Armageddon" deals with a "global killer" headed 
straight for Earth. As in "Deep Impact," the big plan is to land on the 
asteroid, drill deep into the rock and blow the thing to kingdom come 
before it can do the same to us. To that end, NASA recruits a group of 
rowdy oil riggers, lead by Bruce Willis. His team includes the requisite 
archetypes: cocky stud Ben Affleck, wise-guy Steve Buscemi, repentant 
father Will Patton and righteous dude Owen Wilson, plus a whacked-out 
muscleman and a goofy fat guy. Adding spice and romance to the mix is Liv 
Tyler as Willis' spunky daughter and Affleck's honey bunny. 
After a high octane opening, where a dazzling meteor shower rips up New 
York (and the filmmakers get in a funny dig at "Godzilla"), NASA honcho 
Billy Bob Thornton rounds up Bruce's roughnecks to undergo abbreviated 
astronaut training. Before you can say "they're ripping off 'The Right 
Stuff,'" the guys are ready to go. But prior to leaving to save humanity, 
the crew gets a night off, so that each character can underline his one 
distinguishing characteristic, while Ben and Liv share an MTV video 
moment, making out against the sunset during a drippy Aerosmith power 
ballad. 
Then, after a patriotic speech and a shot straight out of "Top Gun" 
showing the uniformed crew walking stoically in slow motion, it's off to 
the shuttles, for a marathon session of derring-do and heroic sacrifice 
in asteroid land. Things go from bad to worse, of course, allowing Bruce 
to get on the mike and say, "Houston, YOU'VE got a problem."
On paper, the derivative and downright cheesy nature of the production is 
obvious, but it's easy to get caught up in it all during the film, thanks 
to breakneck pacing and hyperactive editing. Veteran video maker Michael 
Bay directs the film like a Mountain Dew commercial on amphetamines. With 
camera cuts every 3-5 seconds, this thing makes "Con Air" look sluggish.
The actors play their roles gamely. Billy Bob Thornton anchors the film 
nicely, while Bruce plays the hero, using an odd, semi-Southern accent 
where he kind of swallows his words. Ben and Liv are okay as Ken and 
Barbie with attitude, and Steve Buscemi breaks the tension just enough 
with well-timed, generally funny wisecracks. Newcomer Owen Wilson steals 
scenes as the only crew member totally enthusiastic about the adventure.
As far as the actual plot mechanics, no cliché is missed, including the 
time-honored "should I cut the blue wire or the red wire" bomb defusing 
scene. Incidentally, if the weatherman ever forecasts meteor showers, 
here's a tip. Just drive to the suburbs, because meteors only hit big 
cities. And if you're stuck in New York, for God's sake, avoid the 
Chrysler building, because that sucker gets nailed every time.
I realize this piece has been unusually snide, so let me stress once more 
that I had a good time watching this film. It was only later that the 
cynicism really crept in. As far as late 90's summer blockbusters go, you 
could do lots worse than "Armageddon." Compared to "Batman and Robin" or 
"Godzilla," this thing is "Citizen Kane." But I miss the days when movies 
were made by artists instead of technicians. If, like me, you enjoy 
"Armageddon" while in the theater but feel cheated later in the evening, 
do yourself a favor. Rent "The Right Stuff" and watch a real movie by 
real artists about real heroes.   

Author
Monika Huebner
Director: Michael Bay
Cast: Bruce Willis, Liv Tyler, Will Patton, Steve Buscemi, Peter
Stormare and others
The end of the world - many times invoked (in vain) by Jehova's
Witnesses - now finally seems to loom over mankind. A giant asteroid
races towards Earth and threatens to put an end to all life. NASA
hopes to destroy it by drilling a hole in its surface and explode an
atomic bomb in it. For this job they hire Harry Stamper (Bruce
Willis), a drilling expert with an international reputation, to take
his team to the asteroid and solve the problem once and for all. Time
is running out because the approaching object was discovered late
only when all of a sudden showers of meteorites rained down on the
USA and caused considerable damage. The newly asigned astronauts
can't waste much time on training, they just have to pass a physical.
And the race against time commences.
CHAOS IN SPACE would have been a good name for the movie, but
ARMAGEDDON of course sounds more dramatic. After DEEP IMPACT this is
the second movie this year dealing with the subject of celestial
bodies colliding with our planet. But compared to DEEP IMPACT this
movie's motto is: Think Big. The asteroid about to hit Mother Earth
is the size of Texas. The asteroid that ended the Cretaceous period
65 million years ago and left a 200 km wide crater is thought to have
been 10 to 20 km in diameter. An object the size of Texas is likely
to make a much bigger hole. Our solar system hasn't suffered
collisions of this kind since it emerged in this remote corner of the
galaxy.
But let's suspend disbelieve on this issue. It's a very dramatic idea
that would have made a thrilling movie loaded with special effects.
The special effects are quite stunning, and the audience doesn't have
to wait till the last minute. New York is knocked flat and a few
other sights outside the USA are doomed as well, for balance's sake.
The movie starts with a bang. It's believable that the asteroid is
discovered only when it's already quite near Earth. Near collisions
with asteroids have happened in recent years as everybody can verify
with NASA. 
Harder to believe is the fact that a bunch of civilians is shot into
space to save the Earth. It's like watching a bunch of small boys
play astronauts in a real life setting. A bunch of boys who watched
STAR WARS too many times. Or perhaps they were never allowed to play
out their fantasies with action dolls. Sorry, but I guess to really
enjoy those scenes you simply need a Y-chromosome.
Bruce Willis is in his element for the first time since the DIE HARD
series. And he doesn't have to deal with mere trifles like
skyscrapers, airports or major cities. He can be a true heroe and
save the Earth. His adversary is just a dead rock instead of a group
of vicious terrorists, but who cares. The asteroid gives him at least
as much trouble as all the terrorists in the DIE HARD movies. Just
one question: what's next? Saving the solar system or the whole
galaxy? It doesn't get much bigger than that, but then he may soon be
too old for the tough hero part anyway. So let's not begrudge him the
triumph over the forces of nature. He uses his opportunity to be
mucho macho. His daughter doesn't have much to say, but with a father
like that she probably should be content to sit adoringly at his feet
and do whatever he bids.
The rest of the team remains liveless. Some of them are living
targets anyway. Killing off a few less important heroes adds to the
suspense. Steve Buscemi can't save the day. The only bright spot in
the movie is Peter Stormare as Russian cosmonaut Lev Andropov who for
the last 18 months lived  a solitary life on a Russian space station
and therefore is a bit strange. Thus he provides the humor for this
noisy action flick by messing up his new American friends with his
bizarre ideas. He's the best choice for this wacky part, even if you
can't help asking yourself why a brilliant actor like him accepts a
part in this kind of project.
ARMAGEDDON will probably make people happy who thought that there
wasn't enough action in DEEP IMPACT. Go find a theater with a big
panorama screen and a digital sound system that is turned up till the
seats vibrate. Don't see it on video. With the benefit of a big
screen and great sound gone ARMAGEDDON is just an embarrassment. The
noisily promoted movie lives up to the promises of its makers only in
terms of volume.
Homepage: Book and movie reviews
http://sites.inka.de/sites/darwin

Author
Martin Thomas
"Those who cannot remember the past are doomed to repeat it"- Santyana
...Blah, blah, blah. Man, I don't know about you, but I am truly tired
of hearing that quote. Not that it isn't true, mind you, but it's
invoked way too often and usually in conjunction with denouncing the
horrors of the Holocaust, slavery or the South during post-Civil
War Reconstruction.  What bummers!   Personally, I believe the quote's
validity can proven with a more contemporary and less
grandiose atrocity ...say for instance, Bruce Willis.
  Today's history lesson takes us back to 1988- A time when the
'one-man-army' action movie genre looked to be on it's last leg. It
seemed that Stallone's and Schwarzenegger's best work was behind them
and their movies were vying with each other to see which
could most resemble a Tex Avery cartoon. Then, out of nowhere came a
little movie named DIE HARD.
    What set DIE HARD apart from the others wasn't so much how smart the
script was,  it was the clever twist of the main
character: not an ex- Green Beret, ex-mercenary, ex-CIA agent, but just
a NY City cop. A regular Joe. One of us.  No longer could a
building full of hostages only be rescued by  an Austrian Superman. It
could just as well be an average guy who used his brain and had
a rudimentary knowledge of firearms. "Hell, it could've been me!"
    What made it all even more of a 'goof' was that it was Bruce Willis
in the role of John McClane.  Balding and not 'matinee idol'
handsome but charming in his own simian sort of way. Not really out of
shape but not a person who'd choose a protein shake over a
beer. In fact, he was already famous for hawking wine coolers and being
MOONLIGHTING's David Addison: smart mouthed,
blitzed-out party guy. A slacker. A screw up. "Hell, if Bruce could do
it I KNOW I could do it!"   It was a 'goof' on top of a 'goof'.
    So what happened? While we all high-fived and celebrated how funny
the punchline was we somehow forgot the joke it was
attached to. During this bout of amnesia Reality folded in on itself and
Bruce Willis became known as a legitimate action hero. He was
invited to become a partner in Planet Hollywood and was parodied
alongside Schwarzenegger and Stallone on such tv shows as
ANIMANIACS and DUCKMAN. Our forgetfulness yielded a condemnation that
was quick and severe and in the form of THE LAST
BOY SCOUT, LAST MAN STANDING, THE JACKAL, MERCURY RISING and most
recently ARMAGEDDON.
    In the first five minutes of ARMAGEDDON New York is devastated by a
shower of VW-sized meteors. The Powers-That-Be
discover that they are actually the by-product of a giant asteroid
plummeting toward Earth...with an ETA of 18 days!  Since detonating
all of the worlds nuclear bombs on the surface of the asteroid would do
no more damage than a firecracker held in an open palm
(????), the government enlists the aid of Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis),
the greatest oil drilling 'wildcat' in the world. Harry and his
ragtag team of roughnecks blast off into outer space to implant a nuke
in the asteroid and save the world. Between numerous mishaps
and their own hijinx, though, there may not be enough time.
  Double deja vu, huh? Just last year we had two disaster movies about
erupting volcanoes (DANTE'S PEAK, VOLCANO) and this
year we have two movies about the imminent destruction of Earth by
meteors. I figured the obvious thing to do here would be to
compare and contrast DEEP IMPACT (a more realistic and sensitive look at
the last days of Earth, reminiscent of TESTAMENT and
THE DAY AFTER) to ARMAGEDDON (uh...it blows up stuff real good), but
I've decided against it .
    "...OF ALL THE MOVIES THIS SUMMER, ARMAGEDDON IS THE BEST..."
   -raves Martin Thomas of The Reel Deal
 -Hey, rather than let the studio assign a truncated pre-fab quote to me
(like so many other lesser critics who just want to hear their
name on tv), I just saved them the work. Of course, what follows "... "
would be:
 "...AT TYPIFYING EVERYTHING THAT'S GENERALLY INSIPID ABOUT BIG SUMMER
MOVIES!"
    ARMAGEDDON is a brain dead, suspense-free, artless movie with
scribble pad characters, a 'make-it-up-as-we-go' plot, Aerosmith
songs every 15 minutes (did I mention that it also stars Liv Tyler), and
has a sense of humor that is of, by, and for middle-aged frat
boys.
    Other than bringing in people who like independent movies, Steve
Buscemi's and Billy Bob Thorton's only purpose seems to be to
share scenes with Bruce Willis and drive home the point of what a rotten
actor he is. There's no sense of urgency and you never feel
that the world is really going to end...and you don't care! The
characters in the movie sure don't seem to. With only two days left to
save the Earth they take a night off to go to a strip club.
     Probably the worst thing about ARMAGEDDON is knowing that it's
gonna make more money than God.
     ARMAGEDDON is a studio exec's wet dream. It's a combination of TRUE
LIES, INDEPENDENCE DAY and CON AIR
synthesized in a lab with everything fun, clever or new already
extracted.  It fits perfectly into it's genealogy of TWISTER-ID4-THE
LOST WORLD-SPEED 2-BATMAN & ROBIN-GODZILLA-***.  Movies that promise the
world then do an insulting bit of 'bait and
switch'.  Movies we'll sometimes like only because we had our hearts so
set on it. It's the history lesson we never seem to learn.
'Santyanna's lament' I call it.
    I suppose compared to an F-5 tornado that only kills two people, an
alien technology that interfaces with a MacIntosh computer, a
T-Rex that drinks water from a chlorinated pool rather than a nearby
ocean, a Bat-credit card, and a lizard that's as tall as a skyscraper
yet small enough to lay eggs in Madison Square Garden, I guess an
asteroid the size of Texas not being detected until eighteen days
before impact is not all that outrageous. Even when you consider that
XF11, the real life mile-wide meteor's brush with Earth has been
pinpointed thirty years in advance (Oct. 16 2028 1:30pm). I guess I'm
just nitpicking now.
"Dude, it was just meant to be a rollercoaster ride movie and there's
something wrong with you if you can't just sit back
and enjoy it! You can't compare it to a 'thinking' movie."
    So, is this what we've come to?  Do I now not compare the cooking of
Paul Prudhomme to that of Wolfgang Puck, but rather the
taste of a corn-fed cow's dung to that of a  slaughterhouse cow?  This
has all made me question my judgement and put me in a self-
reflexive mood.
     It's not like I haven't loved movies that either require you to
check your brain at the door (SPAWN, THE SAINT) or movies where
the lead actor can't hold his accent (THE GHOST & THE DARKNESS, THE
DEVIL'S ADVOCATE) or movies with terrible dialogue
(WILD THINGS, BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE DOLLS).
    I think the key word is EITHER/ OR, as opposed to AND. I guess I
require that a movie have SOME merit other than lining the
pockets of hack directors and schlock producers (you know who you are).
    Sure, it's possible to "check your brain" and enjoy ARMAGEDDON, but
you may be too embarrassed to ask for it back afterwards.
It might have some questions you don't want to answer.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
What Armageddon has going for it is The Tears.  "The Tears" is the
chapter in Tom Wolfe's novel The Right Stuff that describes John Glenn's
heroic Mercury orbital flight in 1961 and the stunning, overwhelming
reception that he received on his return.  "That was what the sight of
John Glenn did to Americans at that time," Wolfe writes.  "It primed
them for the tears.  And those tears ran like a river all over America."
The Mercury astronauts, Wolfe writes, were glorious Single-Combat
Warriors sent into space, armed only with their holy righteous stuff to
fight the good fight of the Cold War in space.  In Armageddon, the only
Russian menace is a leaky space station.  The astronauts of Armageddon
have "the wrong stuff":  they're a relentlessly eccentric rabble of oil
field roughnecks.  Instead of the rigorous training that the Mercury
Seven received, our nation's newest heroes are given a whirlwind
orientation through astronaut school, in what's meant to be a gentle
parody of the film version of Wolfe's novel.
But... they are on a Mission.  A holy Mission worthy of the True
Brotherhood itself!  Yes!  There is this asteroid or comet -- anyway,
this huge big rock -- that is going to smash poor Dayton and Buffalo and
Atlanta and the whole comprehensible world all to flinders.  And the
mission is to stop it, blow it apart so that the halves don't reach
earth... and to do that, you have to launch two next-generation shuttles
at the same time.. and refuel at the aforementioned space station... and
make a sharp hairpin around the moon...  and actually land on this
heaving, spinning hurtling rock, full of sharp pointy stalactites... and
somehow drill a hole through the iron crust of the rock...  and take off
again before a white-hot nuclear bomb blows the thing apart and... Yes!
Save the planet!  And the poor, grateful world watching on CNN while
eating their popcorn and Junior Mints... well, what can they do but
offer up The Tears at this glorious exhibition of the holy righteous
stuff?
The problem with Armageddon is this:  The sight of Bruce Willis and his
oil field Dream Team boarding the space shuttle, risking life and limb
on an uncertain outcome, should, in and of itself, be enough to bring on
The Tears.  Add in the image of the heart-breakingly beautiful Liv
Tyler, watching her father (Willis) and her fiancee (Ben Affleck) take
off in the heavens, and you've got emotional gold.  But for some reason
-- and it's the hallmark of the film -- it isn't enough.  You've got a
perfectly good story here, a perfectly heart-wrenching scene, and it
isn't enough for the moviemakers.  No, they've got to add in a lot of
quick edits of Kodak moments from around the world, they've got to try
to blatantly manipulate the audience to bring on The Tears, when the
moment was emotionally strong enough to begin with.
The motto of Armageddon is:  More is Better -- either that, or the old
MTV motto, Too Much Is Never Enough.  When deep-core driller Harry S.
Stamper (Willis) is authorized to bring his crew aboard the space
station, naturally, they're not waiting patiently for him back on the
oil rig.  No, the FBI has to chase them down with helicopters.  It's not
enough that the astronauts are in plenty of danger on the asteroid,
Armageddon has to engineer a showdown between the roughnecks and the
shuttle pilot (William Fichtner, looking for all the world like a young
Christopher Walken).  All through the movie, the director and
screenwriters suffer from a lack of faith in the quality of their story,
and try to embellish it needlessly.  You get the feeling that if
producer Jerry Bruckheimer and director Michael Bay were in charge of
Apollo 13, that they'd have Tom Hanks and his crew fighting off ravenous
space serpents on the way to the Moon.
The only person in Armageddon who is completely true to the sense of
Mission is Bruce Willis.  Although Willis is allowed to display some
charm and let loose some wisecracks in the early going, once he arrives
at the Johnson Space Center, his performance is all business.  For some
reason, Willis has been trying to put his old happy-go-lucky
performances in Moonlighting and Die Hard behind him lately, and that's
a shame.  Here, Willis is in "deep blue hero" mode the whole way through
-- stoic, confident, leadership.  He does a good job -- especially in
letting his emotional veneer crack at the very end -- but a lot of what
makes him a special actor is lost in Armageddon.
Billy Bob Thornton plays the leader of Mission Control, and it's very
refreshing to see him be given a normal part for once, after years of
playing Southern grotesques.  He has the same role here that Morgan
Freeman had in Deep Impact:  he is there to explain what's going on, and
he does a good enough job that it's fair to compare him to America's
Finest Actor.  Thornton makes up for a lot of the movie's charm deficit,
and so does Ben Affleck, who is Willis's primary foil.  Affleck, for
some reason, reminds me a lot of Adam Sandler -- he's got the same sort
of innate goofiness about him -- but he manages to be effective as both
the romantic lead and the action sidekick.  All Liv Tyler is given to do
is hang around Mission Control and look dewy-eyed, and this she
accomplishes tremendously.  Will Patton redeems himself for his part in
the debacle that was The Postman with a strong, sad-eyed performance,
and Peter Stormare and Steve Buscemi from Fargo team up again to provide
much-needed comic relief.  (One wonders what the Coen Brothers would
have done with this budget and this storyline.)
But setting all of the above aside, the real question about Armageddon
is whether it delivers the goods as an action movie.  The answer to that
question is YES, in big Day-Glo orange letters.  Armageddon fulfills
your every desire for high-quality special effects and top-notch
action.  In every male reptile brain, there's a longing for thrills and
spills and things that go boom and major monuments getting wrecked, and
Armageddon specifically and joyfully caters to that basic hunger.
However, you've got to have more than that to make a great movie, and
Armageddon is so blatantly manipulative and action oriented that it's
hard to put it in that class.  But if you can't be great, you can at
least be entertaining, and Armageddon is mainstream Hollywood
entertainment at its finest.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
If you look up the term 'overkill' in the dictionary you will see a
picture of movie producer Jerry Bruckheimer.  His production company
tries to top itself with each outing and 'Armageddon' is no exception.
For a movie critic and in many ways it's the same for the general public
at large, the film doesn't require a lot of thought, if any at all, and
is meant to be a big budgeted, loud, extremely edited film with special
effects that look like they're straight out of a comic book and the
film's gothic design of a giant meteor is a glimpse straight into hell.
One thing you have to understand in seeing a film like this (and it's
something I've said over and over again and I'll always say it) is that
it is beyond the realm of high brow criticism and deserves to be put in
the category of happy medium.  If you criticize the film too harshly,
you'll look like a snob and if you judge it too well, you'll look like a
fool.  The genre of action films should be given a new category, that of
'expected action' film as you know what to expect as soon as you see the
coming attractions.
'Armageddon' certainly aims to please and has more edits in a ten second
span than any other film I've seen and corners are not cut in the
special effects department.  My harshest criticism of this film is that
it doesn't require any big name stars because the film is so
overwhelming technically that the biggest movie star in the world would
get lost in the mix.  And yet, the big names are there.
As the film opens, the narration is conducted by Charlton Heston, whose
biblical past in films seems appropriate here as he describes an event
of biblical proportions.  We hear how a description of a meteor's impact
65 million years ago on Earth comes to fruition which allegedly wiped
out the dinosaurs.  Some theories I've read over the years tend to
favour that that impact is now the Grand Canyon in Arizona U.S.A.  Skip
forward to the present day. A meteor the size of Texas is on a collision
course with Earth and the only way to destroy it seems to be to land a
space shuttle on it with a group of core drillers that will grind a hole
in it, drop a nuclear explosive in it and break it up so that the
concussion that follows will cause the remaining particles to miss our
planet.  I'm not sure that this would necessarily work but then again
bad science is always a factor in films like this just as it was
ludicrous to believe that Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum could fly that
alien space craft into the mother ship in 'Independence Day' and upload
that infamous computer virus to destroy all the surrounding ships
hovering over the major cities of the world.  Dumb?  Sure.  But
embracing the idea of suspension of disbelief is as old as the film
industry itself.
Bruce Willis stars as the best core driller in the world.  He's an
aspiring oil man and the first time we see him he's chipping golf balls
from his off shore rig at a Greenpeace boat, filled with protesters who
duck each time a golf ball comes their way and clangs off a beam just
over their heads as Willis laughs.  One of his crew (Ben Affleck) is
having an affair with his daughter (Liv Tyler) and other members of
Willis' crew (Will Patton, Steve Buscemi) work closely as his best
friends.  Willis is called in by a NASA chief (Billy Bob Thornton) who
explains the impending doom and asks Willis to apply his core drilling
skills and destroy the rocky menace.  Willis agrees only if he can have
his own men brought along and their training is a scene straight out of
'The Right Stuff' only it crosses with some slapstick and looks more
like the wrong stuff and this scene is aloof.  In reality, not all of
these men would pass the training course to cut the mustard is taking a
trip to outer space and this plot hole is about the silliest the film
has to offer.
The most unusual character in the film is a Russian cosmonaut on board
the space station Mir played by Peter Stormare.  The 'Fargo' reunion is
in this film.  He and Steve Buscemi appeared in 'Fargo' and are in this
film.  You remember Stormare as the thug who didn't say too much in
'Fargo' and who eventually cuts Buscemi's head off with an axe and
stuffed him into a wood chipper.  Stormare even sports the same type of
winter hat he had in 'Fargo' and I'm wondering if it's an in joke here.
Ditto on the 'Pulp Fiction' reunion.  'Pulp Fiction' even gets mentioned
in 'Armageddon' by one of the cast.  'Armageddon' has Bruce Willis and
Steve Buscemi.  Buscemi plays the Buddy Holly waiter in 'Pulp Fiction'.
The other giant meteor film, 'Deep Impact', released earlier this year
is better than this film because it had the human element more tightly
wound around it plot line and there really is no good reason why
'Armageddon' has to be two and a half hours long.  There are too many
silly scenes of corny dialogue and too much time is spent at the site of
the meteor which doesn't look convincing but the film's saving grace is
its eye popping special effects, booming sound effects and clever sets
which tower over the entire production.  Director Michael Bay ('The
Rock', 'Bad Boys') never gives the audience a chance to breathe and a
bit more subtlety would have been nice and while it is often said that
less is more, 'Armageddon' is still good to look at and a treat to
listen to and while the film comes out looking exactly the way the film
makers intended it to, it can't be all that bad but it's a film you'll
only want to see once.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Author
Jamahl Epsicokhan
This review contains some minor spoilers for the feature film
"Armageddon," but I promise not to give away any major revelations
concerning the plot.
Nutshell: Big, dumb, and expensive. Certainly not boring, but
certainly not unpredictable or memorable, either.
Cast includes: Bruce Willis (Harry S. Stamper), Billy Bob Thornton
(Dan Truman), Liv Tyler (Grace Stamper), Ben Affleck (A.J. Frost),
Will Patton (Charles (Chick) Chapple), Peter Stormare (Lev Andropov),
Keith David (General Kimsey), Steve Buscemi (Rockhound)
Distributed by Touchstone Pictures
Screenplay by Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, Gale Ann Hurd, and Michael Bay
Directed by Michael Bay
"Armageddon" is a technically skilled summer crowd-pleaser that's
about as deep tissue paper, with a brain that operates on the power of
a nine-volt battery. It's formulaic, predictable, and can't be taken
remotely seriously for more than about 10 seconds at a time. This is a
movie where you must walk in, instantly suspend all disbelief, see a
series of elaborate special-effects sequences on the screen, and never
once stop to think about any of it.
Then again, why on earth else would you want to see this movie? This
is what summer blockbusters are all about these days. If you go in
looking for anything deep or challenging, you're wasting your time.
What you'll get in "Armageddon" is all polish and no substance--a
story that will occupy your attention for 150 minutes and never really
bore you, but at the same time is something you can (and probably
will) forget about almost instantly afterward. It's effective
bubble-gum cinema--chewing gum for the mind. Considering we've already
covered the topic of cosmic collision once this year (see "Deep
Impact"), and that film was supposedly the more substantive episode of
angst, it seems only natural that this time when we go through the
cataclysmic exercise, we don't really stop to look at how people would
act with doomsday at hand. This is a nonstop action picture, plain and
simple.
"Armageddon" emerges from what I'm calling the Jerry Bruckheimer
school of cinema, an institute that brought us similar recent summer
escapism in the form of "Bad Boys," "The Rock," and "Con Air." Among
the alumni of this institution are directors Simon West ("Con Air"),
Tony Scott ("Top Gun," "Crimson Tide"), and of course Michael Bay
(this film, "Bad Boys," and "The Rock"). Bruckheimer's institute is
one that ensures no camera may be allowed to sit stationary (it must
always track or pan slowly), and that no shot be allowed to exist for
more than five or so seconds before there's a cut to another angle.
Oh, and the film must be wall-to-wall with music. (It's strange: The
above-mentioned Bruckheimer films used several different composers,
yet the score always sounds about the same.)
But never mind. "Armageddon" is in the tradition of large-scaled
summer disaster action. In this case, a meteor "the size of Texas" is
discovered to be on a collision course with Earth. With only 18 days
to stop it, NASA recruits expert oil driller Harry Stamper (Bruce
Willis) and his band of misfits to go up in space shuttles, drill a
hole deep into the asteroid, and detonate a nuclear bomb inside it to
shove it off course. Stamper wants things done right, and done his
way. He's the type of guy who, when he realizes his protege (Ben
Affleck) is sleeping with his daughter (Liv Tyler), he chases the guy
all through his oil rig with a loaded shotgun, and later confesses he
was just trying to scare him. (But of course!)
Once the movie gets into space, it's relentless in its visuals and
action sequences, but I can't say that I was particularly thrilled by
much of it. A steady diet of "extreme action" doesn't equate
excitement. It has to connect on some sort of emotional level. The
special effects merely grow tiring after awhile. Sure, they're more or
less convincing, but they're also so quickly edited together that
sometimes it just feels like random chaos on the screen. And there's
simply not enough invested in the story to make me believe that these
people were really saving the world, and not just going through the
motions of elaborate stunt coordination and digital artistry.
Besides, I've seen so many effects-laden movies lately that I just
don't find the eye candy all that tempting anymore. "Armageddon" plays
like a series of tasks: We have to promise our loved ones that we'll
succeed! We have to stop that asteroid before it hits us! We have to
get off this space station before it blows up! We have to cut the blue
wire before the bomb goes off! We have to crack our joke for this
scene to prove that we can be funny! Every scene is essentially the
same: Crisis, resolution, wry one-liner from Steve Buscemi. What's
lacking is cleverness, spontaneity, and interesting turns in the
action.
There are a couple of major snags for Our Heroes, but they're
derivative of snags we've seen over and over again in the movies.
(Name an action film where the heroes could actually trust the
government to do the right thing rather than being at the mercy of
bureaucratic officials who are persuaded by invisible advisers to take
what is so obviously the wrong action. Name an action film where a
countdown bomb isn't stopped with three seconds to spare. And so on.)
I think the main problem with the oversized disaster movies of recent
years is that they just make the stakes too laughably high.
"Independence Day," "Deep Impact," "Godzilla," and now
"Armageddon"--all are movies where the price of failure is the
destruction of the world and/or humanity itself. The outcome of what
lies in the story's background is always a foregone conclusion, yet
the characters still exist in a movie cliche world of discussing
trivial relationships and cracking one-liners when widespread dread
and despair should probably be winning out. "Armageddon" gets past
this problem by effectively ignoring it, keeping the end of the world
completely out of its mind except in the most superficial of ways. It
reduces "saving the world" to a goal which will earn its characters
hero status. Consider a scene where a large asteroid fragment hits
Paris, destroying half the city. Does anyone seem to care? Nope; it's
just an excuse for a "really cool special effect."
Can't we scale back just a little bit? Action and special effects are
certainly fun, but if the characters don't have to carry the
unfathomably ridiculous weight of saving the world upon their
shoulders, then won't there be a little more breathing room for the
standard examination of various relationships and personality quirks?
I tend to think so, because with the plot of "Armageddon" there's not
a twist or surprise to be found anywhere on the horizon. Everything
that happens follows the formula from A to B; every emotion is cued
with blatantly obvious manipulation; every bit of comic relief is
applied on cue; everything that happens can be anticipated five scenes
in advance.
Watching this movie, I felt like I was watching a large Hollywood
production trying so very hard to be huge, appealing, funny, and
entertaining. To a degree, it worked. Most of the performances are
right on target given their cardboard parameters, the suspense scenes
are sometimes taut and well-played (if hopelessly predictable), and
there are moments when the movie almost won me over before the formula
turned obvious and snapped me back into reality.
But never, for one moment, was the spell of sexy, shallow, visually
motivated cinema outweighed by the spell (or lack thereof) of
characters or story events. I could say I got caught up in isolated
pieces of the movie for brief moments at a time, but I can't say that
I was ever caught up in the flow of the narrative.
What this movie aspires to be is what you can find has been done 10
times better in "Apollo 13" (1995). When it comes down to it, both
films are about people in high-pressure situations trying to perform.
The difference is that "Apollo 13's" suspense was believable on human
terms, making it more exciting. "Armageddon" is just big and dumb.
Even so, if you just want overblown, overwrought, over-sensational
comic book summer entertainment that fully knows just how loony it is,
then "Armageddon" delivers. If you want characters that are even
remotely complex, or a plot that doesn't exist for the sole sake of
special effects sequences and cardboard manipulation, then please look
elsewhere.
-----
Copyright (c) 1998 by Jamahl Epsicokhan, all rights reserved.
Unauthorized reproduction or distribution of this article is
prohibited.
Jammer's Movie Reviews - http://www.epsico.com/movies/
Jamahl Epsicokhan - jammer@epsico.com

Author
Berge Garabedian
The second asteroid movie of the summer (see DEEP IMPACT (6.5/10))
finds Michael Bay and Jerry Bruckheimer teaming up for yet another one
of their infamous summer blockbuster entries. This is their latest
collaboration after THE ROCK (7/10) and BAD BOYS (7.5/10). Bay used to
direct television commercials and music videos (Among many others, he
did "Falling in Love is Hard on the Knees" for Aerosmith in 1997, and
"I Touch Myself" by Divinyls.)
PLOT:
The end of the world is near. An asteroid that's the size of Texas is
going to crash into Earth in about 18 days, and obliterate all of
humanity. The only way to veer its course from our planet is to send up
a crew of professional drillers, who will attempt to insert a nuclear
bomb deep inside the monstrous rock. Time is limited, the best people
for the job appear to be misfits in every other dimension of life, and
the world awaits its fate.
CRITIQUE:
Two words: "fun stuff". This movie is exciting, packed with action,
humour, some tender moments, and doesn't pretend to be anything more or
less than it's supposed to be: a nacho-munching, popcorn-eating
cheese-fest of special effects, fun and 144 minutes of brainless
entertainment. And within those guidelines, it comes through like
gangbusters! Unlike DEEP IMPACT, this film flies along without too many
slow moments, and slaps you in the face every time things appear to be
slowing down. It's also packed with a little more special effect fun
than a mere tidal wave sequence (As slick as that sequence was in the
earlier asteroid movie, it doesn't compare to all of the festivities in
this one.)
Obviously, character development has never been the strong suit of any
Bruckheimer film, but even with that tidbit of knowledge in tow, I'm
not afraid to admit that I didn't suffer a touch of the ol' wet-eye
nearing the end of this well-rounded movie. The characters were
obviously interesting enough for me to care about them, and the style
of the film was fun enough for me to pay attention throughout its
entire whacked-out ride. The acting was passable, with Willis pulling
off a "regular guy" without too many wise cracks this time, Affleck
doing his shtick to perfection, and Tyler, well, being there. Steve
Buscemi of RESERVOI R DOGS (9/10) fame also deserves a nod for being
the perfect wise-cracker in this one (And boy, are his teeth ever
crooked or what??) 
On the negative side, I guess the film could've been trimmed by about
half an hour, as the training sequences at the beginning of the film
did seem to drag at times, as did the drilling scenes near the end. The
Aerosmith tunes were also a bit too obvious and a bore. I suppose one
could also complain about the implausibilities of some of the film's
events, but fortunately for me, I know not to go into a film of this
sort with expectations of a documentary. The superiority of the
wonderful land of America was also a bit of an eyebrow-raiser in this
flag-waving piece, but I suppose we can't expect more for the weekend
of Independence Day, right?
Overall, this film tied me to my seat, peppered me some great special
effects, plenty of rock 'n roll, a bunch o' fun, action, a decent plot
line, and an ending that tugged at most heart-strings (Mrs. JoBlo had
to let loose on this puppy as well, but not as much tearage was shed as
was in DEEP IMPACT.) I had a great time in this film, and I would
suggest it to all those people who like to go a film because of its
sheer entertainment value, and not necessarily because of a higher
meaning or intrinsic value to society. This flick was a blast! Get your
tickets, warm up the nachos, bring in some tissues, turn your brain off
at the door, and get ready to be genuinely socked around a
rollercoaster of fun and excitement for the first time of the summer of
1998!
Little Known Facts: 
Watch for at least three references to other films in this one. The
first takes a jab at GODZILLA (6/10), the other makes an obvious nod to
DR. STRANGELOVE (7.5/10), and then of course, the entire "slow-motion
astronauts walking to the shuttle" sequence with tips its hat to THE
RIGHT STUFF.
Some re-writes on this film were done by Scott Rosenberg, Robert Towne,
Paul Attanasio and Ann Biderman.
Liv Tyler stands 5"10, is the daughter of Steven Tyler (lead singer of
Aerosmith) and had a cameo role in Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE
YOU (6.5/10), which was cut. Having said that, Allen was impressed
enough by her performance to write a personal letter explaining that
her part was cut in editing.
In 1995, director Michael Bay was honored by the Directors Guild of
America as Commercial Director of the Year. At Cannes, he also won the
Gold Lion for the best Beer Campaign for Miller Lite, and a Silver Lion
for his "Got Milk?" campaign.
Before taking up acting, Steve Buscemi tried to become a NYC Fireman.
Ellen Cleghorn of Saturday Night Live fame makes a cameo appearance in
this film as the doctor who performs the undesirable act of protruding
the crew's bottom-sides for clinical purposes.
Charlton Heston is the narrator of this film.

Author
Bill Chambers
ARMAGEDDON *1/2 (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers
(Film, DVD, LD reviews! A section where YOU can recommend movies!
Fabric softener! All in one!
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers
New address. New attitude. Same purple prose.)
starring Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck
written by Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J.  Abrams
directed by Michael Bay
It rocks-actually, lots of rocks fly at us or from us, in slow or
fast motion, at several points in the film. They seem like dangerous
rocks because they kind of twirl through the air instead of just
propelling forward, and when they land-once in a while, when we
need a break from the space sequences-they cause damage enough to
destroy the Chrysler building and the like. (Nary a mention of these
apocalyptic events is made after they occur.) They also just might be
the most interesting element of ARMAGEDDON, a steroid user's answer
to Deep Impact.
Bruce Willis stars as Harry Stamper, a famed oil-driller commissioned
by the White House and NASA to stop a giant asteroid before it travels
beyond "zero barrier" and destroys our planet. Why an oil driller?
They require someone experience with deep-core mining to plant a
nuclear missile into said asteroid. (In one unintentionally (?)
hilarious sequence, NASA asks Harry to inspect a deep-core driller
they built based on his blueprints; it is poorly constructed-Harry
criticizes almost every aspect of it. We trust NASA to build space
shuttles?) Harry assembles the obligatory "ragtag" bunch of "cowboys",
including a blond guy, a fat guy, a black guy, a wiseass, and the man
who is sleeping with his daughter (Affleck). Once they reach space, we
experience sequence after sequence of something going wrong-perhaps
the fact that they sent a bunch of nincompoops into outer space has
something to do with it; I cannot count the number of times they
almost fail the mission on all my fingers and toes. Whether or not
they save the day, I will not reveal. Nor will you care.
I will say this: you know you're in trouble when Deep Impact dwarfs
your asteroid movie in terms of emotion and scope. Willis has barely a
chance to come alive; ditto for Affleck.  Their big scenes are mostly
reserved for the third act, in a last minute-and futile-attempt
to inject warmth into the material. Steve Buscemi's
character-the wiseass-is exceptionally problematic. "Rockhound",
as he's called, is sarcastic and foolish, so they tape him to a
chair, where he spends most of the film. So why did they bring him up
there to begin with? Rather, why write him into the film?-give his
almost-witty one-liners to serious Willis, who scowls and mopes and
demonstrates psychotic tendencies: at one point he chases after
Affleck with his shotgun for screwing his daughter, firing often and
causing significant damage to his oil rig. I'm guessing he
qualifies under NASA guidelines as someone unfit for space travel, at
least in my world where the sky is blue. Liv Tyler is pretty and
humourless, as always; suspiciously, four of her father's band's
("Aerosmith") songs grace the soundtrack. Director Michael Bay lays
the visual and sound effects on thick, like ketchup, eventually
drowning the movie on-screen. (The middle hour is a non-sensical,
pyrotechnic assault on the average primate's brain.) Whenever
someone dies in this movie, a crew member inevitably yells out "We
lost (insert dead person's last name here)!" I must admit that not
once could I distinguish a dead oil-guy-cum-astronaut from a live one,
and close-ups of the corpses' faces beneath cracked helmets
provided little assistance, as their skin was often covered in fake
blood.
ARMAGEDDON is not as terrible movie as Godzilla. It looks nicer, and
has fewer plot-holes within its equally ludicrous framework. It has a
vivid soundmix. But at almost two-and-a-half hours, I could not
believe how little actually happened over the course of the story. The
love story has been played up in the ads, perhaps hoping to catch
people before they recover from Titanic-fever. Bollocks! The lovers in
the film are miles apart throughout-erase all thoughts of nude
sketching or car-sex and replace them with obligatory shots of Liv
Tyler tearing up while Ben Affleck dicks around in a moon-crawler.
Remember a little film called Jaws? In this film, three
independent-minded men suddenly found themselves on a fishing boat in
pursuit of a deadly shark. They didn't much like each other at
first; eventually, they started to respect one another. One of
Jaws' great scenes involved the would-be-Ahabs drinking and singing
songs and telling stories. This is the sort of male-bonding foreign to
Bay or his producer, Jerry Bruckheimer, who throw too many characters
into the mix and expect we'll care about them on the grounds that
the world is about to end. Not once do we get the feeling that these
characters are even acquaintances-I'd be surprised if these
actors bothered to introduce themselves to one another before "action"
was called. A male friend who loved the film suggested to me that
perhaps I cannot relate to a bunch of men who don't bare their
souls, who believe in dying macho concepts like heroism and a kind of
chest-beating bravery. To this, I will respond that the boys in
ARMAGEDDON are neither heroic, nor brave, nor smart, even: this team
couldn't build a birdhouse. And if I get no respect for disliking a
movie with all the synthetic feeling of a trailer-a trailer for a
movie written by a team of body-builders and greeting card
authors-I've never been a prouder wimp my whole life.

Author
Mark O'Hara
Thanks for the message about my X Files review.  Enclosed is one
for ARMAGEDDON.
When ARMAGEDDON opened on July 1, my son and I visited the only cinema 
in our small city.  We entered the largest auditorium, which was the 
original theater, circa 1930's.  (Three much smaller screens were added 
recently to please the college crowd.)
For close to two hours we viewed the film, watching as NASA discovered 
they had 18 days to figure a way to save the planet from an asteroid the 
size of Texas;  we followed the escapades of the world's best 
oil-drilling crew, led by Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis), as they 
hurriedly trained to drill 800 feet into the asteroid and plant a 
warhead.  We arrived almost at the climax, both space shuttle crews 
coping with crises in outer space.  Then the projector quit!  Rather, 
the sound quit first, and we were treated to the amplified banter of the 
teenage staff until they realized the problem and killed the projector.
We were glad finally when the harried manager refunded our money;  they 
had monkeyed around so much, restarting the film and failing for over 
half an hour, that the narrative had lost all continuity for us.
So when we tried again today in a multiplex in the county seat, we knew 
most of what we would see.  And hear.  First of all, ARMAGEDDON is very 
loud, especially on state-of-the-art sound systems.  Starting with the 
title sequence, the fiery pieces of "ARMAGEDDON" break up and rush 
toward the viewer with menacing racket.  The explosions are deafening as 
well:  but they occur in context, and count as a convincing part of very 
slick special effects.  What I noticed during both viewing attempts was 
the bad science that happened each time large objects rushed through the 
vacuum of space.  They groaned and galumphed past each other like mad 
Jabberwocks, the space rock past the moon, the shuttles past the 
camera's eye -- whooshes engineered to inspire awe. 
Then there is the trite characterization.  Having already met most of 
the deep-sea drillers when Harry chases A. J. Frost (Ben Affleck) around 
after finding him with daughter Grace (Liv Tyler), we are subjected to 
countless scenes in which each crew member's eccentricities are further 
highlighted.  Moreover, we must sit through almost remedial explanations 
of space protocol, including Dan Truman's (Billy Bob Thornton) spelling 
out of the exact mission.  Apparently director Michael Bay and the 
multiple writers forgot that APOLLO 13 educated movie-goers about 
sling-shotting around the moon, as well as about the particulars of 
gravity.
The acting does not draw as many complaints.  Bruce Willis plays a very 
likable drilling expert, a leader well-liked by his crew.  His timing 
seems especially good during the action sequences.  Only toward the end, 
when Stamper has no less than two tear-jerking scenes that rival the 
sentimental schlock of Forrest Gump's talking to Jenny's gravestone, is 
the acting over the top.  And that is the script's fault.  Rock-faced 
Billy Bob Thornton smiles only a few times, but manages a solid and 
sympathetic performance.  Liv Tyler, the only female aside from a token, 
beautiful astronaut, acts well off Harry and off her love interest, A. 
J., her wide lips alternately pouting and puckering.  William Fichtner 
plays Colonel Willie Sharp, the shuttle pilot charged with ensuring the 
success of the mission, with expert coldness;  he's the closest to a 
human villain, though he reminded me of the psychotic SEAL in THE ABYSS.
Other strong points are editing and cinematography.  From sweeps around 
the NASA conference room to quick close-ups, from split-second 
backgrounds (that was Michael Bay in one, no?) to the simulated, 
striking aerial view of the double launch, the camera work tells the 
story with stylistic, often frenetic motion.  Once again, though, the 
script intrudes:  the result, well-shot but terribly clichéd montages, 
many showing Bay's vision of a type of classic America, people listening 
to news of the catastrophe, gathered in a Mayberry-like barber shop or 
sitting in vintage pickups, near American flags and farmhouses.  In one 
shot a group of boys even runs past a clapboard store sporting a faded 
campaign mural of JFK!  I got the notion I was back in the first days of 
the old theater, and could walk out into the slightly fuzzy, pure 
American air, the dust motes of nostalgia floating around me.
I enjoyed the ending more than I thought I would, after seeing the 
beginning and middle twice.  ARMAGEDDON is just above average as summer 
entertainment, but I would advise finding a theatre that is neither too 
cold nor too loud, and that owns a projector with a fully functioning 
platter system.


Author
Rob Ehrlich
Directed by Michael Bay
Produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, Michael Bay, Gale Anne Hurd
Written by Jonathan Hensleigh (8 other people too)
After watching Armageddon I realized that I had watched an extremely
long commercial.  A 150 minute commercial to be exact.  The director,
Michael Bay, had me interested in the beginning of the film, and I began
to think that it would be like The Rock in outer space.  But the only
thing that was pretty much the same about both films was Michael Bay's
style, Jerry Bruckheimer as producer, John Schwartzman as
Cinematographer, and Jonathan Hensleigh as the writer who wasn't
credited for The Rock.  All of these guys can't make a good film?  OH!
I'm sorry. I forgot about the other eight writers for this film.
They're the ones that had the characters say lines such as:
"It's gonna blow!" "It's gonna blow!" "It's gonna blow!" "It's gonna
blow!" "It's gonna blow!"
"It's gonna blow!" "It's gonna blow!" "It's gonna blow!" "It's gonna
blow!" "It's gonna blow!"
One "It's gonna blow!" for each writer, and one more for good luck.  If
I want to here someone say "It's gonna blow!" or see something that is
going to "blow", then I'd see a Russ Myer film.
I did "enjoy" the film, but I won't say any bad things about Michael Bay
or Jerry Bruckheimer because they are good film-makers.  I guess im so
disappointed because I was waiting since last year for this film to come
out.  Now I have to wait till late November for Bruckheimer to redeem
himself with Tony Scott's Enemy of the State.  And I'll have to wait
even longer till Bay gets another project.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:   Bruce Willis, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Billy Bob Thornton,
            Steve Buscemi, Michael Duncan
DIRECTOR:   Michael Bay
WRITERS:    Tony Gilroy and Shane Salerno
RATED/YEAR: PG-13/1998
        "Armageddon" is the latest in a recent flood of films about big
rocks striking the Earth, a subject Hollywood can't seem to get enough of.
Roger Corman, known primarily for his many low-budget horror films of the
'50s, began the trend with last year's TV mini-series, "Asteroid."  This
summer has already seen the release of "Deep Impact," and while "Armageddon"
is a better film than either of its predecessers, it may nonetheless be
too little too late to satisfy movie-goers.
        The story is straightforward enough.  Several small meteorites
have struck New York City, causing extensive damage to life and property.
NASA discovers that these small rocks are but a prelude: an asteroid the
size of Texas is on a collision course with Earth.  The rock's size means
that it's a "planet killer," with the potential to destroy all life on
Earth, right down to the bacteria.
        Realising that no amount of weapons fired from the Earth's surface
will stop the asteroid, NASA chairman Dan Truman (an excellent Billy Bob
Thornton) sends a team to intercept it.  Their mission: drill 8OO feet into
the surface of the rock, plant a nuclear bomb inside, then detonate it once
they are safely away.  The resulting explosion should split the asteroid in
two, causing it to miss the Earth.
        Bruce Willis (Die Hard) plays oil-driller Harry Stamper, recruited
to head the mission because of his expertise drilling into unusual types of
rock.  Also along for the ride are A.J. (Ben Affleck), Rockhound (Steve
Buscemi), Bear (Michael Duncan) and several other professional drillers.
Although the team doesn't particularly like each other, they are forced to
work together against a common obstacle.  Since this is a Hollywood film,
the act naturally brings them closer together.
        This should be a compelling story in its own right, but director
Michael Bay and screenwriters Gilroy and Salerno don't seem sure of their
ability to make it interesting; as such, they throw tons of ridiculous
subplots into the mix.  This is the sort of film where if there's even the
slightest chance for something to go wrong, it will.  So naturally the
drill gets stuck, the timer on the nuclear bomb doesn't work, levers break
off in our heroes' hands at critical times for no particular reason... well,
you get the idea.  This film turns "suspension of disbelief" into an art
form.  After a while, these misfortunes cease to be suspenseful and become
laughable.
        Like "Deep Impact," "Armageddon" has the obligatory disfunctional
family.  Tea Leoni does not get along with her father in "Deep Impact";
Bruce Willis does not get along with his daughter in "Armageddon."  Leoni
hates her father's new girlfriend in "Impact"; Willis hates his daughter's
boyfriend (played by Affleck's character) in "Armageddon."  Leoni and
father reconcile in "Impact"; Willis and daughter reconcile in "Armageddon."
How sweet.  It might be remotely interesting if I hadn't just seen it.
        "Armageddon" won't go down as a sci-fi classic, but it's probably
worth a peek.  What sets it apart from the other rock flicks is not its
intelligence (which is only average), nor its special effects (which are
fine, though not extraordinary).  The acting is the key here, and the cast
does not disappoint.  Tyler and Affleck are a great screen couple, the
epitome of young lovers who are uncertain of the future and what it may
bring.  Thornton is also excellent as the NASA official helping out the
team from the ground.
        Surprisingly, humor is a big part of the film's charm; witness Steve
Buscemi (Reservoir Dogs, The Wedding Singer), who's played primarily for
laughs here and comes through in spades.  His observations about the
space shuttle's construction are particularly entertaining.  Other moments
to look for: an amusing cameo by Godzilla in the film's opening scene, a
Russian cosmonaut afflicted with a serious case of space madness, and the
wonderful scenes in which the crew members undergo NASA psychological
testing.
        Although Aerosmith is not credited with the film's musical score,
they do perform the lion's share of the tunes.  No doubt this is because
Liv Tyler (daughter of Stephen, Aerosmith's lead singer) stars.  If you
like Aerosmith, you're in for a treat.  If you don't... well, sorry.
        I hope this film does well at the box office.  Not because it's
a great artistic achievment, mind you; I simply want director Michael
Bay to make enough money to buy a tripod.  I've never seen a movie so
afraid of static shots.  Some scenes vibrate as though the cameraman was
bouncing around the set on a pogo stick; others make me wonder if the
photographer mistook the camera for an etch-a-sketch and was trying to
erase the picture he'd drawn.  The visual style of the film is often quite
effective, though, particularly in the outer space sequences.  My
recommendation?  Bring along some Dramemine, check your brain at the door,
and just enjoy the ride.
This review was originally written: July 5, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Author
Fox Davidson
  In one of the most hyped films of the past decade, Armageddon is a 
mega-bust.  A disaster flick that is a disaster on every level.  Not even 
Bruce Willis can save this expensive, incoherent, derivative mess.
  Following in the superior Deep Impact's heels, Armageddon tells the mudding 
tale of an asteroid the size of Texas on a collision course with Earth.  The 
film fails to mention how this particular hunk of space rock was detected by 
NASA, or even the inept script-hole that shows a U.S. spacecraft being 
obliterated in orbit by a comet shower, followed by the destruction of 
Manhattan. Oops.  NASA couldn't see that?  I guess when you are Billy Bob 
Thornton (playing a NASA official), you kinda wonder how such a wonderful 
actor as yourself is reduced to rubish like Armageddon.
  Willis plays Harry Stamper, "the world's best oil driller," who is called 
into action (just like it Die Hard, Mercury Rising, Die Hard 2!).  I have no 
idea why Harry, and his retarted group of drillers, are called for a job that 
if failed, would mean the end of life as we know it.  I guess it would seem 
cooler to have a bunch of dudes rescuing us from complete death and 
destruction than some smart, well-mannered scientist-cume-Amercian hero.
  The DVD of the movie is okay.  It contains a trailer, I believe a 
commentary (I was so looking forward to taking this disc out of my machine, I 
didn't notice), and some other mumbo jumbo.  The soundtrack is wide and good, 
but, like the cast, this disc is just worthless.

Author
me@alanine.ram.org
/Armageddon/ is a taut fast-paced thriller which starts off great but
gets tiresome toward the end.  The plot is simple: an asteroid is
headed on a collision course toward Earth.  To stop it, the US
government sends a bunch of roughneck oil drillers into space to drill
a hole in the asteroid so they can drop and detonate a nuclear weapon
inside, before it is too late.
The problem with disaster movies is that it is very hard to find an
antagonist, i.e., someone you hate by the end of the movie. After all,
an asteroid or a volcano or a twister doesn't give a rat's arse about
what humans think (it can't).  Some movies try to cast natural
disasters as either a force out to teach us a lesson or as an evil
entity.  Wisely enough, the primary focus in /Armageddon/ is the
motley crew and not the rock floating through space.
I thought the visual effects were cheesy and the dialogue was corny.
The character (we're introduced to one too many) development is
non-existent.  The acting is mixed: Bruce Willis is a great actor and
he gets a lot of the spot light. Most of the other actors are just
there for the entertainment value.  Christopher Walken..., er, William
Filkner does a good job as captain of the space shuttle, but he
appears to be the only one taking the movie seriously.  Liv Tyler and
Ben Affleck, as lovers, have the chemistry of oil and water.  The
sound track is dated (music by Trevor Rabin, who, although a great
musician, could've done better here).
The one saving grace is that the action and suspense sequences are
great.  The attempts at humour work for the most part and make this
movie enjoyable. Worth the matinee fare.


Author
Mario Muredda
Ahh, the elusive summer movie. Expectations run
dry, and mindless moviegoers scurry to theatres in
delight. If you are one of those mindless
moviegoers, odds are, you have seen Armageddon.
Certainly a loud film, a truly neccessary quality
in order to be a summer blockbuster, Armageddon
will please its targeted audience, and disapoint
everyone else, to my understanding. I went to this
film with an open mind, and expected the worst,
and surprisingly, I didn't get it. What I did get
though, (and pardon my being harsh,) was a loud,
obnoxious, and relatively stupid film, that is
Armageddon. After seeing that, one may wonder,
"Where does the **1/2 come from?" It comes from
the (and this time, pardon my being cheesy) heart.
Even though I am almost certain you have all ran
screaming for the back button by now, I have an
explanation. In Deep Impact, the emotion was
almost impossible to relate to. All of the
characters were so cheap and terrible. In
Armageddon, people may say, "Oh, those are just
'wooden' performances", while I say, no, they were
normal people, portraying normal people, not going
for amazing acting, not even trying to act, the
true gift of real actors. Most people will either
think I am crazy, or simply refering to the
Affleck/Tyler relationship. Nope. In fact I
thought that was one of the most distracting
storylines in the film, after all, it involved
Bruce Willis chasing after the person he "loves
like a son" with a shotgun scene. There was only
10 minutes focus on that story, and neither actor
nor actress could pull it off believably. Sorry
Liv and Ben. Anyway, I thought the Bruce Willis
and Liv Tyler subplot was the best, because, they
made an icredibly believeable family on their own,
minus, the cornballish, "goodbye" scene at the
end. Don't worry, I spoiled nothing, you can see
it coming 150 minutes before it comes (Hmm...the
film's running time. Coincidence? I shit you not.)
Well, onto the big guns now. The action packed
scenes are where the thumbs down comes in. Stupid
and unrealistic, these may make you go deaf for
the purpose of keeping you in the theatre. While a
few of these sequences may actually be entertaing,
some are completely oblivious to the fact, that
they are making absolutely no sense, such as one
on a refuelling station in space that serves for
no purpose but to get the shit blown out of it.
Steve Buscemi delivers the same old performance,
that got a few laughs out of me, while Bruce
Willis is always a cocky, ballzy, tough as nails
character that we all want to see kick a comet's
tail. Liv Tyler is hot (I mean come on, is there
any other reason for her being here, aside from
Mr. Big Lips himself, no not Mick Jagger, landing
her a job on THE money maker of the summer?), and
Ben Affleck lacks the charm he carried in Good
Will Hunting (THE best film of all time) Another
minus though I have to say before closing was
stealing from former blockbusters, and from not so
blockbusters, (almost lifting a few lines of
dialogue directly out of Batman and Robin) Well,
that's it. Aremageddon: 6.5/10, Deep Impact: 7/10.
Looks like the firstborn is triumphant. If only
that would be the case in the box office!

Author
John W. Collins
        There is a widely held theory that a giant meteor slammed into
the Earth, 65 million years ago and knocked the dinosaurs off their
high perch as the dominant species of this planet. There is also a
widely held belief that one day another meteor will strike and knock
Man from that same lofty position. The first is just a theory that has
never really been proven as fact, and the latter is just idle
speculation. But while we are on the subjects of theories and
speculations, I would like to discuss another theory that is gaining
popularity and acceptance. This new train of thought is not coming out
of such distinguished places as MIT, or Stanford, but out of
Hollywood. That is the theory that if you can dazzle your audience
with enough special effects, fast-paced editing, loud enough
soundtracks, and constant camera movements, you can convince them that
instead of seeing something that is substandard, they are really
seeing something great; something that they can sit and stare in awe
at; something that they can recommend to their friends to do too.
Unfortunately, for us, the movie-going-public, many studios,
producers, directors, and to some extent, writers, are moving forward
with this theory and trying to prove it as fact. Touchtone pictures
just spent 140 million dollars and exposed two-and-a-half hours of
film stock to try and prove this Hollywood hypothesis by bringing us,
ARMAGEDDON.
        Directed by Michael Bay(BAD BOYS, THE ROCK)and staring action
hero icon, Bruce Willis, ARMAGEDDON is a special effects filled, high
octane thrill ride where images are thrown at you almost at the speed
at which the meteor in the film is approaching Earth at, 27,000 miles
per hour. Then thanks to the fast-paced editing and a camera that
hardly ever stays in one place for more than a few seconds, these
visuals are gone in the blink of an eye, thus giving the illusion that
something spectacular and exciting is happening up on the screen when
it is all just smoke and mirrors. Sadly, this is what is happening in
ARMAGEDDON.Unlike its predecessor, DEEP IMPACT, this "mankind is
doomed" tale relied on its special effects and directorial style to
tell its story, rather than its characters.
        After an orbiting space shuttle and parts of New York City are
destroyed by a hail of meteors the size of basketballs and small cars,
NASA realizes that that was just a precursor and that another meteor
the size of Texas will arrive in just 15 days and end Man's reign on
Earth. Our only hope is to land a team of deep-core drillers on the
space rock, drill an 800-foot deep hole, drop a nuke in it, then leave
and detonate from a safe distance. Simple. Right? 
        Of course, Willis is the best driller on the planet and is
tapped to do the job. After insisting  that he take his own team, we
are introduced to a group of cliched, social misfits that are far from
having the "Right Stuff." The group consists of: the young hot
shot(played by Ben Affleck)that is also involved in a weak subplot
romance with Willis' daughter(played by Liv Tyler), the loyal best
friend, the comedy relief character, the token black, the loveable fat
guy, and a couple of throw away characters that you know won't last
long after the mission begins. We also pick up a kooky Russian
cosmonaut along the way. 
        But the cliches don't end there. Once the mission is underway,
everything that can go wrong, does go wrong. More than once we hear
that the mission has failed and that Earth is doomed. At one point,
CNN goes off the air so they can be with their families. We get
everything: they landed at the wrong site and the rock there will be
tougher to drill through, the surface of the meteor is breaking up
around them, they are running out of drill heads and transmissions,
the time to safely explode the bomb so the meteor will be split in
half and miss the Earth is running out, and the shuttle will not start
when it is time to haul ass.And that is just a few. There is even a
series of events on the ground where the old "scientists vs. the
mility" senario is played out. Then  there is an ending that anyone
with half a brain can see coming a mile away.
        What all this boils down to is poor script writing. Not only
is the script full of cliches, but they are plot holes big enough for
this Texas-sized meteor to pass through. It has been reported that at
least nine writers contributed to the script. Never a good sign. But
as we discussed earlier, the thinking is you can cover all this up
with dazzling special effects, fast editing, and dizzying camera
movements. But while that is fun and exciting to look at, it is lazy
film making. The story should be first and foremost and the rest
should be used to enhance that story. It is on this point that
ARMAGEDDON failed and DEEP IMPACT succeeded. The latter was character
driven. While ARMAGEDDON was character driven to a small
degree(especially at the end), it was a road we had all been down many
times before. There is a line in the movie where after seeing the
motley crew that has been assembled to save the world, someone says,
"Is that the best you could do?" After seeing ARMAGEDDON, we should be
asking the same of the director and screen writers.
Staring: Bruce Willis, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler, Billy Bob Thornton,
Will Patton, and Steve Buscemi.
Rated PG-13 for intense situations
I Give it ** out of a possible four.

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
Hello kids.  Today the movie studios want to take over my critical
review, and somehow persuade you that _Armageddon_, the summer's biggest
blockbuster, is a film for everybody. And remember, if a film is for
_everybody_, and if it makes the most money for the summer, it _must_ be
good, right?
Armageddon is a COMEDY, with a capital "C".  It stars BRUCE WILLIS, who
has a hundred one-liners!  It has a tiny rock land directly in the
middle of a heated argument in New York City!!  And, chuckle, chuckle,
one of those New Yorkers, _survives_, with charcoal all over his face!!
Snorkle, *sniff*, hiccup.  And it has Steve Buscemi as a _genius_ who
wants to work for an oil rig?  Knee-SLAP!!  Isn't this just so, so,
funny!?
Armageddon also has ROMANCE, with a capital "R".  It has a tender moment
between *forbidden lovers* Ben Affleck and Liv Tyler, with, with, Animal
Crackers!  And it has Will Patton as a long lost husband trying to
reunite with his separated wife and child, who thinks he's a SALESMAN!
Gurgle, *sniff*, awwwww.  And it has Steve Buscemi spewing more
one-liners about minors and strippers.  Umm, moving right along...
Armageddon also has lots of ACTION, with a capital "A".  Not just any
action sequence would do.  It must have _original_ action sequences that
are designed to thrill.  Like, DRILL, darn it, DRILL!!!  And, let's have
inept people destroy the MIR space station!!  Can't you hear your heart
beating!?  And Steve Buscemi goes crazy and starts shooting at people!!
What drama!!
Lastly, Armageddon is out there to save the PLANET, with a capital "P".
This can't be any old thriller--we must have an asteroid, the size of
Texas head straight for earth!!  And, and, we must have beautiful scenic
worldwide shots, like Paris, BLOWN UP.  And, and, we must have peoples
of all colors, nations, and religions, join hand in hand for one final,
hopeful, HUG.  The final sequence, where Muslims in prostrate worship
stand up--in Domino fashion--to cheer the victory, filled me with such
emotional goo that I wanted to, to, to rip the screen into shreds!!  I
mean, I mean, cheer for ecstatic joy!  (It was over).
Comedy. "C".  Romance.  "R".  Action.  "A".  Planet.  "P".  Okay, kids,
what does that spell?
Seriously, folks.  Any film that could take the indie-films' most
valuable talents, and throw it all away with a Bruce Willis vehicle, a
hundred-million dollar budget, but have cheap-o sets and lousy special
effects, is, bottom line, living proof that hell exists, and has made a
multi-picture deal with Universal.
In the midst of all the action, the terseness, the one-liners, the fake
sets, the overall WASTE of  TIME, I recognized Matt Malloy playing an
underwritten NASA technician ("Malloy, give me a reading").  Remember
him?  He was a principal player in last year's _In the Company of Men_,
a film that was more powerful, shocking, terrifying, funny, and shocking
than _Armageddon_ could ever aspire to be.  _Armageddon_ cost over $100
million to make.  _ITCOM_ cost a paltry $30,000.   Need I say more?

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
A bunch of good ol' boys are sent into space to bicker and eventually 
destroy yet another asteroid on an Earth-bound course. There is much 
shouting and explosions.
Starting late last year, we were subjected to teaser ads that declared 
"1998 is closer than you think!".  By June and the release of "Deep 
Impact", with teasers still coming thick and fast, I was beginning to 
wonder if that line was intended as a reminder to the filmmakers.  But 
"Armageddon" has arrived at last and proves to be much like other 
Bruckheimer productions (e.g. "Con Air", "The Rock"), only more so.  
And this is how it is:
As you all know, cosmic objects can't help but attack the North 
American continent and well known landmarks.  All it takes is a quick 
meteor shower on New York, the destruction of the Chrysler building 
(again) and NASA realises that it's in the middle of a disaster film.  
An asteroid "the size of Texas" is headed straight for Earth.  
Terrified by the idea of there being two Texases (or Texii), NASA 
honcho Billy Bob Thornton panics.  He's surrounded by a bunch of geeks 
and the only people who can solve problems like this are men, real men 
like ...
... restaurateur and sometime actor Bruce Willis, here playing a 
psychotic gun-nut.  When he's not threatening employees with a shotgun 
or being Oedipal with his daughter (Liv Tyler, rigid and with pupils 
the size of theoretical nuclear particles), Bruce is the best oil well 
driller on the planet .  So when Bruce is shown NASA's plan (as is 
traditional, land on asteroid, drill a hole and blow it up with a 
couple of nukes left over from the Cold War), he scoffs at the idea of 
sending astronauts to do a man's job.  What you really need is a group 
of psychotic gun-nuts.  The Michigan Militia aren't available, so 
Bruce's drillcrew are on the job.  As the crew contains Clear Eyed 
Singlet Hero (Ben Affleck), Mr Pink (Steve Buscemi), Big Black Dude, 
Cowboy and Retard, you realise you are about to descend into Character 
Actor Hell.
The oil crew kid around a lot while Ben Affleck and Liv Tyler make a 
bid for Most Annoying Screen Couple of All Time.  Realising that this 
quest is doomed (Richard Burton and Elizabeth Taylor having a lock on 
that title), they blast off for the asteroid, stopping only for some 
brief racism on a Russian space station.  Later the gravitational pull 
exerted by Bruce's ego causes one of the shuttles to crash, killing a 
lot of nameless astronauts and Ben Affleck.  In response the audience 
goes wild and Liv Tyler goes catatonic.  In fact the shock is so great 
that it reaches back in time and renders her catatonic from the 
beginning of the film.  But back on Earth, we can see people following 
the tribulations of our heroes.  Curiously enough, from these segments 
we can see that the population of the United States consists of (a) 
New York, and (b) some bucolic never-never-land, filmed through a 
foggy lens, populated by hayseeds who peer anxiously at the TV between 
holding soapbox derbys and mopping the cows.  Did they just splice in 
clips from "The Waltons"?
But things are going too well, and there's an hour of film and six 
gadzillion dollars of special effects to use up.  So, in short order 
(a) the military try and stab our boys in the back, (b) Mr Pink grabs 
a gun and starts shooting things, and (c) the asteroid attacks the 
crew.  Really.  All those hayseeds back in Ray-Bradbury-land look 
anxious and squint at their TVs.  Will our heroes make it before the 
precisely plotted deadline?
"Armageddon" is raucous, noisy, bigoted and dumb by turns.  It goes on 
for far too long, piles on the pathos and setbacks to the point of 
absurdity and is so intent on setting up its ragtag team as rebels 
and the only ones who can do the job, that everyone else looks 
incompetent.  Consider the basic absurdity of scenes like where the 
team hard bargains for its rewards.  (Think about it - cancel my 
parking tickets and give me a tax free income or the planet dies.)  
But "Armageddon" is the only BDP (Big Dumb Picture) of recent times to 
even partially succeed, with the sound and fury distracting you from 
plot idiocies.  There are even some good things about "Armageddon".  
At least it realises that there is a world outside of North America 
(unlike "Deep Impact") and deals with the disaster as a global event, 
complete with nice if cliched images of Parisian cafes, church 
services in Italy, prayer meetings in India.  A few of the supporting 
characters are well drawn too, and shine past the competitive 
overacting of the leads.  (Or underacting in Liv Tyler's case.)
All in all, one should not think too closely about this picture.  
Place your critical judgement aside and accept it as a disposable 
piece of entertainment that will quickly fade as you leave the cinema, 
leaving not even a bad taste behind.  [**/ok] and boutique 
beer on the Sid and Nancy scale.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (p.agapow@ic.ac.uk), Dept. Biology, Imperial College
"We were too young, lived too fast and had too much technology ..."

Author
Joy Wyse
If you're into explosions and destruction, there's a lot  in this film. 
It's another one of those "blow up the world" movies that have been done
many times before.   Every cliche that you've ever seen is here including
the "which color  wire do I cut?" scene.  It is totally predictable.  The
familiar format makes us ask, "Which of the supporting cast members will
die?"   You know what's coming before it happens.  But, I liked it.  Most
of the people who do, are females.  Hey, I even cried, even though I
expected the finale.  But I laughed, too, at some very funny lines.
Men, on the other hand, are more technical and more skeptical.  Truly, who
WOULD risk the future of the planet to Bruce Willis and a group of oil
drillers?  Surely, some other nation  would have had an alternate plan, or
would they really  all follow the lead of the good old US?  The big
question here is: Would it be easier to train astronauts to be drillers,
or drillers to be astronauts?  Or couldn't there have been half and half?
For me, this movie was pure escapism.  No, it isn't artistic.  It isn't
well-written or well-acted.   But for what it is, a "blow 'em up" movie. 
I really liked it.  I give it a B+.  And, I would definitely watch it
again.

Author
Homer Yen
The second movie featuring a big rock from space has hit movie theatres.
But despite the fact that this asteroid is the size of Texas and it's
imminent collision with Mother Earth would be so devastating that not
even bacteria would live, the movie's impact is surprisingly shallow.
Maybe it's because this movie comes only a scant 7 weeks after the
release of "Deep Impact", which had a very similar premise.   Or, maybe
it's because the movie makers tried to make this a fun film, but didn't
realize that rescuing humanity is not a lighthearted matter.  Whatever
the reason, the event that is "Armageddon" fails to live up to its hype.
There are only 18 days to impact when NASA learns of the oncoming
asteroid (their initial clue is a monstrous meteor shower that
pulverizes New York City with an awesome pyrotechnic display).  Pressed
for time and options, their desperate plan to save mankind is to drill a
hole into the core of the asteroid where they will lower and then
detonate a nuclear device.  If all goes well, the asteroid will split
apart and miss the planet entirely.  To accomplish this task, they
summon Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis), the world's foremost deep core
driller.  He's the kind of man who only trusts himself.  He closely
guards over his daughter (Liv Tyler) and rejects her wishes to be with
fellow oil driller A.J. (Ben Affleck), who is skilled at drilling, but
takes unnecessary risks without concern for others.  Harry thinks that
she deserves someone better than a roughneck.  A.J. is just one of a
motley crew of roughnecks (all with cool nicknames like Bear, Rockhound,
and Chick) that will accompany Harry and make the dangerous journey into
space.  These guys are truly the wrong stuff and the government
expresses deep concern over mission leader and NASA chief Dan Truman
(Billy Bob Thornton) for endorsing this plan.  But there's no more time,
and there are no other options.
"Armageddon" is actually a pretty nifty piece of summer fare.  It has
lots of nice special effects, but isn't overrun by them.  The meteor
showers are a wondrous spectacle.  Their flight to rendezvous with the
asteroid is also visually impressive.  And the story, for the most part,
finds a nice balance between Stamper as leader of the team and leader of
his family.  Thornton's role is also a nice touch as the quiet hero that
tries to rise above the bureaucracy.  I also like Tyler's understated
courage at a time when the two men that she loves the most may never
return.
However, this film comes across feeling more like a casual buddy movie
rather than a tense thriller.  None of Stamper's crew seemed to
internalize the importance of the mission.  During the journey into
space, I kept waiting for one of them to ask if they could drive the
space shuttle for a couple of million miles.  And for people who are on
an asteroid hurtling towards Earth at 22,000 mph, they looked amazingly
at ease.  Another minus was that scenes on the asteroid moved so fast
that I didn't have time to think.  Camera shots changed so frequently
that the 'moment' couldn't be absorbed.  The asteroid sequence in "Deep
Impact" was far more exciting and better thought out.  "Armageddon" does
have its moments filled with courage, spectacle and awe.  But the
audience just never really has the chance to get involved.

Author
Jason Wallis
Armageddon (1998) * * * (out of four)
Starring Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Ben Affleck, Liv Tyler, Will
Patton, Steve Buscemi, Michael Duncan and Keith David 
Directed by Michael Bay 
Rated PG-13 for planetary disaster, profanity and pillow talk 
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 
Released in 1998 
Running 150 minutes 
Armageddon, in itself, symbolizes everything that is wrong in modern
filmmaking. Stories have been replaced with special effects; character
development gets overshadowed by bad dialogue; plotting consists of a bunch
of shit getting blown up. Armageddon is as stupid, as loud and as shallow
as any movie you'll see come out this summer, or maybe even any other
summer. But I loved every freaking minute of it. 
Believe me, I'm just as shocked as you are. Hell, I don't even know why I
went to see it in the first place. The previews were so annoying that I
predicted this was going to be the worst film of the year, or at least in
the running. I'm sorry, but "Somebody dial 911!!!" isn't quite the tagging
that's going to sell a movie. It isn't too wise either to market the film
using the movie's stupidest lines ("Beam me up Scotty" - yeah, that sure is
great writing...). I mean, let's face it; Armageddon's previews rival The
Truman Show's as being some of the worst of the year. Neither of them even
come close to doing their respective films justice. 
Of course, you all know the story. When the Earth is threatened with total
annihilation via an asteroid the size of Texas, NASA calls in the US's top
oil drillers (!) to go into space (!) and implant a nuclear device
eight-hundred and someodd feet into the asteroid (!). 
In the coarse of all this mayhem, we are introduced to some interesting -
and not so interesting - characters. Belonging to the former group is
Rockhound (Steve Buscemi), a horny little womanizing genius who's always
full of wisecracks, even when flying into space at a huge amount of G's.
Also, there's the always cool-as-hell Billy Bob Thornton as Dan Truman, the
bigwig at NASA who recruits all the drillers. He kind of reminded me of Ed
Harris in Apollo 13, only without the intensity and great lines to deliver.
Then on the flip side of the coin is the tired, contrived character of
Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis, who does the whole movie employing with
annoying accent I can't quite place), the leader of the pack as well as Liv
Tyler and Ben Affleck as the token lovers you must have in any summer
movie. 
Basically, that's about it. As I said, this is hardly a film about plot.
It's another summer blockbuster with plot points that are beyond
unbelievable and dialogue and characters that are mostly completely wooden.
Case in point: NASA doesn't know that there is even an asteroid on it's way
until eighteen days before impact - huh? Another example: at one point in
the movie, two children are playing with toy space shuttles in front of a
poster of Kennedy. How pretentious is that???!!! Want another one? Okay;
before the oil drillers blast off into space, one of them starts singing
"Leaving on a Jet Plane", and soon, all the rest join in. Did Michael Bay
attend the school of sappy filmmaking before he made this picture? 
But naturally, all this sappiness, melodrama and special effects accumulate
to one bitchin' time at the movies. And don't get me wrong - despite all of
the things I found wrong with Armageddon, I still very much enjoyed it. So
even if you don't win one of McDonald's free tickets, it's still definitely
worth checking out. 

Author
Josh Schirmer
My feelings about this summer (in the movie department) are quite mixed.
There are a variety of movies in theaters right now, which is always a
plus, but most of them are so awful it's ridiculous to charge $7.00 to
see them. (Isn't that always the case?) But to balance the trash, there
have been some PHENOMENAL films, such as "The X-Files", "Mulan", or the
amazing "Truman Show".
It seems to me anything tagged as a blockbuster this summer has not
lived up to it's expectations, some not even coming close. "Deep Impact"
felt like it was missing something. "Godzilla" doesn't deserve ANY
attention, not even the negative stuff it's been getting. And next up on
the list for blockbuster expectation would have to be "Armageddon".
Hyped to the point of breaking, "Armageddon" looks like the typical crap
we've been dealt already. The previews make it out to be a shallow,
stupid-looking film with only special effects to draw us in. And who
really wants to see another meteor movie already? After all, doesn't bad
publicity generally mean bad movie?
"Armageddon" brings a "Titanic"-esque feelings, where human spirit and
hope seems to swell in every scene, where the emotion portrayed pulls at
the ol' heartstrings, where you feel everything the characters do. It's
a knockout a movie, something the whole family will be able to enjoy.
Bruce Willis is perfectly cast in his role, the dry wit and toughness
delivered with genuine feeling. Ben Affleck, although not able to beat
his performance in "Good Will Hunting", is believable and enjoyable (and
an easy way to draw legions of teenage girls). Billy Bob Thorton is
always a treat. And who doesn't love Steve Buschemi? Alas, Liv Tyler's
character is a tad one-dimentional, with a part that could have easily
been played by anyone. Nevertheless, she's always delightful, and her
smile brings a certain degree of shine to the screen. And the supporting
cast is well put-together, too.
The special effects are wonderful, and the cinematography is not unlike
"The Rock", with it's twisting angles and 'cool' panning. Can anyone
else smell an Oscar nomination...?
Like I said, summer's had it's ups and downs. "Armageddon" is definitly
an "up". It's nice to see that in today's modern age, where summer films
are built on special effects and nothing but, someone took the time to
put in the one thing other movies are missing: heart.
Take the whole family. There's something for everyone. You, too, deserve
"front row tickets to the end of the world".

Author
John Strelow
Armageddon (written by Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams, directed by
Michael Bay, 1998)
When you look up "guilty pleasure" in the cinema encyclopedia, there is
a still from ARMAGEDDON.  You probably won't recognize the still,
however; Michael Bay and his editors cut images together so quickly that
this film may have more individual shots than any other feature ever
made (it's 2 1/2 hour running time adds to that).  ARMAGEDDON is
essentially a cross between the spectacle/disaster film made popular
from THE ROBE to THE TOWERING INFERNO to INDEPENDENCE DAY and the
over-baked melodrama of TITANIC, only without the former's stodginess
and latter's damning pretentiousness.  It's the type of film where most
plot twists don't make any sense (machine guns in space?  Hello?), where
characters are likely to say dumb things as much as possible, and
everything blows up real good.
     Adding to the guilt for some and to the pleasure for others is the
unabashed right-wing tendencies of your typical Jerry Bruckheimer
production.  Go back to CRIMSON TIDE (Tony Scott, 1995), THE ROCK (Bay,
1996), and CON AIR (Simon West, 1997).  It's all there:  respect for the
military, the necessity of family (notice how the Nic Cage character in
THE ROCK cannot get married until he has become a "man" by learning to
kill people to get the job done), and the occasional blatant homosexual
stereotype (thankfully left out of ARMAGEDDON).  Add in a twist of
self-sacrifice, a squeeze of loyalty, and two pinches of patriotism, and
you have your Jerry Bruckheimer production.  Bruce Willis even has a
delicious moment where he declares his crew should have a night with
their families, an "order" he gives while standing in front of the Stars
and Stripes.  The Family is America, and you better believe it.
     Bruckheimer has employed once again Michael Bay, who is very good
at blowing things up on camera.  Mix in excellent effects work, and you
have an action event movie that has some fun.  The first ten minutes of
the movie are worth the price of admission alone.  You've seen bits of
it in the trailer, but cut in with the film the scene is amazing, ending
with NASA's response, a cameo by the director, and Billy Bob Thornton.
     Aside from the special effects, the film's strength, and what makes
the film enjoyable, is the fact that the cast is on the whole
overqualified, and transcends a screenplay hindered by more than a few
cliches.  (Example:  the red wire or blue wire conundrum.  At the first
screening I saw of the film, a few weeks before release, some members of
the audience applauded after this conundrum's all-too predictable
conclusion.  Perhaps these people had never before seen a movie.)  Billy
Bob Thornton makes the commander cliches come off beautifully.  Bruce
Willis is by no means a Great Actor, but he is very good at what he
does, and nails the role of Harry Stamper.  Steve Buscemi gets to make
wisecracks.  Will Patton, meanwhile, easily gives the best performance
in the movie.  The ad campaign tells you that Patton's Chick is "doing
it for adventure", but he's really doing it for loyalty.  Patton
surpasses often clumsy dialogue, and his truest expressions of loyalty
and humanity are not expressed though spoken lines but through delicate
subtleties and nuances.  He shines in a beautiful scene in which he
visits his estranged wife and son, a scene which must have been the work
of uncredited script-doctor Robert Towne.
     The case works because it is well cast.  Bruce Willis is the action
hero.  Billy Bob Thornton is the credible actor in charge.  And what
else is Ben Affleck than the young hot shot who will one day be the
star?  And Liv Tyler than the overbred daughter?  Or Steve Buscemi than
the independent soul?  And is Chick any more loyal to Harry than Will
Patton was to Kevin Costner when he labored as a villain in the latter's
THE POSTMAN?
     The supporting members of the cast are not as well-filled out as
they have been in previous Bruckheimer productions (where are George
Dzundza, Michael Biehn, and Danny Trejo when we really need them?).  The
dialogue is often clunky and unoriginal; Thornton and Buscemi can make
these lines come off well, but when you have Liv Tyler, who makes good
lines sound bad, you know an underwritten script puts you in trouble.
     There is an ode to TITANIC in the overplayed romance between the
Affleck and Tyler characters.  Fortunately, the film does not suffer
from TITANIC's delusion that it is a Great Movie.  The cartoonish
aspects of TITANIC bring the film down from its intended pedestal to the
level of hackneyed melodrama with awesome ship-sinking spectacle. 
ARMAGEDDON wants nothing more than to be a hackneyed melodrama (in which
the cartoonish characters and dialogue belong) against which is set the
awesome spectacle where the entire planet is on the sinking ship.
     And spectacle is truly what ARMAGEDDON is about.  There is no room
for originality or daring thoughts, and no time for Great Cinema.  There
is time, 2 1/2 hours of time, for sheer spectacle, the brand of which
believes that big is good, bigger is better, and too much is best of
all.  The music, imagery, and effects are designed to be bigger than
life.  It's okay to take an afternoon or evening to see a movie that
doesn't make you think.  Every now and then, we need a movie that makes
us see and hear, and attach ourselves to archetypes instead of real
people, because real people can hurt too much.  Which means that every
now and then, we should take some time out for ARMAGEDDON.

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
Yes!  A movie less plausible than "Independence Day"!  And I'm counting
the Giant Lizard Steps on New York movie, though that one came close
(Especially when they didn't take the FDR to get to the Brooklyn
Bridge.  The 59th Street Bridge was closer anyway.)
I saw an early screening of "Armageddon" on Sunday morning.  What can I
say but that the laws of physics are strung up by the thumbs and
violated in the worst way, that the folks on screen are cut from
varying thicknesses and grades of cardboard, that the broad outlines of
the film are trivially predictable, that the bomb is defused/asteroid
destroyed with 3 second left on the clock, that the special effects
departments are the biggest component of the credits and that there's a
cute dog that doesn't die?  
Remarkably and innovatively, New York City is only slightly damaged by
horizontally streaking, slow moving meteors.  It's Paris that gets it,
perhaps because of some issue with the French.  This is also the first
movie I've seen with a NASA disclaimer at the end, right next to the
"No Animals Were Harmed":  NASA neither promotes nor endorses the
contents of this film.  To sum up, it's a summer flick, one of those
delicate perenniels that must be cultivated in intense AC and popcorn.
The question is whether it's a good summer flick or a bad one.  I lean
towards not bad, certainly a good cut above "Godzilla" (which says
little), but not particularly memorable either.
I missed the first asteroid-with-an-attitude movie.  Mixed reviews,
and all I really wanted to see was the big tidal wave in "Deep Impact".
Ten minutes of effects would not be worth nine bucks and two hours of
Hallmark-like platitudes.  It'll be at a second run house soon enough,
so it might be worthwhile then.
In any case, for "Armageddon", they decided to go for serious hyperbole
in the size of the rock.  After carefully pointing out that the
proposed dinosaur killer was about six miles wide (and then correctly
showing the impact to be just off Cancun), they made the new rock
something the size of Texas.  Why not the size of Alaska, while we're
at it?  It'll hit in eighteen days, and Earth's only hope is to send up
Bruce Willis and his deep drilling team into space aboard spiffy,
remarkably maneuverable and very roomy space shuttles.  The idea is to
drill into the rock, drop a standard issue nuclear bomb down this hole,
and blow up the thing that way.  Perhaps no one noticed that there have
been innumerable underground nuclear tests, perhaps not in Texas but
certainly in nearby Nevada, and none of them have cut much of a hole on
the earth's surface.  Nuclear weapons really aren't hammers of god, at
least compared to large hunks of rock and metal.
But this asteroid is remarkable.  Not only can it be shattered by a
dinky bomb, its surface is covered with crystal growths, retains an
atmosphere sufficient to generate a melodramatic wind, has gravity out
of proportion to its size (except when inconvenient to plot), and blows
up in a Big Ring Explosion (so fashionable with big bangs in modern
movies, but apparently the result of misreading of Vietnam war
footage).  This asteroid has an attitude, a touch of sentience or at
least petulence regarding Willis's drilling activity, hailing the drill
site with small rocks and methane flares at dramatically convenient,
must-push-button times.  Oh, methane: a by-product of biological
activity, right?  I suppose all this indicates that the asteroid is
really alive, its spawn of little baby meteors having the power to seek
out concentrations of human habitation, and it just happens to be
pissed at the French.
The most important thing is that the special effects are decent, not
great, but decent.  "Lost in Space" probably has the best effects so
far this year, and "Armageddon" doesn't come that close.  The second
most important thing is the soundtrack.  No Celine Dion, so it's OK --
I guess having Liv Tyler in the movie means at least one Aerosmith
song.  In terms of plot and character development, well, they make an
attempt, which is much, much more than what can be said about
"Godzilla", but how much can you do without getting in the way of the
special effects?
They actually set up a couple of conflicts and relationships.  There's
a father-daughter conflict, between Bruce Willis and Liv Tyler, and
there's a father-prodigy conflict, with Bruce and Ben Affleck.  Stuff
gets resolved by the end: Bruce and Liv reconcile, Bruce and Ben learn
to trust each other.  We should not be surprised.  A better question
may be, how well do these actors pull off the emotional torture thing?
Well, Liv is sort of there, but not really.  Ben does his Angry Young
Hotshot thing reasonably well; he was better in "Good Will Hunting" by
far, though that may be because he had more screen time and more to
do.  Bruce is OK.  It's a less interesting role than, say, "Twelve
Monkeys", but he's quite sufficient.
Besides this, there was the handy ad campaign that showed each major
character's face with some tag line underneath, like "He's doing it for
the money", "He's doing it for his country" or "He's doing it for the
donuts."  First time I saw these at a bus stop, I couldn't figure out
what they were selling.  Sneakers?  The advertising, however, is false,
as these strokes of character and personality are all but invisible in
the actual movie.  "Seven Samurai" this is not.
The amount of American rah-rah jingoism is actually remarkable.  In
some ways, images of the American flag and America as savior of the
world (no, let me rephrase: "Savior of the World") are more pronounced
than in, say, "Independence Day".  At least there, we felt a sense of
wackiness to the proceedings, and the jingoism is, well, obvious.
"Armageddon" does it more seriously and more subtly, mainly by putting
the Stars and Stripes in the background when Bruce Willis makes a
speach about honor and loyalty.  It's not a big can't-miss-me flag, a
la "Patton", but it's there.
Oh, there was a preview for "Blade" just before this movie.  I really
want to see it, if only so I can say, "humpf, Buffy can kick Blade's
ass."
-- 
"The court determined that Fox TV does not impede free and fair
competition in the teen-angst soap-com genre, therefore Party of Five
need not be broken into five 'Parties of One,' one being distributed to
each of the other networks."

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Check your brains at the door.  It's time for some silly summer fun
in ARMAGEDDON as Bruce Willis and Co. kick some asteroid tail.  When a
big rock last headed for our planet in DEEP IMPACT, it was soap opera
time.  That was back in the serious days of May.  It's summer now when
even flying boulders the size of Texas can be seen only as a lark.
     The story starts 65 million years ago when a piece of space trash
runs into Earth and kills all the dinosaurs.  "It happened before," a
deep-voiced Moses, a.k.a. Charlton Heston, warns us in the narration.
"It will happen again.  It's just a matter of time."
     Cut to present day New York City, where the poor Chrysler building,
which has been wiped out recently in other movies, takes it on the chin
again as an early casualty of an errant asteroid.  Actually this one is
just a baby, his big mama is on the way.  The world's governments will
keep this fact a secret as the U.S. quickly trains a team of social
misfits from a deep ocean oil drilling rig as mankind's only hope of
salvation.  Think STARSHIP TROOPERS, but more ridiculous.  In
ARMAGEDDON's defense, it at least realizes it is a parody, something
that many recent films haven't been smart enough to figure out.
     (The movie will win many viewers' hearts early on with the scene of
a small dog attacking a street display of Godzilla toys.  Given that
many are bigger than him, it is a nice metaphor that size doesn't
matter.)
     ARMAGEDDON delights in being politically incorrect.  When we first
see driller Harry S. Stamper (Bruce Willis), he is shooting golf balls
from the deck of his rig, trying to hit Greenpeace protestors in the
head.
     His right-hand man, A.J. Frost (Ben Affleck), is in trouble with
Harry for falling in love with Harry's daughter, Grace, played as a
cipher by Liv Tyler.  Grace doesn't show her father much respect.  "I
understand that you are handicapped by natural immaturity, but I forgive
you," she tells him.
     Although there are many contenders for the movie's most ridiculous
part, A.J.'s lovemaking scene with Grace has to be the winner.  He uses
animal crackers as a form of foreplay, something even NINE AND 1/2 WEEKS
never tried.
     The best performance is turned in, as usual, by Billy Bob Thornton,
who plays against type as the brainy head of NASA, Dan Truman.  Dan is a
guy with a good-ole-boy accent and a leg brace that kept him from ever
becoming an astronaut himself.  He also gets some of the best lines as
when he describes the events of the upcoming asteroid apocalypse as
"basically all the worst parts of the bible."
     A disheveled Steve Buscemi as Rockhound, plays a double major from
MIT, who spends his time worrying that the law will catch up with him
for sleeping with underage girls.  Rockhound is on Stamper's team as are
a bunch of other oddballs.
     Truman chooses Stamper's team to go up in space with the astronauts
to drill into the asteroid and plant an atomic bomb.  "The fate of the
planet is in the hands of a bunch of retards," General Kimsey (Keith
David) complains.  "I wouldn't trust them with a potato gun."
     The rag-tag outfit lives up to their image when they place their
demands on the United States government.  In order to agree to undertake
the mission, their demands include: sleeping in the Lincoln bedroom all
summer, bringing back eight-track tapes and revealing who shot Kennedy.
The one universal demand is that they never want to pay taxes ever
again.  Now, that's a request worth fighting for.
     When they finally get to the asteroid, the movie appears to have
run out of money.  The special effects are anything but, and the scene
is dark and murky.
     If you can only see one asteroid movie this year, DEEP IMPACT, with
all of its faults, is probably the better choice.  But if you're looking
for laughs and have plenty of time to kill, ARMAGEDDON is just about as
good.
     ARMAGEDDON runs 2:24.  It is rated PG-13 for sci-fi disaster
action, sensuality and brief profanity and would be fine for kids around
10 and up.

Author
Richard Scheib
USA. 1998. Director - Michael Bay, Screenplay - Jonathan Hensleigh, 
Adaption - Tony Gilroy & Shane Salerno, Story - Hensleigh & Robert Roy 
Pool, Producers - Bay, Jerry Bruckheimer & Gale Ann Hurd, Photography - 
John Schwartzman, Music - Trevor Rabin, Visual Effects Supervisors - 
Richard Hoover & Pat McClung, Visual Effects - DreamQuest Images, 
Additional Visual Effects - Blue Sky/VIFX (Supervisor Richard E. 
Hollander) & Digital Domain (Supervisor - Erik Nash), Paris Sequence 
Supervised by Hoyt Yeatman, Digital Effects Supervisor - Darin Hollings, 
Digital Effects - Cinesite (Supervisor - Carlos Aguello) & Tippett 
Studio (Supervisor - Bruce Nicholson), Special Effects Supervisor - John 
Frazier, Production Design - Michael White, Supervising Art Director - 
Geoff Hubbard. Production Company - Touchstone/Jerry Bruckheimer 
Pictures/Valhalla Motion Pictures.
Bruce Willis (Harry Stamper), Billy Bob Thornton (Dan Truman), Ben 
Affleck (A.J. Frost), Liv Tyler (Grace Stamper), Steve Buscemi 
(Rockhound), Will Patton (Charles `Chickie' Chapple), William Fichtner 
(Colonel Willie Sharp), Ken Hudson Campbell (Max Lennert), Michael 
Duncan (Jayotis `Bear' Kurleenbear), Peter Stormare (Lev Andropov), 
Keith David (General Kimsey), Owen Wilson (Oscar Choi), Jason Isaacs 
(Ronald Quincy), Jessica Steen (Jennifer Watts)
Plot: When an asteroid the size of Texas is discovered nearing Earth, it 
capable of obliterating all life on the planet if it hits, NASA's only 
hope to save the world is to recruit a team of hard-headed, 
anti-authoritarian oil riggers to go up into orbit, land on the asteroid 
and drill to its core to plant and detonate a nuclear weapon to divert 
its path.
In the same way 1997 was dominated by twin volcano disaster movies 
(`Dante's Peak', `Volcano'), so 1998 is dominated by twin astral body 
collision disaster movies with both `Deep Impact' and `Armageddon' vying 
for our attentions. Despite the commonality of themes, both are quite 
different films - `Deep Impact' was a tepid soap opera melodrama about 
how people meet the end, while `Armageddon' is an out-and-out action 
film. A likely comparison might be between `Saving Private Ryan' and 
`The Dirty Dozen' - while both are essentially World War II mission 
movies they are told with quite opposing emphases.
`Armageddon' comes with an absolute determination to be as BIG as it 
possibly can. It has a reported budget of $272 million which, if 
accurate, makes it second only to `Titanic' in size. Perhaps the most 
amusing thing about the budget is that the film's advertizing campaign 
was almost as large as the actual production budget of the film itself. 
One certainly can't deny that it has been effective. One has been 
bombarded by the film's quite nifty promotional campaign for months - 
giant digital displays in theatre foyers counting down the days, minutes 
and seconds until the film's opening; posters featuring the faces of the 
principal characters plastered around the city - "He's doing it for 
heroism", "She's doing it for love". If only then there had been a film 
that had been worth such epical effort. Unlike `Titanic', which 
contradicted accusations of gross over-spending and turned it around to 
become the success story of 1997, `Armageddon' emerges as only a 
spectacular monument to its own self-promotion and self-importance over 
the provision of anything of substance.
Director Michael Bay's previous films - `Bad Boys' (1995) and `The Rock' 
(1996) - have been filled with gratuitous action sequences and 
`Armageddon' represents Bay's excesses at their most extravagantly 
empty-headed. The film is conceived around the provision of a series of 
dramatic peaks every ten minutes or so. But all Bay seems capable of 
doing is substituting rapid editing, explosions, flashing lights, people 
yelling orders at each other all at once, and a dramatically hyping 
musical score for any real sense of drama. Each action sequence - the 
destruction of Mir, the landing, the liftoff, the buggy jump, the meteor 
shower - is just so brainlessly empty in its absurdly over-hyped 
dramatic contrivations and so unbelieivable as realistic drama that, 
contrary to what Bay is hoping to achieve, you just sit allowing all the 
sound and fury to wash over you without even the remotest sense of 
connection. The writing is absurdly one-dimensional - Steve Buscemi has 
no purpose in the film other than to crack wry one-liners and Liv Tyler 
is there it seems simply because the film needs a female lead. It is 
hard to believe that the nuclear detonation sequence can with complete 
seriousness offer up such old hat bomb detonation cliches as people 
yelling "The red or the blue wire ?" and the digital countdown stopping 
three seconds before detonation. And despite the presensce of at least 
three scientific advisors on the credits, the film is scientifically 
preposterous - in a vacuum space shuttles conduct aerial turns like jet 
fighters; atmospheric turbulence is encountered on a slingshot around 
The Moon; gravity is inexplicably on while aboard the asteroid and Mir 
but off back aboard the shuttles; and there is a really, really 
ridiculous sequence where people are able to turn an extra-vehicular 
buggy into a flying vehicle simply by turning its gravitic stabilizers 
off.
It has been a long time since one has seen a film which so relentlessly 
celebrates its own brainlessness. It wants to be a film about heroism. 
Heroism here is represented by Real Men - their sweat, their stubble, 
their muscular brawn, the handsomeness of their faces is shot in 
emphatic highlight. It is clear that these are Real Men because they do 
Real Men things like ride bikes, fast cars and horses, gamble, have 
tattoos, party in stripper bars and above all never give up on a job. 
But all the heroism comes absurdly posed. The sweat and the stubble on 
the heroes all comes like it is shot for some fashion layout. The film 
wants to convince us of some triumph of working class ordinariness but 
the sheer everyman quality of its heroes is shot in such a way that it 
attracts attention to the very artificiality of the attempt to do so. 
And what the film ends up celebrating is not so much a sense of heroism 
as an adolescent anti-authoritism. I would be greatly concerned if the 
fate of the world rested on a group of roughnecks who, among other 
things, start firing at each other with shotguns when they are annoyed; 
someone who keeps protesting "She didn't tell me her age, I swear"; and 
someone who explains their failure at psychological tests on the grounds 
they were dumped on their head as a child. Everybody on the opposite 
side of the coin to the heroes is characterized as double-dealing 
military or ineffectual because they haven't done any `real' work. In 
its opening moments the film celebrates a scene where the hero fires 
golfballs at a circling Greenpeace ship while one of his offsiders asks 
"What's wrong with drilling for oil ?" While one may not always agree 
with Greenpeace's methodology, the film's mindless celebration of 
environmental plundering on the grounds that it is a test of real men's 
courage and the characterization of protestors as worthy of contempt is 
something that verges on intolerance. Similarly the film gets a big joke 
out of putting its heroes in a position when they can give the finger to 
the government and demand they never pay taxes again - but when you see 
that all the men seem to do with their money is to blow it gambling and 
in stripper bars, you are struck less by the film's sense of the triumph 
of heroic take-no-shit individualism than you are by its sense of macho 
self-centeredness.
And it doesn't just stop there. It is not merely the mindless machimo of 
the heroism that sticks in one's craw, it is the mindless patriotism of 
it too. One cannot remember seeing a film before which featured so many 
shots of people posing in front of the American flag. Like `Independance 
Day' before it, this is less a film about combatting a world-threatening 
menace than it is a triumphal assertion of a belief in American identity 
and individuality. It is not merely a film about Real Men who never give 
up on a job going into space to save the world, it is about Real Men 
going to boldly assert their idea of what America is all about. All the 
heroic posing comes intercut with weightedly symbolic shots of the 
American flag and cutaways to the Iwo Jima statue and the plaques 
commemorating the sacrifices of the Apollo mission. And the background 
is filled with incredibly sentimentalized and equally posed Norman 
Rockwell-esque shots of good ordinary folk gathered around haybarns 
listening to the radio or emerging from churches in slow motion. As a 
non-American I kind of find the cultural imperialism of it all rather 
hard to take. Most unbelievable of all is the moment the American 
President goes on air to announce the launch of the mission and people 
the world over sit and listen in reverential awe, masses of Indians even 
sit in front of the Taj Mahal in prayer. Give me a break ! All of this 
in itself may have been slightly more palatable had not the heroic 
spirit of American independance that we are being asked to cheer on not 
been one that is so sophomoric and adolescent.


Author
Bill Chambers
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers
New address. Same old attitude. Don't forget to recommend a film,
read the journal, or send me some of that nasty HATE MAIL.)
It rocks-actually, lots of rocks fly at us or from us, in slow or fast
motion, at several points in the film. They seem
like dangerous rocks because they kind of twirl through the air instead
of just propelling forward, and when they
land-once in a while, when we need a break from the space sequences-they
cause damage enough to destroy the
Chrysler building and the like. (Nary a mention of these apocalyptic
events is made after they occur.) They also just
might be the most interesting element of ARMAGEDDON, a steroid user's
answer to Deep Impact.
Bruce Willis stars as Harry Stamper, a famed oil-driller commissioned by
the White House and NASA to stop a
giant asteroid before it travels beyond "zero barrier" and destroys our
planet. Why an oil driller? They require
someone experienced with deep-core mining to plant a nuclear missile
into said asteroid. (In one unintentionally (?)
hilarious sequence, NASA asks Harry to inspect a deep-core driller they
built based on his own blueprints; it is poorly
constructed-Harry criticizes almost every aspect of it. We trust NASA to
build space shuttles that can land on twirling asteroids?) Harry
assembles the obligatory "ragtag" bunch of "cowboys", including a blond
guy, a fat guy, a black guy, a wiseass, and the man who is sleeping with
his daughter (Affleck). Once they reach space, we experience sequence
after sequence of something going wrong-perhaps the fact that they sent
a bunch of nincompoops into outer space has something to
do with it; I cannot count the number of times they almost fail the
mission on all my fingers and toes. Whether or not
they save the day, I will not reveal. Nor will you care.
I will say this: you know you're in trouble when Deep Impact dwarfs your
asteroid movie in terms of emotion and
scope. Willis has barely a chance to come alive; ditto for Affleck.
Their big scenes are mostly reserved for the third
act, in a last minute-and futile-attempt to inject warmth into the
material. Steve Buscemi's character-the
wiseass-is exceptionally problematic. "Rockhound", as he's called, is
sarcastic and foolish, so they tape him to a
chair, where he spends most of the film. So why did they bring him up
there to begin with? Rather, why write him
into the film?-give his almost-witty one-liners to serious Willis, who
scowls and mopes and demonstrates psychotic
tendencies: at one point he chases after Affleck with his shotgun for
screwing his daughter, firing often and causing
significant damage to his oil rig. I'm guessing he qualifies under NASA
guidelines as someone unfit for space travel,
at least in my world where the sky is blue. Liv Tyler is pretty and
humourless, as always; suspiciously, four of her
father's band's ("Aerosmith") songs grace the soundtrack. Director
Michael Bay lays the visual and sound effects
on thick, like ketchup, eventually drowning the movie on-screen. (The
middle hour is a non-sensical, pyrotechnic
assault on the average primate's brain.) Whenever someone dies in this
movie, a crew member inevitably yells out
"We lost (insert dead person's last name here)!" I must admit that not
once could I distinguish a dead
oil-guy-cum-astronaut from a live one, and close-ups of the corpses'
faces beneath cracked helmets provided little
assistance, as their skin was often covered in fake blood.
ARMAGEDDON is not as terrible movie as Godzilla. It looks nicer, and has
fewer plot-holes within its equally
ludicrous framework. It has a vivid soundmix. But at almost
two-and-a-half hours, I could not believe how little
actually happened over the course of the story. The love story has been
played up in the ads, perhaps hoping to
catch people before they recover from Titanic-fever. Bollocks! The
lovers in the film are miles apart
throughout-erase all thoughts of nude sketching or car-sex and replace
them with obligatory shots of Liv Tyler
tearing up while Ben Affleck dicks around in a moon-crawler.
Remember a little film called Jaws? In this film, three
independent-minded men suddenly found themselves on a
fishing boat in pursuit of a deadly shark. They didn't much like each
other at first; eventually, they started to
respect one another. One of Jaws' great scenes involved the
would-be-Ahabs drinking and singing songs and telling
stories. This is the sort of male-bonding foreign to Bay or his
producer, Jerry Bruckheimer, who throw too many
characters into the mix and expect we'll care about them on the grounds
that the world is about to end. Not once do
we get the feeling that these characters are even acquaintances-I'd be
surprised if these actors bothered to
introduce themselves to one another before "action" was called. A male
friend who loved the film suggested to me
that perhaps I cannot relate to a bunch of men who don't bare their
souls, who believe in dying macho concepts like
heroism and a kind of chest-beating bravery. To this, I will respond
that the boys in ARMAGEDDON are neither
heroic, nor brave, nor smart, even: this team couldn't build a
birdhouse. And if I get no respect for disliking a movie
with all the synthetic feeling of a trailer-a trailer for a movie
written by a team of body-builders and greeting card
authors-I've never been a prouder wimp my whole life.

Author
Matt Williams
Armageddon, the second of this year's death-from-above thrillers (the
first being Deep Impact), has entered our atmosphere.  And though it
hardly fizzles out in the atmosphere, it is far from being a global
killer.
Just to give you an example of the differing paces of Deep Impact and
Armageddon, the former film detected the incoming comet with a roomy two
years to spare...in Armageddon, the asteroid is detected with only 18
days to impact.  To counter the threat, NASA creates a plan, gathers a
crew, trains the crew, readies not one, but two Space Shuttles for the
mission, and launches them all within that narrow window.  You can tell
realism is not the object here.
NASA head honcho Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thorton) realizes he needs a
drilling team to plant a mega-nuke inside the asteroid's belly.  For
some reason, even though the  asteroid is "as big as Texas", they only
need to drill 800 feet to get to the very center. But in any case, they
need a master driller to head the operation.  Enter Harry S. Stamper
(Bruce Willis) and his team of overly colorful roughnecks.
Of course, where would the dramatic tension be without a pointless
romantic subplot.  This is provided by Harry's daughter, Grace (Liv
Tyler), who's in love with Harry's right-hand-man A.J. (Ben Affleck).
Now, I have yet to become a fan of Liv Tyler, and have yet found no
proof that she can actually act.  This film gives no exception.
The one thing the film does have going for it is its special effects.
The destructive shots as mini-showers pelt major cities are spectacular.
Comparatively, the space scenes are nothing special, and even border on
bland. The filmmakers seem to recognize this however, and periodically
throughout the film they treat us to an intermission of another city
being leveled.  (Though, you begin to wonder why the asteroids only
target urban areas.)
Director Michael Bay has been previously criticized for his
music-videoesque directing style of constant motion and quick cuts.
However, while not an appropriate style for all films, it certainly fits
the action thriller.  However, in Armageddon, the effects are a little
more disorienting than in, say, The Rock.  Particularly once you reach
the asteroid where everything is gray and spiky, and everyone is wearing
identical spacesuits.  It simply gets difficult to identify the
characters in the quick shots (a frustrating thing when death is
involved).
The action sequences are exciting at times, though the film is hampered
when it attempts to find a human villain.  The military subplot that's
thrown in is just plain ludicrous.  The action sequences never quite
leave you completely satisfied, but you're never bored either.
The acting in the film is par for the course.   Most of the characters
are one-dimensional quip machines...but they're funny one-dimensional
quip machines. Billy Bob Thornton strives for, but never quite reaches
the level of Ed Harris' similar role in Apollo 13. Bruce Willis handles
himself capably, yet again, as an action lead, though this is far from
his best character-driven work.
The wafer thin plot of Armageddon can't hold up to any scrutiny
whatsoever. Deep Impact may have been shallow at times, but at least it
covered more of the bases.
Still, with its pleasing eye candy and the occasional moment of humor,
Armageddon is not a total disaster.  But then again, it doesn't rank up
with the best of escapist fare either.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
C.J HILL
Following in the footsteps of Deep Impact, Armageddon is a high octane
action story about a huge asteroid on a collision course with earth.
A plan is devised to drill nuclear bombs into it's core and then
remotely detonate them to destroy it.  A team of the best oil drillers
is formed (led by Bruce Willis) and trained for spaceflight, all in
twelve days.  The team are essentially a bunch of society outcasts or
misfits but this doesn't deter NASA from sending them up.  This motley
crew, believe it or not are mankind's only hope.
Armageddon does not hang about in any way.  Dizzying and spectacular
action scenes bombard you right from the start.  The opening scene of
a meteor shower wrecking buildings and streets is something else.  In
true Bruckheimer fashion, this film is a pyromaniac's dream.
The acting all round is very good.  Bruce Willis gives his very usual
but very watchable performance and Steve Buscemi has all the best
lines and provides some top comic relief.
However, on the downside, Armageddon is let down by being completely
ludicrous.  Deep sea oil drillers/social misfits become astronauts?
Yeah, right.  As you may have gathered, switching off the brain before
you go into the theater will enhance your enjoyment a great deal as
there are many scenes that are just too daft for words.  Also it's
very, very cheesy and some of us brits may find the over the top,
patriotic ending hard to swallow.
Putting these criticisms aside, Armageddon still manages to be a
thrilling film.  The Bruckheimer formula of terrific action
accompanied by pulse racing music should certainly win you over. To
sum up, I felt Armageddon to be very similar to Independence Day.
Utter cobblers but very thrilling cobblers.

Author
David Sunga
Starring: 
Bruce Willis, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Billy Bob Thornton, Peter
Stormare, Steve Buscemi, Seiko Matsuda
Ingredients: 
Large asteroid, crew of misfit oil drillers who become astronauts,
countdown timer with big green lights
Synopsis: 
In the beginning of ARMAGEDDON the voice of Charlton Heston explains
that long ago in the Cretaceous Period, a 6-mile chunk of asteroid
exterminated the world of the dinosaurs. When the rock struck, its
instant vaporization threw so much dust and gas into the atmosphere that
the sun was blocked long enough to kill off most plants and animals. In
ARMAGEDDON a new rock - - this time 'the size of Texas' - - is poised to
collide with the Earth. American heroes must save the world from certain
disaster while the helpless international community follows the American
heroes' exploits with awe and adoration.
Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis) and his hell-raising crew of eccentric oil
drillers are considered the best drillers in the world. Dan Truman
(Billy Bob Thornton) as head of NASA recruits Stamper and the oilers for
a mission to save humanity from extinction. NASA divides the oilers into
two mission teams: one led by Stamper and the other led by Stamper's
daughter's boyfriend AJ (Ben Affleck), a rival who doesn't get along
with Stamper. Each team gets a mobile drilling rig, a space shuttle, and
a nuclear bomb. Using Earthbound shuttles as space rockets, each team
must slingshot around the moon, reach the giant asteroid, and drill 800
feet into it the asteroid in order to plant and explode a nuclear device
- - so that hopefully the asteroid will be split into pieces and avoid
colliding with Earth. Only one nuclear device is needed for success but
the two rival teams are sent simultaneously to preclude failure.
On the mission, Stamper and the boys face perils such as the asteroid's
selective gravity. Two-ton space vehicles containing crew members are in
danger of floating off into free space. At the same time, two-ton rocks
might crush the men as the boulders fall with resounding thuds on the
airless asteroid's surface. Also, somebody has thoughtlessly equipped
the mobile drilling rigs with Gatling machine guns. 
Liv Tyler plays Stamper's daughter (and AJ's girlfriend) Grace, a pretty
face who waits helplessly on Earth. There are also bits involving
stereotyped minorities such as the chatterbox African American who
shrieks in surprise, the overweight Samoan hit by a meteor, and the
Asian couple who applaud Stamper when their faces get splattered with
black oil. Japanese superstar entertainer Seiko Matsuda gets all of two
seconds as an oblivious tourist who declares that she wants to go
shopping during a meteor shower.
Can Stamper and the oil drilling guys save humanity from certain
destruction?
Opinion:
Speaking of doom, a New Age friend told me her theory about why DEEP
IMPACT and ARMAGEDDON came out this summer. She says a 16th century
doom-and-gloom prophet named Nostradamus wrote that a terror would fall
from the sky next year "in the seventh month of 1999." Which could mean
anything from a slingshot crash of NASA's plutonium-laden Cassini Probe
to a terrorist on a parachute, if you believe in that sort of thing. But
in Hollywood, it amounts to little more than coffee shop inspiration for
summer asteroid movies such as DEEP IMPACT and ARMAGEDDON.
Getting back to ARMAGEDDON, it seems like there's a scene missing. In
the movie, as time runs short, the crew led by AJ has a perfect
opportunity to wake up, unpack their gear, start digging, plant their
nuclear bomb, and save the Earth (and its 6 billion people). Instead,
they go driving around the asteroid with the mobile drilling rig - -
inexplicably wasting precious time sightseeing when the Earth (including
AJ's girlfriend) is in immediate and dire jeopardy. Is AJ's nuke
completely forgotten as a viable option in his mission? 
At its heart ARMAGEDDON is mostly a rehash of stuff we've already seen
before in other uninspiring movies. But at least the mediocre doomsday
script is spiced up with implausible events (such as Gatling guns) to
increase the number of booms and bangs. 
The cinematography in ARMAGEDDON is noteworthy in that for two hours and
30 minutes the audience is hit with a dizzying mishmash of photographic
angles nearly every second. Meanwhile, in the background music,
suspenseful drumming goes on and on and on. All this changing scenery
and ominous drumming is illusory fluff - - an obvious attempt to make it
seem like something interesting is always about to happen. But the
continuous images hold interest for only about an hour, then diminish in
impact as nothing substantial really happens. On the other hand, being
distracted from ARMAGEDDON's implausible plot while waiting for the
ending to roll around might not be a bad thing. 
In short, ARMAGEDDON consists of a few booms, a few bangs, lots of
distracting images, and a period of waiting around for a possibly happy
ending.
Trivia (Sci Fi fans only): 
After the movie I wondered whether in reality we Americans would be able
to use nukes to fend off a space rock the size of Texas (i.e. over a
quarter million square miles), and found out that astronomers have
actually done simulations. In the computer simulations using the rough
equivalent of an atom bomb planted in an asteroid only a mile in size,
the asteroid cracked up, but the pieces stayed on course to wipe out the
Earth. 
One thing that's always bugged me about sci fi movies is the use of
rockets, which somehow seem kind of low tech, since rockets waste vast
amounts of fuel and then run out. But in order to travel such vast
distances, interstellar travel would require establishing a propulsion
force that, unlike rocketry, doesn't use up much fuel.
For example, when you drop a penny, it experiences a force which pulls
it in the direction of earth. This is because the penny is within a
gravitational field which propels the penny towards Earth, without
having to burn fuel. If the gravitational field pointed sideways, the
penny would fall sideways. If the field pointed up, the penny would fall
up. The penny always falls in the direction of the field, without having
to burn fuel. Field is the key.
Field effect propulsion is perfect for sci fi space travel. Basically,
in order to create a propulsive force to drive a spaceship in any
direction without the use of fuel, all you have to do is establish a
ship with its own field. Point the field in the direction you want to
go, and you continue to "fall" in that direction forever. Point it in a
different direction, and there you go. 
Has the principle of field effect propulsion been demonstrated before in
real life? Certainly. It's known as the Biefeld Brown effect, a weak
phenomenon first observed by physicist/astronomer Dr. Paul Alfred
Biefeld as early as 1923. Biefeld created a strong electrostatic field
in a simple capacitor (a capacitor is a sandwich made of two metal
plates and gook in between) - - and the capacitor always levitated
weakly towards the direction stipulated by its generated field. That was
over seventy five years ago, in 1923, before big budgets and modern
materials. Just imagine the kind of field effect propulsion we could
achieve in a 1998 science fiction movie (or in real life using the
movie's budget).
Most recently, in 1992 Dr Eugene Podkletnov of Tampere University,
Finland published a paper describing research in which he using a
special ceramic disk to produce a field in the direction opposing
gravity. When non-metal and non-magnetic materials were placed within
the field directly above the flat disk, he recorded up to a 2%
cancellation of gravity. Presently Dr Ning Li of the University of
Alabama, Huntsville, along with NASA's Marshall Manned Space Flight
Center in Huntsville, Alabama, are working on a similar device. Go,
NASA.
It seems to me, that if science fiction is supposed to portray imaginary
high tech space propulsion, field effect is the way to go. 
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
James Brundage
Starring: Bruce Willis, Ben Affleck, Steve Buscemi, Liv Tyler, Billy Bob
Thorton
The last time we saw Bruce Willis in front of the camera riding the binge
trend of apocalypse movies was in 1995, with the bizarre, twisted Terry
Gilliam saga of a virus and a time travel paradox "12 Monkeys". Having just
finished it as I type these words, I think back with longing to better, more
original apocalypse films, where the disasters were not simply aliens or
rocks in the sky, as happens in this movie. However, perhaps Bruce is the
good luck charm both to apocalypse drama AND summer action films, having
worked wonders in a tricky role with "12 Monkeys" and, in my mind, bringing
a much better light onto this summers finest action film. Not to say that
any day of the week I'd rather rent 12 Monkeys than this, or watch "The
Rock" (the last GOOD action flick that Jerry Bruckheimer came out with).
Deep Impact had the drama, but got an F on the action and the comedy. And,
let's be honest, not many people actually GO to the movie for the drama.
It's really all how on the edge of the seat you are.
In Armageddon, director Michael Bay (The Rock), takes us on a thrill ride
that, in this summer (with a SERIOUS dearth of films where we can just go
out there and enjoy watching it), is actually fun. I'll be the first to
admit its brainlessness, but I'll also be the first in line for its quirky
humor (who other than Jerry Bruckheimer would cast Steve Buscemi as a serial
rapist in one movie (Con Air), and a twisted genius with a sense of humor in
the next (Quote: The Rubix Cube, easy. All of its easy I've got a
double-doctorate from MIT at 22, you know why I do this job: cause they let
me work with explosives).), its fine thrills (both on and off the ground),
and its cute but fun characters you can't help like.
Most people try too much in the apocalypse film. Looking back (and I've seen
just about every apocalypse film this decade, and most of them from the last
one), I find only one or two that I liked all around. So few contain JUST
the right amount of drama, JUST the right amount of action, and JUST the
right amount of humor to create a film truly worth seeing.
Three come to mind, Gilliam's "12 Monkeys", Sonnenfield's "Men in Black"
(besides it being too short, it WAS a good film), and "Armageddon". No
matter what your summer priority is, see this one.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
ARMAGEDDON is a one-hundred-and-fifty-minute migraine headache. It classifies
less as a form of entertainment than as a new kind of corporal punishment.
It's so meat-headedly macho it should come with its own brand of deodorant.
People have chided me for being so put off by this movie. I know, I know;
they're trying to achieve a heroic level of proportions with their characters
and their material. Fine, it's over-the-top, but it's still a crummy movie:
loud, clichéd, dramatically uninteresting, and just plain painful to sit
through. Here is a movie that employed NINE writers, who collectively didn't
even add up to one good one. Maybe they should have improvised?
After an opening scene where the planet gets peppered with cosmic hail (which
somehow manage to unerringly obliterate nothing but national monuments and a
satellite), NASA specialist Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton) gets the facts
together: an asteroid -- or a comet, even the movie's promotional material
seemed confused about that part -- the size of Texas is headed for Earth. To
save the planet, Truman eventually decides to recruit a deep-core drilling
team to plant a nuke in the heart of the asteroid/comet/whatever and blow it
to pieces. The head of the team, Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis) gets yanked off
his rig while chasing around one of his co-workers, A.J.  (Ben Affleck) with
a pump-action shotgun. See, A.J. was sleeping with his daughter (Liv Tyler),
and, see, Dad's still real protective of her despite the fact she's grown up,
and are you squirming in your chair yet?
I mentioned macho. Not just in the script, either (since Liv Tyler is one of
the two, maybe three women in the movie who get any dialogue at all).
EVERYTHING in this movie comes accompanied with gut-rupturing sub-bass audio
effects. At one point we get treated to a closeup of a DIGITAL READOUT, and
each "tick" of the clock is "realized" on the soundtrack with the sound of a
thousand car doors slamming. Idiotic. There's more slow motion in this film
than in a *dozen* John Woo movies. Helicopters, police cruisers, spaceships,
and human figures are perpetually stamped out against a setting sun. Every
outdoor shot is steeped in golds and yellows. It's like a goddamn Marlboro ad
on mescaline. (And oh yeah, there's a cheap shot at Godzilla they probably
threw in at the last possible second.)
It gets worse. Michael Bay has taken all of this and clipped it together with
an editing style so nervous and unsettled that we don't look at anything for
more than three seconds at a time. After a few minutes, I remembered that the
original cut had clocked in at something like over three hours (God help us
all), and that the frantic, first-here-now-there editing may have been less a
strategy than a salvage job, a way to pull an even more bloated and unwieldy
whole into something vaguely resembling a digestible product. It doesn't
work.
Thornton is the best thing in the movie. He plays a character who is
interesting to watch and listen to, but most importantly, he keeps a stright
face during scenes where the only one keeping a straight face would have been
a corpse. Tyler plays the movie like a good sport, weeping and giggling on
cue -- like in a "romantic" scene where Affleck tickles Tyler with animal
crackers. Willis does his usual steely-eyed job, which made me all the more
nostalgic for his hurt-and-alone performance in 12 MONKEYS. I still insist
that no actor, however skilled, can survive lines like "Mom didn't leave you
-- she left both of us!"
And then we have the effects. This is, I believe, the third time in a row
this year I've seen the Chrysler building trashed. Many of the effects are
impressive (albeit moronically conceived and staged), but there are only so
many ways you can nuke New York -- or Paris, or Singapore, or the whole of
the globe. Also, many of the images are informed by moronic sensibilities --
the material with the space-dock, for instance, or the vast majority of the
shuttle flight, which has the ships flitting around like the paper airplaines
over Mom's bedspread in a student sci-fi film. Or a space station that takes
way too long to blow up. Or an asteroid that conveniently has gravity when
the heroes need it and doesn't when they don't. And so on.
John Waters once said he would have loved to do a movie where everything was
fake -- grass, trees, flowers, sun, everything. This is that movie. Too bad he
didn't direct it.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Robert Marks
     Armageddon should have been the smash hit (if you'll pardon
the expression) of the summer.  It should have been an incredible
film with great characters, great special effects, and a great
plot.  Unfortunately, it wasn't.
     Oh, it had the great special effects.  The effects were
better than Deep Impact, in fact.  It also had some good
characters and some very funny character driven scenes.  However,
as far as the plot goes, Armageddon falls flat on its face.
     The plot is simple enough: an asteroid the size of Texas is
heading towards the Earth on a collision course, and it has to be
stopped.  This is demonstrated by New York being decimated by
small meteorites crashing into buildings.  The technicians at
NASA then find that they have somehow missed a huge asteroid, and
get the best drillers in the world to travel up to the thing,
drill an 800 foot hole in it, and set off a large nuclear weapon.
     However, as soon as they ask Bruce Willis' character to help
them save the world, the movie becomes silly beyond belief.  All
of them fail the psych test, but are okayed for space flight
anyway.  They get to the asteroid, and the landing resembles
something from Star Wars as the space shuttles weave in and out
of debris like jet aircraft.  The highly trained pilot misses the
landing zone by over 20 miles.  Once they finally begin, the
stupidity becomes almost too much to mention.
     As the viewer watches the military try to detonate the nuke
early (and a bunch of laymen manage to disarm it), sees the most
durable space shuttle in the world proven to be prone to bullets,
and wonders why there is a gatling gun on a space drill anyway,
s/he also wonders why they paid so much to see this movie.  The
ridiculous plot also manages to discredit the characters, and
turns what should be a dramatic sacrifice (you can probably guess
the character as you watch the movie) into a cop-out.
     Well, at least the movie didn't have any completely
ridiculous lines, even if the plot was idiotic.  And, the special
effects did look nice.
     So, in the end, the grade is 2/5.  It could have been worse,
but it could have been much better.  Wait for video for this one;
it isn't worth seeing on the big screen.

Author
Tim Voon
Director: Michael Bay
Writer: Jonathan Hensleigh, J.J. Abrams
Cast: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Peter Stormare, Keith David, Steve Buscemi
In ARMAGEDDON, everyone wants to save the world, each other, and carry
on them so much love and comradeship, you'll gag on the popcorn. There
are no bad guys, except for a big, mean meteorite and a highly
unintelligent president. Throw in volatile father/daughter/lover
relationships, the fate of humanity hanging on limbo, about to be
blasted into oblivion and NOISE, NOISE, MORE NOISE, and before long,
you're senses have been thrown into overdrive by the Jerry Bruckheimer
team. They have once again pulled out a no stops, glitzy, action packed,
noisy adventure that will leave you dizzy with explosions and
collisions, that just seem to roll across the screen.
Unlike the slower, more thoughtful, DEEP IMPACT, this movie begins with
a flash of destruction  the collapsing Chrysler building - you can't
get smaller than that. Not to mention, an action packed cast all wanting
their fair share of screen time - namely, Mr. B.Willis, Mr. B.Affleck,
and Mr. B.B.Thornton. Mr. Willis gets to give his customary, look how
tough I am' stare, that also spells I'm the greatest American Action
Hero'. Whilst Mr. Affleck, who hasn't learnt how to develop this
technique yet, throws himself about the screen, saying Watch out for
me, I'm better looking, and I'm going to be the next best American
Action Hero.' Mr B.B. Thornton, on the other hand, carries himself with
such self-control and dignity, that says to Willis and Affleck, I may
not be as good looking, but I can sure act better than the both of you.'
On the side, Liv Tyler, looks prettier than all three.
On the whole, an action packed thrill ride that is certain to please
lovers of special effects and action heroes. If this is your kind of
film, then it is probably worth the weight of a movie ticket, as it will
be much less impressive on tape.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Will
Patton, Steve Buscemi, Owen Wilson, Peter Stormare, Keith David, Michael
Duncan, William Fichtner
Director: Michael Bay
Screenplay: Jonathan Hensleigh and J.J. Abrams
Australian theatrical release date: August 20, 1998
Hotshot producer Jerry Brukheimer is all too familiar with corny,
underdone and translucent action flicks.  Thankfully, he's also headed
the production of some spectacular cornballs, most memorably The Rock
and Con Air.  This time, he's handed the directing reigns to Michael
Bay, one of the few directors this year who hasn't been suckered into
treating his material incorrectly.  Mimi Leader tried too hard to pull
off an effective emotional substance in Deep Impact, and Roland Emmerich
was up to his usual mainstream garbage with the massively disappointing
Godzilla.  Trouble is, he doesn't bother to change the pace or form of
the film and, although his material is treated with the precision and
care of a capable director, an on going sense of repetitiveness found so
regularly in Armageddon becomes tiresome and monotonous.  And frankly, a
little insulting.
An asteroid is descending quickly upon Earth, so a NASA team of experts
(including Billy Bob Thorton, the leader of the pack) smartly decide to
hire oil diggers to solve the problem. Just after a few demands are met
(including "no taxes againever") the team is ready to blast off and
save the world from destruction at the hands of Harry (Bruce Willis).
Everything runs quite smoothly during the opening scenes, with plenty of
explosions and car wrecks to satisfy most special effects hungry
viewers.  That's the first thing that separates Armageddon from the
similarly thought of Deep Impact: Bay is not at all hesitant to use his
computer-generated eye candy, but Mimi Leader let it all build up into
an exhilarating climax. I'm not sure which one is better - whilst I
enjoyed watching the opening scenes of Armageddon much more, I can't
help but feel that Deep Impact introduces its scenario, and its
characters, much more effectively.  Talking about introducing
characters, we first meet Harry when he's whacking golf balls into Green
Peace protesters, then gets a shotgun and attempts to shoot his
daughter's boyfriend (Ben Afflick).  And that's the sort of idiocy you
can except from these whimsical characters later on, especially when
they're, um, saving the world.
When the film is set on Earth, it's actually quite enjoyable.  The fast
paced, snappy venture into the lives of these idiots and the developing
of Thorton's character is all fun and games.  But it's when we witness
Bay's joy ride onto the Asteroid that things go dreadfully wrong for the
characters and our entertainment levels.  A brainless, dumb and utterly
boring collage of scenes follows, where every and any possible mishap
occurs to our inane astronauts.  In "the action film of the year" I
actually, literally, fell asleep for a brief moment just to be awoken by
one of the annoying demonstrations of digital sound.  I found myself
wishing that the Earth (read: the US) could kill two birds with the one
stone: that is, get rid of the Asteroid and, oh please, get rid of Bruce
Willis.
Most of the laughs come from Steve Buscemi, a weird little actor who's
played the Weird Little Funny Guy role so many times that he's almost
perfected it.  But honestly, can't he try to vary his talents a little
further?  Buscemi's Armageddon performance is a replica of his other
roles in The Wedding Singer, The Big Lebowski and Con Air, amongst
others.
Potentially, this film is a great 90-minute flick with a ludicrous 144
minute running time.  I can forgive Bruce Willis for looking like a
dopey yobbo, by I can't forgive Armageddon's editors for making me feel
like I was watching Titanic Special Edition in Space.  In all fairness,
it has a super ending - courageous, uplifting, joyful, etc etc.  But by
that time my eyes were barely remaining open and my ass bones were
aching just enough to warrant a wise thought: "Arma-gedden-outa-here."

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Eric Vinegart
TEMPE, AZ -- I wanted to see American History X today, with the idea
of writing a review for The Vinegar, however, Brandi and I have been
hiking in Phoenix's South Mountain Park too long, and now we've run
out of time in order to catch the beginning of the movie.  A quick
check of the cinema listings in the newspaper lets us know that
Armageddon starts in 15 minutes at a nearby theater, so we settle on
that plan, instead.
Brandi and I have been spending the day together (her only day-off
since last Sunday) in the beautiful outdoors of 80-degree Arizona in
what must now be winter for most other parts of the U.S.  Both of us
absolutely love hiking, especially the remote reaches of Arizona, and
had Brandi not discovered a nice little cave accessible by only
employing small lie-back and arm-bar moves (that's technical
rock-climbing parlance for the extreme-sport-challenged), we would've
never been delayed to miss our plans to see American History X.
Oh well.  Ask me if I care!  I'm approaching mid-life-crisis age, and
when I'm in the company of a beautiful 23-year-old woman, I'm happy to
be anywhere.  If I were serving a life-time prison sentence, it'd be
Seventh Heaven so long as a woman like Brandi was in my cell with me.
For any of you wondering what quality I may posses that attracts
Brandi to a man roughly the age of her father, you might be better
served to find the answer by directing your curiosity not towards me,
but instead to Brandi and her qualities.  She's not easily impressed
by popular-culture bullshit.  In other words, she's a thinking woman,
fully capable of arriving at truthful and accurate conclusion --
unaided by back-seat coaching from all the know-nothings on media
pedestals.  And if she suspects a man wants her only for her body,
he's dead meat.  Even if he's smarter than her, she can't be fooled.
Anyway, Armageddon has been out now way too long to demand another
review.  The Internet Movie Database lists more than 140 already, and
who the hell needs another critic?  But in Armageddon there is one
scene (actually a thread) that Brandi reacts to in exactly the same
way I do.  It's what I want to focus on today, and it's what helps
illustrates an interesting point.  And I'll bet real money that none
of those other reviews makes mention of it.
Armageddon is about a Texas-sized asteroid on a collision course with
earth.  NASA recruits a roughneck drilling team (not unlike the Dirty
Dozen, but who prefer crap tables, tattoo parlors and whore houses),
fast-tracts them to become astronauts, then launches them via space
shuttle into slingshot orbit around the moon so they can land on the
doomsday asteroid.  There they drill an 800-foot core, implant a nuke,
detonate it, and save the world.  The crew (what's left of them)
returns safely to earth, where they are given a hero's welcome.  Each
crew member has been facing deep personal issues, and it is the
challenge of Charles "Chick" Chapple (Will Patton) that caught
Brandi's eye (and mine).
On the eve of their launch, roughneck Chick shows up on the doorstep
of his ex-wife (Judith Hoag) who has had a restraining order against
him.  Playing in the front yard is Chick's small son who he sees for
the first time.  It's obviously a last-ditch effort to finally see his
7-year-old child, knowing full well he'll probably be killed on the
asteroid mission he's about to embark upon.  The mother, not wanting
her son to know his father, introduces Chick as a salesman.  Obviously
delighted to meet his son under any circumstance, Chick only wants to
see him for the first time, and perhaps the last.  He tells his ex
he's going on a mission tomorrow that might make her proud, and
presents his son with a model copy of the space shuttle.
Because the audience already knows where this scene might go, it's a
moving moment for everyone, I'm sure.  Will Patton superbly conveys
Chick's anguish of loneliness and the empty life of a person denied
the companionship of those he loves.  Contrasted to the fact that this
man may well never return to realize happiness with his son and the
woman he has loved, it's a powerful, pivotal message.  It's obvious
that Chick has been at wits end for ways to please his former wife.
When he said that he's going on a mission that may make her proud, we
know that he has always wanted her and that he has been living a hell
in isolation and loneliness.  Patton has no trouble conveying this
message to all but the brain-dead in the audience.  And for anyone
wondering why men commit suicide at four times the rate that women do,
the movie should illustrate the gut-wrenching frustration leading to
it --  but probably doesn't.
Brandi's comment while watching this scene is one word,
"Disgusting!!!"   "Disgusting" that any woman would hold so much
contempt for a man to not let him ever meet his very own son.
Disgusting because his ex once held Chick in high enough regard to
marry him, but then discarded him because he had not lived up to HER
expectations.  In other words, a low-life roughnecker isn't exactly
the man portrayed by popular culture that even the lowest form of
woman should aspire to for her Mr. Right, and instead is an expendable
animal easily replaced.
"Yeah right."  "So why is she still single?", wonders Brandi.
Brandi lost her father to an automobile accident when she was about
the age as Chick's son, and who knows better than her what it's like
to live in a world where everyone has had a father but her?  It's one
thing for God or fate to take your daddy away, but quite another for
your mother to do it for you.  Obviously, Brandi sees not Chick as an
evil monster here, but his ex-wife as a despicable,
belly-low-to-the-ground critter wrought with enough anger sufficient
to deny a fatherless life for her own flesh and blood.
"I wonder how many people see this scene for what it really is?",
Brandi wants to know.
When I comment that the screen writer probably inserted this scene as
satire against modern-day relationships, Brandi is not so sure and
wonders how many others see this scene as we do.  Given the trash and
fluff that's been coming out of Hollywood, Armageddon's screen writer
may be just as clueless.
Scenes like this one have been all-too-common during the last 30
years.  And it's not just portraying all but heroic men as outcasts,
but all except the most beautiful women, too, as losers.  Hollywood
has made a lot of money using women with narrowly defined qualities to
portray that which should be desired by all men.  Unfortunately, the
qualities more often than not center on physical attributes -- hair
color, breast size, height, and facial features -- and the harshest
form of satire is unleashed against virtue and asset as exemplified by
the likes of a Margaret Thatcher, for example.  In other words, unless
you're a Cindy Crawford, a Claudia Schiffer or a Liv Tyler, you're
trailer-park trash and should go away.
On launch day for the outerspace-ward roughnecks, every media
organization in the world dominates the news outlets, and when Chick's
ex-wife and his son surprisingly see him on television decked out in
an astronaut uniform in front of the space shuttle, Chick is no longer
a salesman.  Oh no.  The boy's mother now says, "That's your father".
It's a happy moment not for the father, but obviously for the boy who
for the first time learns that his dad is -- what else in any American
kid's life --  AN ASTRONAUT, for chrissakes.
Again, Brandi and I see this scene for what it really displays:
greed, selfishness, vice, betrayal and the worst form of child cruelty
-- denial for a boy who wants his father.
At the end of Armageddon, the crew returns home to a hero's welcome,
and Chick finds on the tarmac his son and an ex-wife glee-stuck that
her ex-husband finally realized pay dirt.  This scene really gripes
Brandi who says Chick is the exact same person he's always been.  And
only now that he's rich and famous does his ex-wife once again accept
him.  Chick isn't any better looking, any smarter, and his ex has no
proof he won't need daily doses of Viagra, but he's rich and famous
now, so that's all that matters.  And boy, does she want him back.
We're left thinking she'll need knee pads for a long time to come.
Fuel-my-hedonism-or-you're-a-sack-of-shit message is what popular
culture bombards the young, impressionable minds with daily.  People
are trash, zeros, scum and no good -- unless, of course, they have
blonde hair, big boobs or are rich and famous.  All other men and
women need not apply.
The plot-thread is a good ink-blot test, and an excellent tool for
anyone to see the source of their own reaction as either by-product of
bullshit or wholesome, mature outlook.
Brandi's healthy perception of life is why she accepts me as a person.
And she would've accepted you, too, for richer or poorer, had it been
you who drew the card on the day I met her.  So long as there's one
person left in the world to accept us as we are, we'll always be
blessed with at least a friend -- a friend hopefully who is generous,
forgiving, patient, realistic and accepting.
One last footnote about Armageddon.  Both of us absolutely love the
soundtrack.  Aerosmith's I Don't Wanna Miss A Thing puts Brandi's head
on my shoulder, and provides one of those moments, which I will always
recall whenever I hear the music, the same as many of us remember what
we were doing on that moon-lit night when Neil Armstrong first set
foot on the moon.  Brandi is impressed with Liv Taylor's presence, and
points out for me that she is the daughter of Aerosmith's Steven
Tyler.
After the movie, which we really enjoyed with reservation for some of
the unrealistic plot and special effects, neither of us is in any mood
to end the day.  A little hungry, too, we wander over to The Outback
in Tempe for a little vitals and libation.
There are scores of affluent people here -- even on park benches
outside -- waiting to be waited on and fed.  Most hail from the
surrounding neighborhood, which has homes complete with kitchens that
alone cost more than the average price of a single-family dwelling in
Arizona.  People pretty much around here no longer use their kitchens,
preferring the likes of The Outback, complete with cooks, waiters and
busboys -- all of whom are held in about as high regard as Chick
enjoyed from his ex-wife.  It's unlikely any family here tonight is
supported on roughneck salary, and from the looks of the size of some
of these families, complete with kids in tow, in toys and in diapers,
Brandi thinks some will be coughing up $200 and $300 just for Sunday
dinner.
Brandi and I are willing to eat at the bar, so we get to dispense with
that waiting-to-eat bullshit.  I'm always amazed how people haven't
time to mow their own lawn, but always plenty to wait in line for food
-- and every day for many.
Brandi helps me notice the spoiled students in here, obviously on
generous allowance to afford $4.50 for a mug of imported beer,
equivalent to an hour of after-tax minimum wage for those who have to
work and go to school.  Brandi was disgusted by the sight of a
blooming onion, which the gal down the bar a ways consumed all by
herself (about 2,000 calories, folks).  And I cringe now when I see
the same gal carving away and wolfing down what appears to be a
Porterhouse cut.  Her boyfriend seems to be competing with the steak
for her attention, but she's not yielding, not even between bytes.
Her obvious eating disorder may explain the thunder thighs and ugly
cellulite at the ripe old age of about nineteen.
The salmon we order arrives quickly, and it's a good thing because
we're tired of watching a bunch of gluttons on suicide missions.  It's
not like we're not culpable for our own vice.  After all, we are
drinking beer ($4.50/mug).

Author
Mikel J. Koven
Review by Mikel J. Koven
The following review was published in The Express, St. John's
Newfoundland, 8 July, 1998.
Copyright 1998, by the author.
     Armageddon may very well be the biggest movie scheduled to open
this summer.  Touchstone Studios (i.e. Disney) have obviously banked a
lot of money on this flick, and perhaps I am just getting cynical after
The X-Files debacle, but it strikes me that we as movie audiences are
becoming more and more susceptible to studio marketing hype than ever
before.  No matter how bad Armageddon is, and it is pretty awful, thrill
seekers are going to line up for miles and days in order to watch the
destruction.
     Here is the plot of Armageddon: a big meteor is headed for earth.
This rock, referred to by the scientists in the flick as "a global
killer" will destroy every living thing on earth unless it is
destroyed.  The only hope for humanity is to land a crew of American
(naturally) deep-core drillers on the asteroid and blow it up with
nuclear weapons.
     Bruce Willis plays Harry S. Stamper, a rogue deep-core driller, who
is the best in his trade.  He is brought on by NASA to advise a team of
astronauts taking care of this mission.  Obviously, Stamper cannot trust
a bunch of strangers, and he assembles his own motley crew of
meteor-killers.  The boys blast off, blow-up the rock, and return as
heroes.
     What I think is most noxious about this movie is the absolutely
shameless flag waving: if you were bothered by the "rah, rah!  USA,
A-OK!" sentiments of Independence Day, you can certainly miss this
movie.  Every dramatic moment in the film has the "stars and stripes" in
the back ground.
     What starts as an "interesting"piece of Americana quickly becomes
jingoistic and annoying: Armageddon reifies the old frontier as its
theme.  NASA and the White House have all these scientists and advisors
who are helpless against the end of the world.  They run around like
Chicken-Little wondering how many "nukes" it will take to destroy the
meteor.  In walks the old "working class hero", Willis, who points out
that it takes a "real" man, and not some Pentagon desk jockey, to do
this job.  It is only the same gumption that built America, that can
save it - oh, yes, and the world too I guess.
     We see "foreigners", people of color, wearing "funny" clothes doing
their ethnic things in their far-off and dirty countries praying
superstitiously to their "gods" for salvation - completely unaware that
the good old US of A will save the day.  Even in the States, we see
Norman Rockwell-like tableaus of middle-America, workin' folk gazing
longingly at the Stars and Stripes looking for salvation.  It is
pathetic really - and makes one crave the subtleties of ID4.
     Producer Jerry Bruckheimer, the man who produced The Rock a few
years ago, as the television ads like to constantly point out, fails
Armageddon in the same way he failed with last year's Con-Air; it is not
sufficient to add more explosions, more action, more "zippy one-liners",
if you haven't got a decent script.
     Director Michael Bay (who also directed The Rock), is likewise
positioned to take responsibility for this turkey - he helmed one hit,
and it feels like Bruckheimer automatically assumes that the same
director will rework the same magic.  The problem is that in The Rock,
there was a crackling good script.  The characters were developed, and
the situation was, at least, plausible.  The humor came from the
situation, and did not, like in both Con-Air and Armageddon, get slotted
in as "one-liners".
     At the centre of The Rock was the awkward relationship between Sean
Connery and Nicolas Cage; in Armageddon we have "the awkward
relationship" between Willis' Stamper and Ben Affleck's A. J. Frost, who
is in love with Stamper daughter, Grace, played by Liv Tyler.  With the
Connery - Cage relationship, the two men got to know one another over
the course of the film; but in Armageddon, the relationship between
Willis and Affleck has been on-going for five years - none of which we
see or gets developed in the paint-by-numbers screenplay.  The result is
we don't care: Willis is being a weenie, Affleck is being a "sook". And
Liv Tyler is there just to look beautiful, framed against "Old Glory".
     The cast is alright with what they have to work with.  Chisel-faced
Willis is out to save the world and seems focused on not bursting out
laughing at the absurdity of this movie.  And Affleck is solid enough in
his first real-big movie, after his success in Good Will Hunting.  If
Hollywood needed verification that Affleck is an up-and-coming star,
this movie will probably do that.
     The real waste here is Billy Bob Thornton as NASA supervisor, Dan
Truman; Thornton commands the screen in a way that only a few other
actors can (George Clooney, I think also has this charisma).  Perhaps it
is his Southern drawl, but Thornton can make even the most sentimental
and ridiculous dialogue at least plausible.
     It is worth noting that, as is the standard in Western literature,
the two main protagonists on opposite ends of the central crisis, Willis
in space and Thornton in Houston, are frequently two sides of the same
psyche.  In Armageddon, should you fuse the names of Willis' Harry S.
Stamper with Thornton's Dan Truman, you get Harry S. Truman, the
cold-war president of the Untied States who ordered the bomb dropped on
Japan, another "Armageddon".
     But touches like that, or the brief joke at the beginning of the
movie attacking Godzilla(it's pretty hard to miss), are not sufficient
to save the film.  Neither are the special effects, which range from the
spectacular to the pretty lame.
     In part, I guess one can forgive the bravado of the film's
marketing team: with Dreamworks' Deep Impact beating Armageddon to
theatres by a couple of months, Touchstone needed to save some face.
But unlike last year's Dante's Peak and Volcano, two films which stood
on their own and whose only similarity was the presence of magma, Deep
Impact and Armageddon are virtually the same movie - except that the
former was good.  Sure enough, as I predicted, many people were
disappointed with Deep Impact in that it was character driven with few
scenes of mass destruction (which if you rent out some older movies, you
will discover is more in keeping with the disaster movie genre of the
1970s than the action extravaganzas we see today).  If all you want is
to see stuff blow up and get crushed, then Armageddon may be for you.
     But, as a movie, Armageddon bites.  The script is paint-by-numbers,
the characters are undeveloped, and the racism, sexism, and jingoism
which passes for patriotic heroism in the United States is frankly
offensive.  I cannot believe, or don't want to believe, that even our
cousins from south of the border would like this movie.  But I've been
wrong before.

Author
Bob Bloom
 Armageddon (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Bruce Willis, Ben
Affleck, Liv Tyler, Billy Bob Thornton and Steve Buscemi.
 Armageddon is a loud and dumb movie. Be assured that doesn't necessarily
equate into bad.
 On the contrary, Armageddon offers an adrenaline rush of thrills, narrow
escapes and explosions.
 To really enjoy it, though, it's best to leave your brain at the box office.
 Unlike this summer's other end-of-the-Earth disaster flick, Deep Impact,
which at least made an attempt at a modicum of intelligence and scientific
accuracy, Armageddon is pure amusement park fun.
 If the two movies were compared to talk shows, Deep Impact would be Oprah
and Armageddon would be Jerry Springer.
 It's a paradox that the best science fiction films make the audience
believe that their premises, no matter how improbable, could be rooted in
fact.
 To stand out from the rest of the herd, a good science fiction movie must
have a foot - or at least a big toe - in the sea of plausibility.
 Armageddon forgets this precept from the outset.
 As in Deep Impact, a body from deep space - in this case an asteroid about
"the size of Texas" - is on a collision course with Earth.
 The difference, though, is significant. In Deep Impact, the threat was
discovered more than a year before the fatal encounter. In Armageddon,
impact will take place in 18 days.
 Hello! Anyone at Touchstone Pictures or in producer Jerry Bruckheimer's
office ever hear of the Hubble Telescope? You know, that big eye circling
our planet that in the past couple of years has discovered objects billions
and trillions of miles away. And what about all the observatories on Earth,
not to mention all the amateur astronomers who peer at the skies nightly.
Think they would miss something this big?
 Even real events have shown how foolish this concept is. A few months ago, a
scientist panicked the world for a day when he announced the discovery of
an asteroid that he predicted could hit Earth about the year 2038. Luckily,
his calculations were off and the asteroid will merely whiz by at a
neighborly 350,000 miles. So, Armageddon's very foundation is weak.
 In Deep Impact, a joint U.S.-Russian team of astronauts attempt to save
the world by landing on the comet, planting a nuclear device and detonating
it.
 Armageddon uses the same scenario, but instead of professional astronauts,
who does NASA select?
 A motley crew of blue-collar oil drillers, roughnecks, led by
super-driller Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis).
 By now, you may realize that Armageddon has as much in common with science
as The X-Files does with civics.
 So, with less than three weeks before doomsday, NASA trains these guys,
who include Ben Affleck, Will Patton and Steve Buscemi, for space flight.
 Training takes long enough to leave the drill team only about 12 hours to
land on the big rock, drill its 800-foot-deep hole, plant the nuke and fly
away home.
 This isn't science fiction, it's "The Dirty Dozen Saves the Planet."
 Armageddon is a visceral, pulse-pounding, exciting movie, no doubt about
it. And it's all so familiar that you can sit back and just watch, knowing
what will come next.
 The characters are stock. Willis' Harry is the pragmatic, get-the-job done
leader-father figure; Affleck's A.J. is the hot-head,
thinks-he's-smarter-than-anyone, son-Harry-never-had romantic lead.
 Billy Bob Thornton as Truman, the NASA director, is the guy who keeps
reminding everyone of the clock; Liv Tyler is Harry's independent-minded
daughter who's in love with A.J., much to Harry's disapproval; and Buscemi
is Rockhound, the wacky, smart-mouth, wise-cracking genius who has lost a
couple of his marbles.
 So there you have it. The outcome is obvious. During the 144-minute
running time, you don't need a scorecard to figure out who survives and who
doesn't.
 Armageddon features some dynamite special effects, but on the whole, it's
an empty, almost cynical movie in the way it manipulates its audience.
 It's also rather jingoistic. The rest of the world merely watches and
prays, leaving it up to the good, old U.S.A. to save the planet.
 That seems like the most improbable aspect of this seat-of-your-pants fantasy.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
